Someone sure stripped this place.
The reactor's gone.
No wonder they didn't answer our hail for two days. Nothing here to answer with.
Commander, I am detecting life signs from behind that door.
Worf!
Commander, take a look at this.
Blood.
Yes, but not human. I'm going to have to do some analysis on it.
It's jammed.
The two scientists are suffering from phaser stuns. I'd guess several hits each.
Several?
It'll take us a while to bring them around, but they will recover. We found a sample of blood. It's a rare iron-copper composite, unique to one humanoid species. The Acamarians.
Acamarians? Then that would suggest the Gatherers.
It is a likely hypothesis. The nomadic marauders who refer to themselves as Gatherers have raided other outposts in neighbouring sectors.
They've never come out this far before.
Mister Crusher, set course for the Acamar system.
Aye, sir.
Captain's log, Stardate 43421.9. In an effort to put an end to the Gatherer raids, we have come to the Acamar System to enlist the aid of Marouk, the Sovereign of Acamar Three.
Their raids have made this sector unsafe. They've ransacked our research facilities, our trade routes have been disrupted.
The Gatherers are elusive. We've only managed to capture a handful of them. But with the Starfleet's help
Hunting them down is not what I am proposing.
Reconciliation with the Gatherers is impossible. It's been tried. Every time we've offered amnesty, they've rejected it.
When was the last attempt made?
Eighteen years ago.
Eighteen years?
For almost a century now, they've been parasites, moving from star system to star system, living on what they could find or steal.
They're still your people.
No. Captain, you have to understand our history. A hundred years ago, before the Gatherers split off from our culture, we were a savage, violent race. Clans battled clans. Bloody, vengeful feuds that lasted for generations. But we overcame those ways, all except for the Gatherers.
After a century of wandering, they may be ready to come home.
Despite your progress, you are a divided society, and so it will remain until the Gatherers return to Acamar.
The attempt may be futile.
But there is so much to gain and there is so little to lose by the effort. The problem affects us all. It cannot be ignored.
Sovereign Marouk, welcome to the Bridge.
Thank you, Captain.
How soon will you be ready to leave Acamar?
I am ready now, Captain. I need only bring aboard two more servants.
I'll see to that, and to your accommodations.
I have reason to believe there is a Gatherer encampment somewhere in the Hromi Cluster.
Mister Data?
The Federation has charted but not explored several class M planets in that area. Any one of these planets might well serve as a base.
Mister Crusher, set course for the Hromi Cluster.
Aye, sir.
A fine ship, Commander.
We're all very proud of her.
Yuta, a light meal in twenty minutes.
May I be shown the kitchen, Commander?
You're the chef?
Yes. I'll prepare all meals for the Sovereign and her servants.
We can provide you with a kitchen, but it won't really be necessary. These food dispensers can synthesise anything that you may been. I'll show you. Sovereign, may I offer you a drink?
Yes, thank you. Cold water.
Computer, a glass of water, five degrees.
Please.
You're also the food taster?
That's part of the cook's duty.
I'm sure the Sovereign will wish to sample many of the cuisines your ship has to offer, but there are some Acamarian dishes that she will insist upon.
I will arrange for a technician to help programme your recipes into the computer. Of course, I'll have to try some of them. What's your specialty?
I have none.
Don't be modest. You can't tell me you haven't come up with a few culinary delights.
There is a spiced parthas dish.
Parthas?
A green vegetable with fleshy roots.
Parthas a la Yuta. I look forward to tasting it. Sovereign. Chef.
Now entering standard orbit of Gamma Hromi Two, sir.
Captain, I am detecting life readings from the planet surface, as well as several small areas of thermal radiation and carbon dioxide emissions, indicative of combustion.
Campfires, Data.
Is that not what I said?
It's worth a look.
Make it so.
Data, Worf.
Artonian lasers. Tonkian homing beacons. Quite a collection.
Noranium alloy, sir. It's salvage value is quite low.
Looks like these Gatherers weren't too discriminating in what they steal.
Commander? Ambush!
Rigelian phaser rifles, sir. Not particularly powerful.
Powerful enough. We came to talk!
Your words are wasted, Commander. They understand only this.
We're here to establish a dialogue, Worf.
Data, tell me about noranium. It vaporises at?
Two thousand three hundred fourteen degrees. Of course, noranium carbide
Thank you, Data.
Setting seven ought to do it.
Three, two, one, now!
Enterprise, four to beam up.
Cowards!
Your ambushes would be more successful if you bathed more often.
We've brought the Sovereign of Acamar.
Marouk? Here?
With an offer of amnesty.
Full dispensation will be extended to all Gatherers who are willing to return to Acamar Three.
You don't trust me, Marouk.
Should I?
But you expect me to trust you. Maybe you just poisoned it yourself. Taste this, Temarek.
Barbarians. This is futile.
Sovereign. Brull!
Go home, old woman.
You people haven't changed in a hundred years.
You should know. You were there.
Sit down! Please. Please. Now, we're here to talk.
It's a waste of time, Captain. They don't care about how they live.
Am I supposed to believe that you care how we live?
Yes.
Brull, she's here, isn't she?
Maybe you forced her to come, Picard.
Nobody forces me anywhere, Brull.
What is there for us on Acamar Three?
A life. A home. You can end your wanderings, your miserable existence.
Do I look miserable to you?
The clan wars are over, Brull. It is a past we're ashamed of. It is why you had to leave. Now, it is time to come home.
I want to speak privately with Sovereign Marouk and Picard. Everyone else, get out.
Any insights?
Brull's ready to negotiate. He just wants privacy so that he won't appear weak in front of the other Gatherers.
You are of the clan Lornak.
What of it? I've seen you before.
Yes.
But it's impossible.
No. Look closer. I am Yuta of the clan Tralesta.
I am the last of my line, but my clan will outlive yours.
Marouk's offer has value.
Commander.
But still, I don't know.
But you'll agree it is enough to present to your leader.
Chorgan is a better judge of these matters. I will take it to him. You will hear from me in twenty days.
Brull, in twenty days, I hope to be very far away from here.
With all due respect, Brull, I would like to make the offer to Chorgan myself.
We'll gladly take you with us on the Enterprise. How many of your men do you want to accompany you?
I'll come alone. If this is a trap.
Oh, it isn't.
Mallon, you'll be in charge while I'm gone. If I'm not back in ten days
Brull! Brull!
Volnoth.
Away team to Enterprise. Medical Emergency.
Volnoth was an old man. There's nothing to be done.
There's a chance that our doctors can do something.
You found him?
Yes. And there are no other members of the Lornak clan here, so I claim his possessions.
Granted.
Have you no respect for the dead?
What's there to respect about a corpse?
Temarek, no. Calm down.
He's been dead too long.
How?
Cardiac arrest?
You don't sound convinced.
No, he died of a heart attack, all right, but I can't find the cause. His cardiac muscle is strong and there's no sign of arterial occlusion.
Brull, will you show Mister Crusher the course to set to the Hromi Cluster?
A child? This doesn't inspire my confidence.
This is our present position.
Set a heading for three four three mark seven two.
That's going to take us through the centre of an asteroid belt.
What's the matter, kid? Can't you fly yourself around a couple of rocks?
Sure I can, but if we take this heading we can avoid the belt completely, and only lose twelve point one minutes at warp seven.
Have it your way, kid.
For centuries, my planet was in chaos. Loyalty to one's clan was absolute. The slightest injury to one member demanded violent retaliation.
And these blood feuds could last for decades?
The obsession with vengeance would be passed from generation to generation. And with each act of retribution, the violence would escalate.
It's not unlike much the history of my own planet.
Your pardon, Sovereign. May I be excused briefly? Commander Riker requested that I prepare him an Acamarian dish.
Of course, Yuta.
What are you doing?
Homework.
What is this?
Math.
I can see that, but what does it mean?
This is the locally Euclidean metrisation of a k-fold contravariant Riemannian tensor field.
You good at it? You don't like me.
I didn't say that.
No problem. I have many friends that don't like me. But what do you know about me?
You're a thief.
I do it to survive, not because I enjoy it. We Gatherers value our freedom. We do as we want and we answer to no creature.
Then why are you helping Sovereign Marouk to change all that?
Maybe because I want something better for me, and for my children.
You have children?
Yeah, two sons. One's just about your age. He's not any good at math.
Parthas a la Yuta.
With the help of one of your food stations.
It's wonderful.
Truly excellent.
Thank you.
Would you care to join us?
I don't want to intrude.
You're not. I was just leaving. Please, sit down.
It really is delicious.
I'm glad it pleases you, Commander.
I'm not your commander. My name is William.
I will call you William if you prefer.
I do. When you say Commander you say it like you say Sovereign to Marouk.
As a servant. You're an excellent commander, but you'd make a poor sovereign.
Why's that? Not that I disagree.
You're not comfortable with servants.
No, I prefer the company of equals.
So you treat me as an equal.
And you're not comfortable with that?
I'm not used to it. I've always been a servant. Not that I'm complaining. The Sovereign treats me well. I have all that I could want.
What about freedom?
I can never have that.
Because you're the property of the Sovereign?
No. I'm not her slave. I can leave whenever I wish.
But you have no place to go?
Just the opposite. My path is all too clear.
Yuta, you're an excellent chef, but you speak in riddles.
I've never been very good at conversation.
Yuta.
I believe the Sovereign wants me to return. Enjoy the parthas.
Sickbay to Commander Riker. I've discovered something interesting, Will.
On my way.
You're scowling, Doctor.
I'm thinking.
And?
The old Gatherer on the planet? I know what caused his heart attack. The medical tricorder almost missed it, but there was a microvirus in his body, blocking his autonomic nerve impulses.
And that stopped his heart?
But here's the really interesting part. This microvirus will only attach itself to cells which contain a very specific DNA sequence.
How specific?
Without knowing more about their genetic makeup, I can't be sure. But my guess is, this virus would only kill one Acamarian in a million.
Pretty single-minded bug.
Too single-minded. I can't believe it's a naturally occurring virus.
Meaning somebody engineered it.
Meaning Volnoth was murdered.
Sir, Acamar Three has agreed to your request for access to their databases. They are now being transmitted into our computer over subspace link.
Good. Notify Doctor Crusher when Acamar's medical database is online. Riker out. Come in.
I'm disturbing you.
Not at all.
As the Sovereign has no further need for my services this evening, she suggested I might spend some time with you.
What a charming suggestion.
She appreciates the affection you've shown me.
Was I that obvious?
Yes.
Well, I've already dined. Maybe you know a good Acamarian dessert recipe.
Does that not please you? Tell me what you want, William. I will do anything you wish.
Wait a minute.
I don't understand. Don't you want me to give you pleasure?
Not as a servant. I told you, I prefer equals.
Even in the matters of love?
Especially in matters of love.
I've offended you.
No. I only want to make you as happy as you want to make me. You're entitled to that.
No, I'm not.
Yuta.
I do not feel pleasure, or passion. I haven't been able to for a long time.
I don't know who did this to you, or why, but it can change.
I wish it could. Tonight most of all. I'm sorry.
Your people prepare a warm welcome.
That's Chorgan's ship.
Shields holding.
Mister Worf, contact Chorgan. Tell him Brull has brought us to talk.
Chorgan is not responding.
Mister Worf, can we knock out their shields without seriously damaging their ship?
I believe we can, sir.
Prepare phasers and open a channel.
Phasers locked. Channel open.
Chorgan, this is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise. All right, let's focus their attention. Mister Worf, fire phasers.
Their forward shields are inoperative.
Well done, Lieutenant.
We are being hailed, sir.
That's better. On screen.
Brull, you traitor! You have led them here to destroy me!
Chorgan, if I had wanted you destroyed, you would not be talking to me now. Obviously, I wanted something else.
And what is that?
I have on board Sovereign Marouk of Acamar Three. I want you to hear what she and Brull have to say.
She's worth listening to.
I don't wish to listen to either of you.
You have no choice. Prepare to receive us. We're beaming on board. Picard out. Cancel Red Alert. Tell Sovereign Marouk meet me in transporter three.
Aye, sir.
You're going alone, Captain?
The danger is minimal, Number One. Chorgan is unlikely to do anything rash with the Enterprise's phasers trained on his ship.
There are still risks.
For these negotiations to succeed I must be a mediator, not an enforcer. You have the Bridge, Number One. Brull.
Chorgan, this is Sovereign Marouk.
You may sit.
Chorgan, I think you will find Marouk's proposal
You know, Picard, I could take you prisoner. Oh, don't worry, I've no intention of doing so. I know what trouble it's been for you to get here, and I am curious why.
Then let's proceed.
Quite simply, I am proposing amnesty for every Gatherer.
Amnesty? You mean slavery.
Chorgan, if you want to know what I think
I don't. Say what you came to say, though I doubt that I'm going to believe you.
I didn't believe this very persuasive Federation Captain when he suggested that we could reconcile our differences. I'm convinced now it's the right thing, not just for you, but for us too. We need you back. I've brought some Acamarian brandy. I'm sure it's been a long time.
No! You have spent a century hunting us down.
She is trying to put an end to all that.
Yes, by luring us back and putting us in prison.
No, by accepting you back as free men.
Will you feed and clothe us, too?
No, of course I won't. What I will do is give you the means to feed and clothe yourselves. We've set aside some land and you can use it to
Land? Do we look like farmers to you?
Then don't farm. Use the land as you wish. It is yours. And the moment you set foot on it, you'll be better off than you are today. You won't be running any longer.
We will need autonomy.
Autonomy?
Sovereign, we can at least acknowledge that Chorgan appears willing to discuss your offer.
There are many levels of autonomy. Certainly your region would have certain rights.
Yes, and those rights will be spelled out before I agree to anything.
Commander, I'm afraid the only entry we have on Volnoth in the Acamarian database is a birth record.
Probably one of the last of the Gatherers to be born on their planet.
Commander? I've been digging through the medical database from Acamar Three for hours, and I have found another victim of the same microvirus that killed Volnoth. But only one. Fifty three years ago, a Gatherer named Penthor-Mul.
Data? Anything in your file on Penthor-Mul?
Yes, sir. He was a member of the Lornak clan. He was captured while leading a Gatherer raid on an Acamarian outpost. He died of a heart attack before his trial ended.
Display Volnoth's birth record again.
Lornak. The same clan.
The only two recorded deaths by this microvirus both from the same clan. What does that tell us, Doctor?
If these microbes were engineered for murder, I'd say somebody could be going after a whole family.
Commander, Chorgan, the present leader of the Gatherers, is also from the Lornak clan.
I want to know just how this clan was involved in the Acamarian blood feuds, and I'd like to know any clue as to who their enemies were. How could this virus have been transmitted, Doctor?
More ways than I can count. And it's perfectly safe to the carrier as long as he doesn't have the same DNA patterns.
Tailor made for their enemies.
Commander, eighty years ago the Lornaks massacred a rival clan, the Tralestas. It ended a feud that had lasted for two hundred years.
Ended it?
According to these records, there were no survivors. The Tralestas were annihilated.
Something tells me they weren't all been wiped out.
There must be a missing link here.
Computer, any members of the Acamarian delegation from the Tralesta clan?
Clan affiliation is not within provided records.
Sir, I believe I have found a correlation between the two deaths. Your missing link. That is Penthor-Mul being led from his trial.
I don't see the connection.
Behind him and to the left, sir.
Computer, scan left and magnify.
The computer can extrapolate and reconstruct the rest of the face, sir.
Do it.
But that photograph was taken over fifty years ago.
Fifty three years ago, and she hasn't aged a day.
Three seats on the ruling council?
If we're going to be subject to your laws, we want a part in making it.
Well I agree you're entitled to representation but not on the ruling council.
Unacceptable. The real power is in the council. You're shutting us off already.
No! You're trying to take too much! No group has three seats on the council.
I don't care what others have.
You only care about what you can take.
Sovereign, if the situation were reversed, I'm sure you would be demanding equal levels of representation.
You're right, Captain. I apologise for my temper.
Perhaps a brief pause would be helpful.
I agree. Maybe a little touch of that brandy?
Yuta.
You know, thank you, it is remarkable how very much alike the two of you actually are.
That's ridiculous.
Really, Captain.
No, I'm quite serious. You are both able negotiators, strong leaders.
We don't obey weak leaders.
We have nothing in common at all. We haven't agreed to anything.
You're wrong, Chorgan. We've agreed to have some brandy together.
Don't move!
A Federation trap!
Chorgan, I assure you, my First Officer has a good reason for his actions. You do, Number One?
Yuta. Move away from Chorgan. Do it.
Why?
Because of a man you once knew named Penthar-Mul.
Penthar-Mul? How do you know Penthar-Mul?
Tell him, Yuta.
I don't understand.
You were with Penthar-Mul when he died.
It was fifty years ago. How could I?
I know, Yuta. Stop! Chorgan, keep perfectly still. Your life is in danger. Step back, Yuta.
William, this is not your concern.
It is now. You're about to commit a murder.
It isn't murder. It's justice.
Who are you?
Yuta of the clan Tralesta.
There are no more Tralestas.
Five survived the last Lornak raid. But on that day, a century ago, my life ended and my search began. I was the one chosen, transformed. My cells were altered, my aging slowed, enough to finish my task.
You used me in order to get to the last few you couldn't reach.
Yes, Sovereign.
You will never leave this ship alive.
You're the last. Once you're dead, what happens to me doesn't matter.
The wars are over, Yuta.
You cannot understand.
You're right, I can't. Because I've seen the part of you that regrets what you've become. Listen to me. You don't have to do this any more.
I have no choice.
You do.
William, I. I'm sorry.
Stop.
Yuta, don't do this.
Commander, I am in your debt.
Oh, yes, thank you. New orders from Starfleet. The rendezvous.  Nothing, thank you. The rendezvous with the Goddard has been postponed.
In the meantime?
Starbase three four three. We're to take on medical supplies for the Alpha Leonis system.
Sounds pretty routine.
With the Gatherer truce in effect, it certainly should be. We won't require a full ship's complement. I'm going to extend shore leave on the starbase to anyone who wants it.
I'll pass that along to the crew, Captain.
Brother John Bates, is not that the morning which breaks yonder?
I think it be, but we have no great cause to desire the approach of day.
Who's there?
A friend.
Under what captain serve you?
Under Sir Thomas Erpingham.
I pray you, what thinks he of our estate?
Even as men wrecked upon a sand, that look to be washed off the next tide.
He hath not told his thought to the king?
No, nor it is not meet he should. For though I speak it to you, I think the king is but a man, as I am. The violet smells to him as it doth to me, in his nakedness he appears but a man. Therefore, his fears, out of doubt, be of the same relish as ours are. Yet no man should possess him with any appearance of fear, lest he, by showing it, should dishearten his army.
He may show what outward courage he will, but I believe, as cold a night as 'tis, he could wish himself in Thames up to the neck.
Methinks I could not die anyplace so contented as in the King's company, his cause being just and his quarrel honourable.
That's more than we know.
Or more than we should seek after. If his cause be wrong, our obedience to the King wipes the crime of it out of us.
But if the cause be not good, the King himself hath a heavy reckoning to make when all those legs and arms and heads chopped off in a battle shall join together at the latter day and cry all, we died at such a place.
The King is not bound to answer the particular endings of his soldiers, the father of his son, nor the master of his servant.
Splendid, Data. Splendid. You're getting better and better.
Freeze programme. Thank you, sir. I plan to study the performances of Olivier, Branagh, Shapiro, Kullnark
Data, you're here to learn about the human condition and there is no better way of doing that than by embracing Shakespeare. But you must discover it through your own performance, not by imitating others.
Riker to Picard. Sorry to interrupt, sir.
Go ahead, Number One.
Sensors are picking up an
Unidentified craft in the Neutral Zone.
It's heading toward Federation space.
On our way. Picard out. We'll get to the rest of the act another time, Data. Computer, file programme and clear.
Captain, why should a king wish to pass as a commoner? If he is the leader, should he not be leading?
Listen to what Shakespeare is telling you about the man, Data. A king who had a true feeling for his soldiers would wish to share their fears with them on the eve of battle.
Sir, will I be able to schedule a performance for the crew in the near future?
Let's not rush it, shall we?
Outpost Sierra Six confirms our readings, sir. They identify it as a Romulan scout ship. Bearing two seven zero mark one four.
A scout ship? What would a scout ship be doing this far into the Neutral Zone?
Captain. Shall we transmit a warning to withdraw, sir?
Open a hailing frequency.
Aye, sir. Captain, the Romulan is hailing us.
 Visual.
Not within range yet.
Open a channel.
Federation ship, do you read? I require urgent assistance.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS
Federation ship. Please, help me. Requesting asylum. Under pursuit.
Pursuit?
Visual range. On screen, Captain.
Red Alert. Open a channel to the warship.
Come to intercept course. Keep us out of the Neutral Zone.
Channel is open.
how long before they cross over into Federation territory?
Forty-one seconds, sir.
Romulan warbird, this is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation vessel Enterprise. You have crossed into the Neutral Zone and are engaged in hostile action. Explain yourself and your intent.
No reply, sir.
Hail the scout.
Responding.
On screen.
Federation craft. Please, you must help me!
We are moving to intercept. Maintain your course and power.
Scout ship is severely damaged, Captain. Engines inoperative, shields are down.
Position?
Coordinates one four zero by two zero five, sir.
Federation space.
Right. Move to within five kilometres. Mister La Forge, prepare to extend
Our shields around the Romulan scout ship.
At that range, the shields won't be able to take much punishment, Captain.
Five kilometres, sir.
All stop.
Extend shields.
Shields in place.
We've got the scout ship, Captain.
Weapons on the warbird are fully powered, sir.
Lock phasers. Open a channel.
Ready.
Romulan vessel, you are now in Federation territory. Unless you withdraw
No argument?
Warbird has re-entered the Neutral Zone. Heading for Romulan territory.
Massive power failure to the scout ship, sir. All systems are going offline, including life support.
Transporter two, prepare to beam the occupant of the scout ship directly aboard.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf.
Mister Data, lock onto the scout ship. Take it in tow.
Energise.
I must see your captain immediately.
We'll take you to Sickbay, after that
This cannot wait. I have information vital to your survival.
Captain's log, Stardate 43462.5. We have beamed aboard an apparent Romulan defector, who claims to be a low ranking logistics officer with extraordinary information about a secret offensive.
The humiliating defeat at the Battle of Cheron has not been forgotten. The new leaders have vowed to discard the treaty and claim the Neutral Zone. Nelvana Three is just the first step.
You're saying an entire base has already been established there?
In forty-eight hours, the reactor core will be online.
So the Federation sensors that monitor the Neutral Zone just missed it?
It would seem so. In two days, a fleet of Romulan warbirds will be within striking distance of fifteen Federation sectors.
The Federation will not permit that.
Then it is war that we're talking about, isn't it? Destroy the base now and the threat is over.
Well, I'm sure you are fatigued by your ordeal and you require medical attention. Lieutenant Worf, will you accompany Sublieutenant Setal to the Sickbay. We will attend to your quarters.
No doubt you will wish to question me further.
No doubt.
He tells a hell of a story.
You don't believe it?
The Empire knows that we'd never allow them to maintain a base within the Neutral Zone.
Commander, that would not be an atypical Romulan ploy. In their long history of war, the Romulans have rarely attacked first. They prefer to test their enemy's resolve.
I think he's a plant to draw us into the Neutral Zone. Then we'll look like the aggressors.
And the Romulans would have a legitimate excuse for responding in force.
Exactly.
That would also not be an atypical Romulan ploy, sir.
It's always a chess game with them, isn't it?
Well, at least he's given us the chance to get a look at some Romulan technology close up.
Mister La Forge, you will lead the away team over to the scout. Commander, you and Counsellor Troi will conduct Setal's interrogation.
Captain, permission to observe the interrogation?
No, Mister Data. I need you on the Bridge with me. There is much to be done. We have less than forty eight hours to prevent a war. Or perhaps to start one. This will depend on establishing the truth of
I set the auto-destruct sequencer before I left the ship.
Why?
Wouldn't you? To prevent your ship from being captured?
Excuse me for being a little confused, Setal, but I thought you were defecting.
I am not a traitor. All you can see is the opportunity to exploit me. The Federation credo, exploitation. You couldn't get aboard my ship fast enough. Strip it down. What secrets might it reveal that we can use? You're a short sighted people. Can't you understand? I came to stop a war.
If you could just hold still? With your metabolism, this will heal in a few moments.
Thank you, Doctor. How fortunate you know something of Romulan medicine.
Yes. I had a chance to gain some experience recently.
Ah, yes. The incident at Galorndon Core. The two officers.
You are aware of a great deal for a logistics clerk.
It was common knowledge. I can show you my rating code.
Forged credentials are a simple matter for a spy.
How do you allow Klingon pahtk to walk around in a Starfleet uniform?
You are lucky this is not a Klingon ship. We know how to deal with spies.
Remove this tohzah from my sight.
Your knowledge of Klingon curses is impressive. But as a Romulan might say, only a veruul would use such language in public. Mister Worf, please see to the security arrangements for our guest's stay.
Aye, sir.
You find something amusing?
Lieutenant Worf. I like him. To be more accurate, I understand him. A warrior, proud, fearless, living only for combat. Exactly the type that will get us all killed, if we're not careful.
This is the food station. You can reach me through the comm. panel. Later, we'd like to ask you a few more questions.
Computer, water.
Temperature?
Twelve onkians.
This system is calibrated to the Celsius metric system.
Any temperature at all on the cold side of whatever your system is.
There is no unusual activity in the Nelvana System, sir.
Let's isolate and magnify that system.
Nothing on the sensors.
It is hard to believe in what one cannot see. And yet conceivably, with their cloaking technology, a fleet of Romulan warships could be passing before our eyes. There must be some way to neutralise this advantage.
Captain Picard, priority one message from Starfleet coming in on secured channel.
In my Ready room. Computer, delay time?
Two hours, twenty two minute delay from time of transmission
At Starfleet Command on Lya Three.
Computer, key access four one two mark eight zero. Picard, Jean-Luc. Starfleet priority code Gamma. Decode. Begin message.
Captain, we have received an official protest from the Romulan Empire demanding the return of your defector. Obviously, we are refusing to comply. I join in your scepticism, but if it is a deception, the Romulans are certainly making a good show of it. The Federation Council has convened in emergency session. There is no doubt in my mind that this will eventually fall on your shoulders, Jean-Luc. You've got him. You must decide if he's telling the truth. For now, I suggest you proceed along the Neutral Zone border toward a Federation position proximate to Nelvana Three.
Picard to Lieutenant Worf.
Yes, Captain.
Please come to my Ready room.
Aye, sir. On my way.
Slow playback. Display engine logs and power data of both vessels. Now watch what happens at zero nine five four three three on the clock. The scout has sustained engine damage, forcing him to slow to point six one five impulse power. The warship should overtake him, but it doesn't. Now, just two point six seconds later, the warbird slows to precisely the same speed. Three times, three speed fluctuations. The warship kept its distance every time. I don't think they wanted to catch up.
And yet they fired at the scout ship. They could have killed him.
Not necessarily, Doctor. The Romulans have the same capability to direct the impact of their weapons as we do.
Is there a possibility the wound could be self-inflicted?
They're very bad burns. I hardly think
A possibility.
Captain's log, Stardate 43463.7. We're holding a position at the Neutral Zone border proximate to Nelvana Three. If our guest is telling the truth, there are twenty one hours left before the Romulan base becomes functional.
The Monitor and the Hood are headed in your direction, though they will arrive too late to be of assistance. Warnings have gone out to all outposts along the border as well as several independent vessels in nearby sectors. No one here wants a war, Captain. But we are prepared to take them on if that's what they want. All Federation starships have been placed on Yellow Alert.
Come.
You wanted to see me, Captain?
Yes, Data. I want you to prepare a class one probe. Set the sensors for maximum scan. I want every metre of Nelvana Three monitored.
I will start my calibrations, sir.
Data?
Is there something else you require of me, Captain?
Your clarity of thought. Your objectivity, as always. Sit down. Data, it's very possible we are about to go to war. The repercussions of what we do during the next twenty four hours may be felt for years to come. I want you to keep a record of these events, so that history will have the benefit of a dispassionate view.
I will begin immediately, sir. Is that all?
How is the crew's spirit?
They are concerned, of course, Captain, but confident. Do you not see that, sir?
Data, unlike King Henry, it is not easy for me to disguise myself and walk among my troops. That'll be all.
Now, if these men do not die well, it will be a black matter for the king that led them to it.
Why must we waste time playing this ridiculous game?
There's more here than you're telling us. You're forcing yourself to hold back.
I have told you everything relevant about Nelvana Three.
I'm not talking about the base.
The base is all that matters.
You're lying, Setal.
Go to Nelvana Three, and you will see.
We're not going anywhere until we get to the truth You're a spy, aren't you?
No.
Then prove it. You can begin by telling me something about the location and strength of the Romulan fleet.
I don't know it.
You're a logistics officer.
For one sector only.
Who's your superior officer?
Admiral Jarok.
The location of the Romulan bases along the Neutral Zone?
I don't know.
In your sector?
Irrelevant.
The number of troops under your admiral's command?
Irrelevant. Irrelevant.
I guess you're right. It's not worth playing this game.
What a fool I've been. To come looking for courage in a lair of cowards.
Captain Picard, priority message from security officer, Klingon vessel Bortas.
Lieutenant Worf, will you handle this at security station, deck nine.
Aye, sir.
Sensors are configured for planetary probe, sir. Ready for launch.
Proceed.
Probe on course. Sensors are functioning.
Coordinate your analysis with Mister La Forge. I want this report with dispatch.
I don't know, Data. My gut tells me we ought to be listening to what this guy's trying to tell us.
Your gut?
It's just a feeling, you know? An instinct. Intuition.
But those qualities would interfere with rational judgment, would they not?
You're right. Sometimes they do.
Then why not rely strictly on the facts?
Because you just can't rely on the plain and simple facts. Sometimes they lie.
They can lead to wrong conclusions, but they cannot lie.
What do you think? Is he a defector or not?
The facts to date would lead to an objective conclusion that he is not.
Somehow I think we're going to catch the Romulans with their pants down on Nelvana Three, just like he says.
With their pants?
A metaphor. Catching them in the act.
Because your gut tells you so?
Exactly. But you can't always go with your gut either. It's a combination, Data. Right, I'll put it to you this way. All these feelings that get in the way of human judgment, that confuse the hell out of us, that make us second guess ourselves, well we need them. We need them to help us fill in the missing pieces because we almost never have all the facts.
So a person fills in missing pieces of the puzzle with his own personality, resulting in a conclusion based as much on instinct and intuition as on fact.
Now you're getting it.
But what does one do if he has no instinct and intuition?
Data. Look at this. The facts just took a left turn.
As the probe went into orbit around Nelvana Three, it began picking up low level subspace radio emissions.
Could they be naturally occurring?
No, sir. The patterns are clearly artificial.
The signal was so faint our ship sensors couldn't read it from this distance.
Can we decode it?
We've tried. It's probably Romulan but we can't be sure. We've also picked up ionisation disturbances.
Cloaked Romulan ships could produce that effect.
What about the planet surface?
Reading nothing but barren rock. I don't know. They might be able to hide a base from our probe. Its capabilities are limited. The only way we'll know for sure is if we go and take a look for ourselves.
That'll be all, gentlemen.
I take it you have never seen a Romulan before.
That would be an incorrect assumption.
Then why do you invade my privacy?
I was attempting to ascertain what my guts tell me about you.
You're the android. I know a host of Romulan cyberneticists that would love to be this close to you.
I do not find that concept particularly appealing.
Nor should you.
I am told by various crewmembers that this viewport is their favourite on the ship.
I thought it would bring me some comfort. But these are not my stars. Even the heavens are denied to me here. Synthetic swill. I don't suppose your food terminals would be capable of producing a Romulan ale?
I am afraid they would require the molecular structure of the beverage in question. And, as you are no doubt aware, our knowledge of your planet is quite limited.
The loss is yours. For I have visited over a hundred different worlds, and none possessed the awesome beauty of Romulus.
Am I correct in assuming you regret your decision to come here?
What I did had to be done. But to never again see the firefalls of Gath Gal'thong, and the spires of my home as they rise above the Apnex Sea at dawn. It's a bitter thing to be exiled from your home.
It does appear unlikely you will ever be allowed to return to your planet.
The cold reaction of an android.
But perhaps we can bring Romulus to you.
Programme complete.
Run programme.
After you.
The valley of Chula. I know it well.
You are free to stay here as long as you wish.
I no longer live here. Turn it off.
Cancel programme.
This. This is my home now. My future. I have sacrificed everything. It must not be in vain. Arrange a meeting between myself and Captain Picard. Tell him Admiral Jarok wants to see him.
Captain, we have confirmed that you are holding Admiral Alidar Jarok. He has been identified as the commander at the massacre at the Norkan outposts. The Council strongly advises that you to consider Jarok an unreliable source of information.
Bring him in.
Ensign, will you wait outside? Have a seat, Admiral Jarok.
Captain, there is no more time.
Admiral, have a seat. You see, I'm just not convinced that you are telling the truth.
What must I do?
You must convince me. If I had irrefutable evidence? But you did not bring irrefutable evidence. You brought no evidence at all. Now, here, you are not the man you claimed to be. Admiral, your credibility is stretched beyond belief. A Romulan defector is almost a contradiction in terms. But Admiral Jarok crossing the lines?
I explained my motives to your interrogators.
Yes, yes, yes, yes, yes. Peace in our galaxy. Except, Admiral, you are not a man of peace. Your military record, what we know of it, is clear.
which is precisely why I chose an alternate identity here.
The massacres in the Norkan outposts, for example.
What you call massacres were called the Norkan Campaign on my world, Captain. One world's butcher is another world's hero. Perhaps I am neither one.
On what basis, Admiral, am I to decide? Your good word? Are you willing to help us overpower the Romulan B-type warbirds we may encounter? Are you prepared to help us detect them through their cloaking shields? You see my problem, Admiral. You ask us for faith in circumstances which are hardly possible to believe, compounded by lies and your refusal to tell us all you know.
I cannot betray my people.
You've already betrayed your people, Admiral. You've made your choices, sir. You're a traitor. Now, if the bitter taste of that is unpalatable to you, I am truly sorry. But I will not risk the lives of my crew because you think you can dance on the edge of the Neutral Zone. You've crossed over, Admiral. You make yourself comfortable with that.
Do you have any children, Captain Picard? A family?
No.
Then you have sacrificed too much for your career.
Yes, this is all very interesting.
There comes a time in a man's life that you cannot know. When he looks down at the first smile of his baby girl and realises he must change the world for her. For all children. It is for her that I am here. Not to destroy the Romulan Empire, but to save it. For months, I tried desperately to persuade the High Command that another war would destroy the Empire. They got tired of my arguments. Finally I was censured, sent off to command some distant sector. This was my only recourse. I will never see my child smile again. She will grow up believing that her father is a traitor. But she will grow up. If you act, Picard. If we stop the war before it begins
I can't. And I won't. Unless I have unequivocal cooperation.
Admiral Jarok has provided me with the locations, strengths and tactical plans of the Romulan fleet. Mister La Forge, he is prepared to give you data regarding engines, weapons and the cloaking systems of the warbird class starship. But I believe his experience as a field commander will be more valuable for its strategic sense than in the technical areas.
Any edge'll help, Captain.
Don't depend on it. For all we know, he may still be lying, but we shall find that out soon enough. Number One, set course for Nelvana Three.
Second Officer:Second officer's log, stardate 43465.2. We have entered the Neutral Zone in direct violation of the Treaty of Algeron. Presuming Romulan warships are cloaked and monitoring us, we expect heavy resistance as we approach Nelvana Three.
Tactical?
Nothing on sensors.
I don't like it I would've expected a greeting party.
You echo another noteworthy commander in a similar circumstances, Number One. A countryman of yours, George Armstrong Custer when his Seventh Cavalry arrived at the Little Big Horn.
May we have better luck.
Approaching Nelvana system.
Engage impulse engines.
Nelvana Three on screen. Still no sign of them on sensors. In a way, I'd rather be fighting my way this, It's just too damned easy.
Prepare to enter standard orbit. Data?
Scanning the planet, sir. No life forms, no power sources, no weapons systems.
No indication of a base at all?
No, sir.
The subspace signal the probe detected? The ionisation disturbances?
I am picking them up, sir, but I cannot identify the source. They seem to be moving in an orbital path with an eight hundred kilometre apogee.
Lieutenant Worf, bring the Admiral up here.
Aye, sir.
Maybe they abandoned the planet after he defected.
There is no scarring on the planet surface that would denote heavy construction of any kind.
A cloaking device of some sort, to hide the entire base?
A cloaking device operating on the surface would be given away by visible distortion effects.
Perhaps you'd care to explain why we're here, Admiral.
There doesn't appear to be a base.
I don't understand.
Nelvana Three, Admiral. No base, no weapons, no sign of any life at all.
But I saw the tactical communiqués. The records. Timetables for completion. An entire legion was assigned to the section.
Is it possible they could have been feeding you disinformation? You said that you had been censured. Reassigned, four months ago. They knew of your dissatisfaction. Could all this have been to test your loyalty?
No. No. It's impossible.
They let you escape with an arsenal of worthless secrets. What other explanation is there?
Permission to withdraw from the Neutral Zone?
At your earliest convenience, Number One.
Helm, bring her round one hundred and eighty degrees. Geordi, get us out of here.
I hear you, Commander.
Two Romulan warships uncloaking. Coordinates
Shields holding.
Damage?
Minor damage in the secondary hull.
Power transfer fields may be pinched off.
I'm working on it.
Captain!
Not yet, Mister Worf. This is just a tap on the shoulder, or we wouldn't be here talking about it.
The Romulans are hailing us.
On screen.
Captain Picard, I hardly expected to see you again so soon. It seems this time you are the one who has made an aggressive move across the Neutral Zone.
Commander Tomalak, as I'm sure you already know, we were responding to a warnings of Romulan incursions at Nelvana Three.
But, Captain, as you can see, there is no incursion.
And the matter of the unidentified subspace radio emissions, and the ionisation disturbances?
Ah, you must mean our orbiting probe. We are studying Nelvana Three for archaeological research.
With a cloaked satellite?
Really, Captain, would you have us believe this satellite is an excuse for your aggressive charge across the Neutral Zone?
You can believe what you wish. We will be on our way.
Without even an apology, Captain?
If an apology will do, then I offer it.
I'm afraid it won't, so I will save you the humiliation.
Get to it, Tomalak.
You see, Picard, after we dissect your Enterprise for every precious bit of information, I intend to display its broken hull in the centre of the Romulan capitol as a symbol of our victory. It will inspire our armies for generations to come, and serve as a warning to any other traitor who would create ripples of disloyalty.
All the communiqués, all the timetables, all the records. They were all fiction, written for my benefit. A test. A test of my loyalty. And you used me to lure the Enterprise into the Neutral Zone.
First, Captain, you will return the traitor Jarok, then you will surrender as prisoners of war.
Do you seriously expect me to accept those terms?
No, Captain Picard, I expect you won't. You have thirty seconds to decide.
I do not require one, Tomalak.
I urge you, Captain Picard, surrender. Consider the men and women you would lead into a lost cause.
If the cause is just and honourable, they are prepared to give their lives. Are you prepared to die today, Tomalak?
I expected more from you than an idle threat, Picard.
Then you shall have it. Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
Klingon warships armed and ready, sir.
What shall it be, Tomalak?
You will still not survive our assault.
You will not survive ours. Shall we die together?
I look forward to our next meeting, Captain.
Romulan disruptors powering down, sir.
Cancel red alert. Mister Worf, will you extend the appreciation of the Federation and my personal gratitude to the Klingons.
Aye, sir.
Take us back, Number One.
I did it for nothing. My home, my family. For nothing.
He ingested a Felodesine chip. He must have brought it with him. I'm sorry, Captain. There was no antidote.
A letter to his wife and daughter.
Sir, he must have known it would be impossible for us to deliver this.
Today, perhaps. But if there are others with the courage of Admiral Jarok, we may hope to see a day of peace when we can take his letter home.
Well, I'm greatly impressed with everything I've seen so far, Prime Minister.
Then I hope it will reflect favourably in your report, Captain.
It's a tribute to your people that you were able to recover so rapidly from the Tarsian War.
It is indeed. We are not warriors. We believe reason can settle disputes. But not every culture agrees with our position.
An unfortunate reality.
The development of the mind, the cultivation of the intellect, these are the pursuits to which the Angosians have dedicated themselves for centuries.
Prime Minister. I'm sorry to interrupt, but we have a problem. May I see you for a moment?
Excuse me, gentlemen.  Yes, what is it?
Well, I think they'll make a fine addition to the Federation, Number One.
I'm not sure I'd like to live in this place. A little stuffy for my taste.
A prisoner has escaped from the penal colony on Lunar Five. Two guards are dead. The prisoner has taken a transport vessel.
Do you have means of pursuit?
The tracking station was sabotaged. The entire base is in chaos. We have ordered ships from the surface to follow him, but to be honest, our civilian pilots are not trained for this.
With your permission? Mister Data, a stolen transport vessel has departed from Lunar Five.
Have you picked it up on the sensors?
Yes, Commander.
Good.
Detain the vessel and quarantine the pilot. Is he armed?
Yes. And extremely dangerous, Commander. Lunar Five is a maximum security facility.
Did you read that, Data?
Yes, sir.
We will use extreme caution.
Keep us informed. Riker out.
On screen, sir.
Specifications on the vessel, Mister Worf?
No warp drive. Minimal weaponry.
Heading, Mister Crusher?
Three one nine mark two five oh, sir.
Vessel's speed increasing to point oh two impulse. He's seen us, Data.
That's the ship's drive section
What happened to the rest of the ship?
Scan the drive section for life form readings.
None.
Bring us around to the back side of the asteroid, Mister Crusher.
Sensors indicate wreckage on the asteroid's surface, Data.
No life signs.
Apparently, he did not survive.
Data, the drive section. Where'd it go? There's no sign of it on its previous heading. Someone must be at the helm.
Status report, Mister Data?
I am afraid the prisoner has eluded us, sir.
Eluded the Enterprise?
We followed procedures precisely, Captain. Scanners indicated no life forms present in the drive section. I cannot explain how he escaped.
Incoming message from the Angosian Prime Minister.
On screen.
Captain, we've identified the prisoner. His name is Roga Danar. His criminal record is too long to go into, but I must caution you that he is given to bouts of uncontrollable violence.
I appreciate your warning, Prime Minister. We will keep you informed of our progress.
Geordi, how far and how fast can that transport ship travel?
Without warp drive, there's no way he could be out of our range by now.
We've been sweeping the area constantly, Commander. There's nothing within sensor range.
A cloaking device?
Sir, the Angosians have no cloaking technology.
Unless he's borrowing one. If he's hanging over the planet's pole, the magnetic field would confuse our sensors.
Commander, I believe I can recalibrate our sensors to read through the electromagnetic interference over the poles.
Let's try it. Mister Crusher, realign for polar orbit.
Aye, sir.
There he is, Commander. You were correct.
This guy knows all the tricks, doesn't he.
There are still no life form readings coming from the vessel.
Could it be the magnetic interference, Data?
I have compensated. Still no readings.
We'll have an answer shortly. Lock on tractor beam, Mister La Forge.
Tractor beam locking on, sir.
He is coming about, sir.
He's out of his mind!
Sensors detect a massive power build up in his aft thrusters.
On main viewer.
He's making a suicide run.
Shields have been automatically activated. Tractor beam disengaged.
He bounced off the shields.
That's an interesting twist.
Mister Crusher, fix coordinates onto that vessel. We'll just beam the whole thing to a shuttlebay if we have to.
I do not believe that will be necessary, Captain. He is no longer in the drive section.
What?
I anticipated that diversionary tactic based on his pattern to date. We are picking up a cylindrical object approximately seven metres in length and three metres in diameter.
On screen.
Magnify.
An escape pod.
This guy's incredible.
Yet there are still no life form readings.
Transporter room four, prepare to beam aboard from inside that shuttle anything large enough to be a humanoid adult.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Security team, report to transporter room four.
On our way, sir.
O'BRIEN:We're holding the contents in stasis pending arrival of security. An illicit weapon has been detected in the transport beam, sir.
O'BRIEN:It's been rendered inoperable.
Work, let's greet our guest.
Bring him in, Mister O'Brien.
Just stay where you are.
O'BRIEN:More security, transporter room four. More security! More security!
Get him to a detention cell. Set phasers on maximum stun.
O'BRIEN:Commander.
We'll need a few hours to get the containment field on Lunar Five operational before we pick him up. The damage he did during his escape was considerable.
We will await your signal.
I appreciate your patience. The prison psychologist recommends that you keep Danar fully sedated until he's ready for transport.
Well, he's in our highest security detention area. There shouldn't be any more problems.
Do not relax your security for an instant, Captain. He is extremely violent and very cunning, as you already know. I will send a transport vessel to pick him up as soon as possible. Nayrok out.
Have you run a diagnostic on the sensors, Data?
Yes, sir. There is nothing wrong with the ship's sensors. The reason we did not sense life signs aboard the escape vessel is because the prisoner has no life signs.
Computer, identify the occupant of the detention cell.
The detention cell is vacant at this time.
He's in there.
Could he be some kind of android?
Our sensors can identify artificial lifeforms, sir. Apparently, he is capable of deceiving the sensors.
Are you all right?
What is this ship?
You're on board the USS Enterprise.
A war vessel?
A Federation starship.
Federation!
We were orbiting Angosia when you escaped from Lunar Five.
It seems that I am a victim of my own bad timing. And you are the keeper of this jail?
I'm Deanna Troi, ship's Counsellor.
Counsellor? Too bad. I'd rather you were a jailer to keep me company during my return trip. I assume we are returning to Lunar Five.
That terrifies you.
I just killed three men to get out of there, Counsellor, and I'm fully capable of killing you as well. That's terrifying thought, isn't it? Even to me.
Do they mistreat you there?
Not at all. I am comfortable, well fed and housed. Oh no, the Angosians take good care of their prisoners. It's simply a matter of never being able to leave. What about you, Counsellor? Do you always visit the prisoners? Are you a specialist in criminal behaviour? Or am I just an interesting specimen that landed on your ship like an insect to be studied under your microscope?
Why do you have all this anger toward me?
A girl with long dark hair broke my heart a long time ago. Out of bitterness and resentment, I turned to crime. How about this one? My mother abandoned me when I was a little boy. I never got the guidance that a wild young man needed.
Why are you doing this?
Playing games? Isn't that what you do, Counsellor? Isn't that what all of you mind control experts do?
I am not a mind control expert. I came here because I sensed you were in pain.
And what do you sense now?
The pain is gone.
It's interesting, isn't it?
There's a duality in the man. It's hard to describe. He's aware of his crimes. In fact, they trouble him deeply.
Counsellor.
He's intelligent, thoughtful, typically Angosian. I know what he's done, but when I'm with him I cannot believe he is randomly and deliberately violent. in fact, inherently, he has a non-violent personality.
Counsellor, it took five men to restrain him and he took apart half of the Transporter Room in the process.
I'm not opening the door for him, Captain. I can only tell you that I sense something very unusual about him. Something that is not inherent to a criminal personality.
In a few hours, I'll be turning him over to the Angosians, and I'll be happy to do it.
I understand.
Data, do we have a link up to the Angosian central computer?
Yes, Counsellor. We are copying records for Federation inspection pursuant to their application for admittance.
Can I see a police record on Roga Danar?
There is no police record.
That's impossible. He's been in prison.
Lunar Five is a military prison facility.
Military? He's a soldier ?
That may provide an explanation for the tactics he was able to use against us when we tried to capture him.
It doesn't say here what he was arrested for. Call up his military record.
He served in many campaigns during the Tarsian War, received two promotions, to the rank of Subhadar. A very honourable tour of duty
What was this man's crime?
I've learned you are a soldier.
I was a soldier.
Why were you put in prison?
Obviously, because I am a threat to society.
There's no police record. What did you do?
Everything they asked me to do. That's why I became such a threat.
I don't understand.
Why are you bothering to try, Counsellor?
Because I want to help, if I can.
Unlock the door.
You are a non-violent man, yet you committed acts of excessive violence.
You can learn to do it if you have to.
Did you have to?
It was war.
So it started with the war?
It started the day I volunteered, Counsellor. The day I began training. The day I met my first instructor. And he also called himself a counsellor.
Roga Danar was an idealistic young man who answered his people's call to service. He joined the military to fight for the Angosian way of life. What he didn't realise was that by doing so he would have to give up that way of life for ever. He's not the same man who left home to go to war. He's been through intense psychological manipulation and biochemical modifications.
At Troi's request I examined him. His cell structure has been significantly altered. They used a combination of cryptobiolin, triclenidil, macrospentol and a few things I can't even recognise.
Was he a prisoner of war? Who did this to him?
His own government. He's been programmed to be the perfect soldier. He can be absolutely normal, but when a danger is perceived, the programming clicks in and takes over. Memory, strength, intelligence, reflexes, all become enhanced. He's conditioned to survive at any cost.
One of the new substances in his cellular structure even shields electrical impulses.
Perhaps that would explain why our sensors did not detect him.
Why was he assigned to the Lunar Five facility?
He committed no crime. He says he was ordered there with others like him. When the first soldiers returned to Angosia, they had trouble. The rules changed too quickly. A lost temper could result in murder.
Counsellor, did no one try to adjust their programming?
They were just exiled to Lunar Five.
Lunar Five, an orbiting gulag.
What do you want?
Am I disturbing you?
Yes.
Then I will leave.
NO. Wait, wait. I'd rather talk to someone. Why do you have yellow eyes?
I am an android. I believe you and I have something in common.
We do?
Yes. We have both been programmed.
Ah, yes, yes. You've been talking to Counsellor Troi. It is not at all the same, android.
I do not mean to belittle your condition. I understand your dilemma. But I am curious. My programme can be altered. Yours cannot?
The man I was is still inside me, but this conditioning has been imposed. Woven together with my thoughts and my feelings and my responses. How do you separate the programme from the man?
Without further analysis of your condition from Counsellor Troi or Doctor Crusher, I cannot say. But I believe it is possible.
Yeah, doctors! The Angosian doctors did this to me. If it could be undone, wouldn't they undo it?
I cannot answer that.
Nor can I, yet I ask myself that question every moment of every day.
Captain, what this man has been telling you is full of half-truths. He's a prisoner. What do you expect him to say about us?
Well, perhaps you would clarify it for me.
The soldiers were resettled on Lunar Five. It was to be their colony.
Was it a resettlement of their choosing?
It was for their own protection as well as that of others. Most of them were quite happy there. We went to great lengths to give them a fine quality of life.
Prime Minister, even the most comfortable prison is a prison.
Unfortunately, a few agitators like Danar forced us to add security.
My medical team suggests there may be alternative treatment.
Captain, I assure you that every alternative has been explored. And this discussion is now treading upon matters of internal security, which is not your concern. I have dispatched a ship to rendezvous with you to transport the prisoner back to Lunar Five. On behalf of Angosia, I thank the Federation for its assistance in retrieving our citizen.
Matter of internal security. The age-old cry of the oppressor.
Were you built for combat, android?
No. But my programme does include military strategy. That is how I was able to anticipate your final tactic and capture you.
You did that? Perhaps you would be better at combat than you think.
Except that I am not programmed to kill.
My improved reflexes have allowed me to kill eighty four times. And my improved memory lets me remember each of those eighty four faces. Can you understand how that feels?
I am incapable of any feeling.
Why, then I envy you.
Roga, this is Captain Picard.
Captain.
Mister Danar, I'm transferring you to Angosian security. They're en route. They will arrive shortly. I wanted to tell you I have no choice. The Prime Minister insisted and we have no right to refuse.
You would be foolish to consider it otherwise, Captain, for they are very correct. I am dangerous. There is no place for me in a civilised society.
I do not believe that.
Nor do I.
I respect my officers' judgements. I wish I could help further. If a way appears to me, I will.
I appreciate your telling me that face to face.
I thought you deserved that much.
And you deserve to know that I must use whatever means I can to escape.
Captain, the Angosian transport vessel has arrived.
Inform them the transfer will take place shortly. Picard out. Mister Data, to the Bridge please.
Take care of yourself, android. I enjoyed our talk.
I too.
Perhaps when this planet becomes a member of the Federation, we'll be able
I will not be there to see it, Counsellor. Because even with this overwhelming demand to survive that they've built into my soul, I would rather die than return to Lunar Five.
Captain Picard, we're ready to receive the prisoner. Now transmitting the coordinates of our holding cell.
Coordinates received, sir.
Stand by for transport. Picard out. Mister Worf, have all security precautions been taken?
Release of the force field and activation of the transporter will be virtually simultaneous. There will only be a point one second difference between them.
Even Danar can't move that fast.
There will be a full security contingent present.
Proceed.
O'BRIEN:Transporter room one to Lieutenant Worf. We're ready, sir.
O'BRIEN:Energising.
O'Brien, increase transporter power.
O'BRIEN:I'm losing him.
Roga, don't! You'll be killed!
O'BRIEN:What the hell?
Security personnel, full alert. Shut down all shuttlebays, transporters, and turbolifts.
Captain, a phaser is missing.
We must assume that he is armed.
Sound general quarters. Clear corridors of all non-essential personnel. I don't want him taking any hostages.
General quarters sounded, sir.
Raise security containment fields immediately on decks thirty four, thirty five, and thirty six.
Aye, sir.
Data, put the turbolifts back online. If Danar sees they're operating, he may try to use them. Soon as he does, we have him.
Sir, unauthorised access of turbolift five on deck thirty four.
He took the bait.
Data, override its destination. Divert that turbolift to a position near Lieutenant Worf's present location.
Four seconds to arrival, sir.
We're in position.
Phaser on overload! Seal this deck.
Captain, the overload has been averted.
Drop force field on deck thirty six.
Sir, containment field down on deck thirty six.
How the hell did he manage that?
He's headed for Engineering.
Riker to La Forge. Engineering, respond.
Engineering!. Engineering, come in! Geordi, are you okay?
Captain, someone in Engineering is attempting to override the security system lockout.
Riker to Worf, he's in Engineering.
Acknowledged, Commander. We're on our way.
Data, I want you to stall Danar. Allow him to think he's succeeding.
As he bypasses each subsystem, I can re-route it without his knowledge.
Make it so.
Danar is extremely adept, sir. I am not certain which security measure he is attempting to circumvent. Sir, Danar has succeeded in restoring power to shuttlebay two.
I have overridden Danar's bypass. Shuttlebay two is once again inactive.
Very good, Mister Data. Now we know where he's headed.
Geordi!
I'm all right. He took us by surprise. He came out of nowhere. I didn't think anyone could move that fast.
Lieutenant, I am reading an open panel. K twelve, J nine, deck thirty.
Acknowledged.
Danar must have climbed up the reactor core and got into a Jefferies tube. He could be anywhere.
We believe he is attempting to reach shuttlebay two.
That's twenty five decks up from here. Quite a climb, but I wouldn't put it past him.
There is a full contingent of security at all shuttlebays.
You want my advice? Double it!
Captain, reading another open access panel.
Security team to Jefferies tube J four, deck fifteen.
Security acknowledged.
Deck fifteen, a few decks below the shuttlebay.
Sir, I find it highly unlikely that Danar would be attempting to reach shuttlebay two.
Explain.
In our previous encounter, Danar employed a strategy of misdirection in an attempt to gain his objective.
And you believe he's using the same tactic now.
He is aware that our sensors are unable to track him, yet he seems to be purposely leaving a trail for us to follow.
Where do you think he's headed?
I am afraid his true destination remains a mystery. Readings now indicate an open access panel in Jeffries tube N eleven, deck thirty eight.
He's doubled back on us.
The cargo bays.
Advise all personnel on deck thirty eight to stay out of the cargo bays.
Status, Mister Data?
They appear to be empty, sir.
Good. I want you to flood them with anestazine.
Aye, sir.
Sensors show anestazine concentration seventy parts per million within the cargo bays.
That should have put our boy to sleep.
Return environmental conditions to normal, Mister Data. Move in your security teams, Mister Worf.
Acknowledged.
Worf to Bridge. We have found no sign of the intruder. But there is a missing pressure suit
From cargo bay three.
Pressure suit?
Could be he's planning to enter shuttlebay two from outside the Enterprise, bypassing the security guards.
Mister Worf, post security guards at all emergency airlocks on decks
Thirty seven through thirty nine.
Aye, sir. I'll also cover the photon torpedo launchers. Danar may attempt to leave the ship that way. Worf out.
Danar! You are cunning. You must have Klingon blood. But the battle is over.
My battle is never over.
Worf to Bridge. I have Danar.
Explosion in Jefferies tube section T nine five. All external sensors inoperative.
Go to backup systems.
Unable to transfer control, sir.
Sit down, gentlemen.
Worf to Bridge.
Go ahead.
Danar has escaped.
He used a phaser to power the cargo transporter. Coordinates indicate he beamed aboard the Angosian transport ship.
Data, can you verify that?
Negative, sir. All external sensors still nonfunctioning.
Then we have no way to track him.
That was his plan all along.
First Officer:First officer's log, supplemental. We are continuing to repair damage to the ship's sensors following the escape of the Angosian prisoner, Danar. He is still at large.
Engineering, I'm getting readings on Tactical. Are we back up?
That's affirmative, Commander.
Mister Worf, sweep the area.
Captain, the Prime Minister is hailing us. Priority one.
On screen.
Priority channel cleared.
Yes, Prime Minister?
Captain, I've just been informed that Roga Danar has attacked the penal colony on Lunar Five.
Attacked it ?
In our own police shuttle. Several of my people have been wounded. Hundreds of prisoners are rioting. Some of them have escaped with Danar and at last report are headed to the capital city. Captain, we are not suited to handle situations like this. That's what we created them for.
I'll send an away team, Prime Minister. Picard out. Counsellor Troi, Commander Data, Mister Worf, you will accompany me to the planet.
And my understanding is these men are programmed to survive. Is that correct?
Yes, Captain.
And that they will not kill unless their survival is at stake?
It is against their nature to do so, Captain.
Then let us hope they do not believe their survival is at stake.
Mister Worf, you are personally responsible for the Captain's safety.
I understand, Commander.
I don't expect them to listen to reason. I loathe the idea of a violent confrontation, but we must be prepared.
This is all you've brought? Where are your security men?
We're not here to fight your wars for you.
They have been seen moving toward the center of the city. People are scared. Don't you understand, Captain? They're dangerous.
You are dangerous. They're only victims. You made them what they are. You asked them to defend your way of life and then you discarded them.
They were not happy here.
They were not welcome here.
It was the will of the people to resettle them.
No one was pleased with the solution, but we had to act for the greater good.
Prime Minister, if you have the skills to create a master soldier, can you not contradict the effect?
The chemicals can be removed from their systems, but we're not convinced that the psychological conditioning can ever be entirely reversed.
Have you tried, sir?
We studied it thoroughly. Even before the training began, we knew there would be problems reversing it. It was a risk we had to take.
Did you reveal that risk to the men who volunteered for service?
We were helping them to survive the war, you understand? They needed these skills.
They're your brothers, your sons, and you turned your backs on them.
There are methods of treatment. Until you try them, how can you know they won't work? Even a partial recovery could give them some peace.
It was the will of the people.
To allow them to suffer?
There was a referendum. The people weighed the costs involved. They chose the resettlement solution.
Besides, we may need to use them again some day.
Have you understood one word that we've said?
Freeze! Nobody move!
No, Worf! All of you. Don't respond. Don't provoke them further. Keep those weapons down unless you wish to be killed.
Do as he says.
No! Don't. Shoot us. Destroy us. Do what you have to do. But you will not ignore us. Go on, do it!
Cowards.
Yes, and you are not programmed to murder cowards. So if they will not fight back, what will you do?
We will not go back.
You are programmed to survive. You can survive at the Lunar Five settlement.
To survive is not enough. To simply exist is not enough.
Roga, tell them what you want.
We want our lives back. We want to come home.
I am not prepared to negotiate under threat, Danar, but if you will put down your weapons and return peaceably to Lunar Five, I would be willing.
Mister Prime Minister, with all due respect, you will have to force us. Or at least try.
Captain, you must do something. Call your ship.
Quite right, Prime Minister. Enterprise, prepare to beam the away team back.
At your command, Captain.
Picard, you can't leave us like this.
I have all the information I need for our report. Your prisoner has been returned to you and you have a decision to make. Whether to try to force them back or welcome them home. In your own words, this is not our affair. We cannot interfere in the natural course of your society's development, and I'd say it's likely to develop significantly in the next several minutes. It's been an interesting visit. When you're ready for membership, the Federation will be pleased to reconsider your application. Mister Riker, four to beam up.
Aye, sir.
Success, Captain?
Number One, will you note in our report that if the government of Angosia survives the night, we will offer them Federation assistance in their efforts to reprogram their veterans.
And if the government doesn't survive?
I have a feeling they will choose to. Mister Crusher, set coordinates for Starbase Lya Three.
Coordinates set, Captain.
Engage.
Computer, lights. Computer, turn on the lights.
N'VEK:Good, you're awake.
Who are you?
N'VEK:Please, Counsellor, there is little time. The Commander will be calling for you at any moment.
Where am I?
N'VEK:You are aboard the Imperial Romulan Warbird Khazara. I am Subcommander N'Vek.
Warbird? I was at the neuropsychology seminar at Bokara Six. The last thing I remember was returning to my quarters. I was attacked. I felt a hypospray.
N'VEK:It was necessary. I could not be certain you would come voluntarily.
Oh, God. My head's still spinning.
N'VEK:There are drugs in your system, but they've nearly dissipated. The disorientation will soon pass.
Why have you brought me here?
N'VEK:Listen to me carefully. You are no longer Deanna Troi. You are Major Rakal of the Tal Shiar, the Imperial Intelligence. Commander Toreth
Am I a prisoner?
N'VEK:There is no time to explain everything. You must listen. Commander Toreth will want to know your mission. Tell her nothing. Simply instruct her to proceed to the Kaleb sector, heading one oh two mark four.
The Kaleb sector?
N'VEK:Repeat it. Heading one oh two mark four.
Heading one oh two mark four. And she'll take orders from me?
N'VEK:You are an officer of the Tal Shiar. She will obey you. But do not push her too far.
Sub Commander N'Vek. We are approaching the loading point. Bring our guest to the Bridge.
N'VEK:Yes, Commander. Immediately. Please, we must hurry.
I'm not going anywhere until you tell me what's going on.
N'VEK:You are a Starfleet officer disguised as a Romulan. Unless you trust me and do exactly as I have said, Toreth will discover you and you will be killed.
How do I know I won't be killed anyway?
N'VEK:Your only chance to get off this ship alive is to do as I say. You are an empath. You would know if I am lying. Am I?
No.
N'VEK:Then let us go see the Commander.
Orbit established, Commander.
Commence loading the cargo. Notify me when the transfer is complete.
Yes, sir.
N'VEK:Commander, may I present Major Rakal of the Tal Shiar? This is Commander Toreth.
Attend to your station. Why are you here without your guards? Well?
The mission is one of utmost secrecy. I could not risk bringing guards.
And exactly what is the nature of this clandestine assignment?
I cannot reveal that.
Oh? Why not?
I am under orders.
You don't act like a member of the Tal Shiar. How long have you been with Intelligence?
Several months.
Ah.
Commander, cargo is on board and secure.
Tell me, is there a reason why the Commander of a ship is being kept ignorant of its cargo?
I don't know what you mean.
I have been ordered to take on cargo but its contents are unknown to me. Does that seem wise? I am responsible for the safety of this ship and its crew. How do I know this cargo is safe to transport?
I'm sure it is safe, otherwise it would not have been loaded.
Ah. The Tal Shiar is deeply concerned for the safety and well-being of the military. I'm sure that every person on the Bridge of this ship could offer testimony about personal experiences with the Tal Shiar, but I doubt that many could recall those encounters as tender and caring. So I must ask you to forgive me, Major, if I hesitate to accept your assurances that that cargo presents no danger to my crew. I intend to open those containers.
That cargo is the property of the Tal Shiar. You will not touch it.
On whose authority?
Mine. And if you do not wish to undergo another personal experience with the Tal Shiar, I suggest you not question me again. Now, proceed on course bearing one oh two mark four to the Kaleb sector.
Why should we go to the Kaleb sector? It's virtually deserted.
Because those are your orders.
Pilot, set course. Bearing one oh two mark four. Warp six.
Yes, Commander.
Captain's log, stardate 46519.1. We have arrived at Research Station seventy five to take on a rather unique passenger, one whose homecoming will undoubtedly be difficult.
The man acted dishonourably. He is a traitor.
He risked his life to get here. He spent two weeks alone in a scout ship.
That does not excuse his original actions.
Well, maybe he finally realised he made a mistake.
It's twenty years too late. Energise.
Ensign DeSeve, by order of Starfleet Command I am placing you under arrest for treason.
I understand.
After Doctor Crusher declares you medically fit, you will be confined to your quarters until a court martial can be convened. Find some civilian clothes. I don't want to see you in that uniform.
Yes, sir. Commander, I must speak with Captain Picard.
He's a busy man.
Please, it's important. Urgent.
I'll tell him.
Commander.
At ease. It's Captain, actually.
Of course. I'm sorry, sir.
You said it was important that I see you.
Yes, Captain. I have a message from Ambassador Spock. He said it involves further cowboy diplomacy. He said you would understand. There's a Corvallen freighter arriving in the Kaleb sector in the next twelve hours. Spock wants you to rendezvous with that ship, bring its cargo back to Federation space.
What kind of cargo?
He said it was important to the future of the Romulans and the Federation.
You have returned in order to give me this message?
Partly.
In order to know whether Ambassador Spock's message is being delivered accurately, I need to understand something about the messenger.
I was ready to come back. Romulus had lost its appeal.
Yet at one time you found something very appealing about it.
The Romulans are very moral, Captain. They have an absolute certainty about what is right and what is wrong, who is a friend and who is an enemy, a strict moral compass which provides them with a clarity of purpose. At one time I found their sense of purpose, their passion and commitment, to be very compelling.
But not any more?
As I've grown older, I realise that clarity of purpose is a more ambiguous matter than I had thought in my youth.
Commander Riker, set course for the Kaleb sector, warp factor eight.
Aye-aye, sir.
You may wait outside. Make certain we're not disturbed.
They're terrified of me.
N'VEK:The purpose of the Tal Shiar is to ensure loyalty. To defy them is to invite imprisonment or death.
I think it's time you told me what this is all about.
N'VEK:That is why I called you here. These are the cargo containers we brought on board earlier.
What's in it?
He's alive. In stasis. Who is it?
N'VEK:Vice Proconsul M'ret of the Imperial Senate and his two top aides.
M'ret? He's one of the highest ranking members of the Romulan government.
N'VEK:His defection will be a profound blow to Romulus.
Why is he doing this?
N'VEK:M'ret had questioned the repressive activities of the government and was in danger of being imprisoned. He is willing to take this risk in order to protest Romulan policy and support the dissident movement.
You're part of Ambassador Spock's underground movement.
N'VEK:Yes. If we are able to deliver M'ret safely, Spock is hopeful that we can establish an escape route for the thousands of dissidents who live in fear of their lives. Now you realise why we are willing to go to such extraordinary lengths, even kidnapping you, to make sure we succeed.
You've given me the identity of a Tal Shiar officer. Is there a real Major Rakal?
N'VEK:There was. She was killed so that you could take her place. Only a member of the Tal Shiar would have the authority to alter a ship's mission.
Why me? You could have found a Romulan to play this role.
N'VEK:Yes, for the first part of the plan. But if anything goes wrong we will need a Starfleet officer.
Why?
N'VEK:There's no need to go into that unless it becomes necessary. For your own sake, Counsellor, the less you know about the specifics of this plan, the better.
What is your plan?
N'VEK:When we reach the Kaleb sector, we will rendezvous with a Corvallen freighter. You will take these containers into their ship and accompany them back to Starfleet Headquarters.
The Corvallens are mercenaries. Do they know what's in these containers?
N'VEK:No. They were hired simply to take you to Federation space.
Very well.
N'VEK:We are due in the ward room shortly. The senior officers always dine together.
I'll go to my quarters. I think it would be best if I stayed out of the way of the Commander.
N'VEK:No, you will be expected to attend. I'll go ahead. Follow me after a few moments. Commander Toreth must not feel that anything is unusual.
We'd been told that the Klingon outpost was undefended. So when their warships decloaked, they took us completely by surprise.
The Klingons managed to destroyed half my squadron before we even opened fire. But when we did, ha! they were no match for us. I destroyed their flagship myself. I received the Sotaric Citation for my actions that day. The Intelligence Officer in charge of that mission was executed. Major. Welcome to our table.
Commander.
I suggest you try the viinerine. It's quite good.
I realise that it's nothing compared to what you're accustomed to on Romulus, but you could at least try the viinerine.
I've smelled better viinerine on prison ships.
No doubt. Tell me, Major, where did you train? The Intelligence Academy or the Imperial War College?
The Academy.
Oh? So you must know Commander Konsab.
I know of him.
I assume you studied Military History with him?
Yes.
Tell me, Major, what do you think about his theories on the differences between the military and the Tal Shiar?
Which aspects are you referring to?
Come now, Major. Surely you attended his classes regularly? It was Konsab's main theme.
Do you have a point to make, Commander? If so, it has escaped me.
Commander Konsab believes that in order to function, military officers have to trust each other. The Tal Shiar, on the other hand, trust no one. They expect deception, so they always find it.
Your opinion of the Tal Shiar quite clear, Commander.
I hope so.
We ensure the loyalty of the people. Do you believe the Empire would be better off without our protection?
Protection? From what? How was the Empire threatened by the words of an old man, a devoted citizen who merely tried to speak his mind? How did the Tal Shiar protect the Empire by dragging him, my father, out of his home in the middle of the night?
Clearly, your father was a traitor.
No. He was just an idealistic old man. I never saw him again.
I don't need your devotion, Commander. Just your obedience.
And that's all you have.
Commander, sensors are picking up an unidentified ship on an intercept course.
What is the configuration?
It appears to be a freighter, Commander.
Hail them.
Visual.
Commander. We are glad to see you. We are prepared to transfer your cargo as agreed.
With whom do you have this agreement?
Our arrangements were made with Major Rakal. You may rest assured your cargo will be taken safely to its destination. We will transmit coordinates for you to beam it aboard.
He's lying. They have no intention of keeping their word.
N'VEK:Are you certain?
Yes.
Why did you destroy that vessel?
N'VEK:I beg forgiveness, Commander, but Major Rakal ordered me to fire.
The Corvallen freighter has been completely destroyed, Commander. There are no survivors.
I demand an explanation.
How many people were on that ship?
Approximately eighteen people, sir.
I don't care if there were eighteen or eight hundred. On this ship, I give the command to fire, Major. You have no right.
This gives me the right.
Even you, eventually, will have to answer to someone. You will be held accountable.
I have been given broad discretionary powers. Subcommander N'Vek acted under my authority, the authority of the Tal Shiar. I assure you this action will not be questioned.
I will nonetheless make an entry in my log that I am not responsible for those eighteen lives and that I deplore their loss.
Do what you feel is necessary. In the meantime, we must protect ourselves. Engage the cloaking device.
And what are my orders now, Major?
Hold position and wait.
There is no sign of the freighter, sir. We are the only ship in the area.
Ensign, verify our position.
We're holding at the coordinates specified by Ensign DeSeve, sir.
Anything on long range sensors?
Sensors indicate no other ships within three light years.
Could this have been a hoax?
It's one possibility. Mister Worf, bring Ensign DeSeve to my Ready room.
Aye, sir.
Ensign DeSeve, you promised me a freighter with an important cargo. The only thing here is empty space. Do you have an explanation?
I don't understand.
Captain, he has deceived us.
No. I was told the ship would be at these coordinates.
You said that the message came directly from Ambassador Spock.
Yes. Well, not exactly.
What does that mean?
Someone else relayed the message to me, but he said Spock spoke directly to him. I trust the man who spoke to me. He would not have lied.
Was he a Romulan?
Yes. He's a member of the underground a dissident. He risks his life to work with those who want a different future for Romulus.
Captain, he could be leading us into a trap.
No, that is not so.
It would be risky to set a trap here, so close to Federation space. But the fact remains, here we are, there is no freighter. Did your contact tell you anything else that might be helpful?
The freighter is an old Antares class vessel with limited speed and range. It couldn't have taken on its cargo more than a day ago which means it must be within fifteen light years of here.
Why didn't you mention this earlier?
It didn't seem necessary. And on Romulus you learn not to volunteer information. It's a hard habit to break.
Well, maybe now would be a good time to start. Follow me, gentlemen.
N'VEK:Our plan has collapsed.
Our plan? What about the people on that freighter? Why did you fire?
N'VEK:There was no alternative. You told me they couldn't be trusted. If I let them live the whole mission would be in jeopardy.
Eighteen people lost their lives.
N'VEK:Don't lecture me, Counsellor. A number of people have died in order to carry out this mission. Believe me, those eighteen won't be the last.
I'm sorry but I can't dismiss those lives so easily.
N'VEK:Fine. Agonise all you want, but don't let it get in the way of our plan.
You don't have a plan anymore.
N'VEK:You remember I told you if anything went wrong, we would need a Starfleet officer. There is a Starfleet base on Draken Four. It is two days away at maximum warp. That's where we're going.
In a Romulan ship?
N'VEK:Yes. It's your job to order Toreth to proceed into Federation territory.
We'll never get through the gravitic sensor nets.
N'VEK:We will, if you provide the correct access codes.
Do you really think this has a chance of succeeding?
N'VEK:If you have another idea, I'll be happy to consider it.
You will plot a course for the Draken System.
You can't be serious.
Draken Four was the freighter's destination. I ordered the freighter destroyed because I recognised the Captain, a known Federation spy. Now we must deliver the cargo ourselves.
We must?
I do not intend to explain myself to you. You will set a course.
In order to reach Draken, we will have to travel through Federation space for nearly twenty hours.
That is not a problem.
Contrary to the propaganda that your superiors would have us believe, Starfleet is neither weak nor foolish. The chances of us reaching Draken undetected are not good.
We will be cloaked.
The cloaking device does not always make us invulnerable, and you would know that if you had spent any time at all in the field. The Federation has littered it's borders with subspace listening posts, with gravitic sensors. They may even have a tachyon detection grid in operation, in which case they will know that we're there. If we are discovered in Federation territory, it will be interpreted as an act of war.
The Tal Shiar has obtained access codes for the sensor nets. I will provide them if necessary.
That will be no guarantee that we will escape undetected.
Your cowardice does not befit a Romulan soldier.
People blame the military for the wars that we are asked to fight, but I think it is your kind, Major, that will be the death of us all.
Plot a course for the Draken System.
Course plotted, sir.
Prepare for warp.
Commander, sensors are picking up a vessel. Our cloaking device is still engaged. They have not detected us.
Activate viewscreen. Enlarge.
It is the Enterprise, Commander.
Well, Major, it appears your suspicions about that freighter were correct after all. The Federation has come in search of its spies. Status.
They are scanning the debris of the freighter. Shield levels are normal. Weapon systems are not active. They are not prepared for battle, sir.
They weren't expecting to find us here, and I see no reason to alter that perception. The radiation from the debris field could make our cloak detectable if we engage warp engines. Proceed at manoeuvring speed.
One moment, Commander. We should hold our position until the Enterprise has left the area. We cannot risk detection.
Even if we are detected, they cannot track us once we go to warp.
We have not established their intentions.
Their intentions are obvious, Major, and are of no concern to us. Proceed on course, manoeuvring engines only. Go to warp when we're clear of the debris field.
Yes, Commander. We should clear the field in twenty seven minutes.
You will keep me informed of our progress.
N'VEK:It is not wise to challenge the Tal Shiar, Commander.
I will not let her tell me how to run my ship.
It appears to be the remains of a ship. My analysis indicates that it was an Antares class freighter.
That's the ship we were supposed to meet.
Could there have had some sort of malfunction? A reactor core breach?
I do not believe so, sir. That would not be consistent with the debris pattern. However, sensors indicate extremely high levels of residual antiprotons.
Romulan disruptor fire.
Correct. Based on the antiproton decay, I would estimate the incident occurred within the last four point three hours.
Then the Romulans could still be in the vicinity.
Red alert. Shields at maximum.
Whatever that freighter was carrying, they certainly didn't want it to reach us. Are you sure you don't know what it was?
No, sir. I swear it.
All we have here are questions. Mister Data, continue with your scan.
We have to get a message to the Enterprise.
N'VEK:That's impossible.
It's the perfect opportunity. The Enterprise is nearby. If we can communicate with them, they might be able to help us.
N'VEK:Counsellor, this ship is travelling under cloak. All of our electromagnetic emissions are being monitored. Any attempt at communication whatsoever and we would be discovered instantly. It could not succeed. We must continue to Draken Four. That is the safest course.
Is there anything you can do to the ship or to the cloaking device that would let the Enterprise track us?
N'VEK:Track us? No. We want to get into Federation territory undetected.
What we want is to get the dissidents to safety. Now answer the question. Is there a way?
N'VEK:If there were, I wouldn't do it.
Yes, you will.
N'VEK:Counsellor.
We're not playing it your way any more, N'Vek. I've been kidnapped, surgically altered, put in danger I've gone along with all your plans. Now you are going to listen to me. You find a way to let the Enterprise track us, or I will go to Toreth and tell her I've discovered you're a traitor. I'll order you ejected into space. Is that clear, Subcommander?
N'VEK:There is one possibility. In order for a ship to remain undetectable while cloaked, the radiative emissions from the warp engines must be precisely balanced. The ship's Engineer is a sympathiser. He may be able to slightly misalign one of the nullifier cores. It would create a small magnetic disturbance in space whenever we were in motion.
Good. Do it.
N'VEK:The effect would only be intermittently. They might not even detect it.
If it's the best we can do, we have to try it.
N'VEK:Anything more would be immediately registered on the Bridge. Even this slight misalignment may be detected.
It's a risk we have to take. You're the one who outlined the stakes to me, N'Vek. Are you getting squeamish now, just because things are getting a little more dangerous?
Sensors are picking up a polarised magnetic distortion to our port side.
Analysis.
The distortion is extremely weak, sir. It appears to be moving slowly. It is gone, sir.
Gone?
The distortion no longer registers on our instruments.
Could this distortion be caused by a cloaked ship?
Unknown, sir. Our understanding of Romulan technology is still limited.
Captain, Romulan ships use a forced quantum singularity as a power source. If that system is not functioning perfectly or is damaged even slightly, it might show through the cloak as a magnetic disturbance of some kind.
The distortion has reappeared, sir, bearing three three seven mark ten. It has disappeared again, sir.
Mister DeSeve, in your opinion is it possible that we're picking up a cloaked Romulan ship?
It's a strong possibility, sir.
Mister Data, continue your scan. Ensign, link navigational control to Mister Data's console and plot a course for that distortion.
Commander, the Enterprise is underway.
Good. What is their course?
They're heading for us, sir.
What?
They appear to be on an intercept course.
What is the status of our cloaking device? Is there a malfunction of any kind?
Cloaking device functioning correctly, sir. All shipboard emissions within normal range.
Maintain full sensor scans.
N'VEK:Commander. The Enterprise may simply be engaged in search operations.
Perhaps.
Where is it now, Mister Data?
It has disappeared once again, sir. I believe it may have been coming to a halt.
Stop engines.
Aye, sir.
If this is a Romulan ship, will it stay in position until we leave?
I don't think so, sir. A Romulan Commander's instinct would be to attack.
Engage manoeuvring engines, forward zero point one. Take us directly under their hull.
Yes, Commander.
What are you doing?
It seems that the Enterprise can track us even though we are cloaked. I intend to find out whether they can or cannot. N'Vek, ready attack procedure.
N'VEK:Sir, disruptors are standing by. Ready to disengage cloak.
We cannot risk an engagement here.
Considering the nature of our mission, I would have preferred to have avoided it as well. But I see no other alternative.
What do you intend to do?
We will pass as close as we possibly can. If they do have the ability to track us, they will move to avoid a collision. If they do, I will destroy them.
Sir, the magnetic distortion has reappeared.
Bearing and speed?
It appears to be moving toward us, closing slowly. Its bearing indicates a possible collision course.
Time to impact?
I am unable to make a precise measurement. However I would estimate impact within ninety seconds.
It doesn't make any sense. Why would they run into us? And if they were, why wouldn't they do it at full speed?
I don't know, sir. The Romulans will sometimes make suicide attacks, but only as a last resort. There's no reason for it here.
Time to impact approximately sixty seconds.
We don't have the luxury to speculate. Back us away from the distortion, Ensign. One half impulse.
Aye, sir.
They are moving away, Commander.
Prepare attack sequence.
N'VEK:All sections report ready for battle, Commander.
Disruptors fully charged.
Disengage cloak on my command. Prepare to fire.
Disregard that order.
What?
I do not authorise this attack. You will cease battle operations immediately.
I do not need your authorisation to attack, Major. This is my ship.
How typical of the military to resort to brute force when discretion is required.
The Enterprise has demonstrated that they can track us. They must be destroyed.
Yes, they can track us. So if we attack them, they will return fire. And since we have no shields when we're cloaked, they will destroy us.
Are you questioning my ability to command?
You are not fit to command. Step down. Step down or I will have you removed.
Do you think anyone here will listen to you?
If any one of you defies the Tal Shiar, you will not bear the punishment alone. Your families, all of them, will be there beside you. I am now Commander of this ship. You will take orders from me and no one else. Remove Commander Toreth from her station. If she resists, shoot her.
N'VEK:Commander, please, step down.
Remove her weapon.
Now, Commander. Watch and learn. In order to defeat your enemy, you must first understand them. The Federation wishes to avoid war at all cost. So I shall offer them a diplomatic solution, get them to lower their shields and then destroy them.
Captain, we are being hailed.
On screen.
I am Major Rakal of the Tal Shiar.
I am Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise.
How can we be of help?
A Corvallen freighter has been destroyed not far from here. We have detected the residual effects of disruptor fire. Can you shed any light on this?
A regrettable incident, Captain. The freighter was fired upon by the former Commander of this vessel. I have now taken control, and I assure you there will be no more attacks.
Still, there was a considerable loss of life.
Captain, we do not want to exaggerate this incident. You and I can discuss it calmly. We can diffuse it before it becomes inflated.
I agree.
I will come onto your ship. Please, lower your shields and prepare to beam me aboard.
Very well. Mister Worf, lock onto Major Rakal. Transport on my command.
Aye, sir.
Thank you.
What's she doing on that ship?
I don't know, Number One, but she needs our help to get back. Mister Worf, keep your lock on her no matter what happens.
Yes, sir.
Lower shields.
N'VEK:Their shields are dropping.
Activate forward disruptor array. Fire when ready.
N'VEK:Yes, Major. Firing.
Captain, they have fired on us.
Shields up. Stand by phasers. Damage report.
We sustained a direct hit, but the damage was negligible. The disruptor had almost no power.
This is Proconsul M'ret and his aides. They're part of the underground movement.
They're in stasis. Medical team to the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
Where's Deanna?
Disruptors were ineffective. The Enterprise was not damaged. They have re-established full shields.
N'VEK:I am reading a malfunction in our forward disruptor array. The power system has destabilised.
You're lying. The disruptor beam has been purposely sabotaged to conceal a transporter beam within. Quickly, Pilot, locate transport coordinates. What have you done?
The transporter beam originated in our cargo bay. Something was transported from there to the Enterprise.
So, Major, the mysterious cargo, brought on board by Major Rakal of the Tal Shiar, has been transported to the Starfleet vessel. I see two traitors in our midst.
So, Major, now that you can no longer take refuge behind the shield of the Tal Shiar, it's time to answer a few questions. What was in those cargo containers? Well, no matter. We will soon know all we need to know, and then we will execute you. Pilot, drop shields and cloak the ship. Prepare to go to warp.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, now.
Counsellor are you all right?
Yes.
Let's get you to Sickbay.
Ensign, get us out of here. Warp nine.
Aye, sir.
That about does it. How does it feel to have your own face back?
Just right. Thank you.
The men you helped rescue are safe. Proconsul M'ret is deeply grateful for your help.
The thanks should go to N'Vek. He sacrificed himself to save them, and me.
Thanks to the two of you, the way has been paved for further rescue operations. N'Vek's efforts, and his sacrifice, were not in vain.
Well Mister Potts, why don't we start at the beginning?
We were at the arcade, sir. I brought this balloon with me, filled with red pillion dye. You see, Willie is always making fun of me. I figured I'd get him back.
Hey, hey, slow down.
We programmed the game for an ordinary laser duel. You know, twenty one points. Four points for a
I'm familiar with the game. Go on.
We went out to the forest behind the east arcade. I told Willie that his laser pistol looked kind of funny, almost like a real one. When I went behind the trees, I put the balloon into my vest, and then
So you made your nine year old brother believe that he'd killed you?
Yes, sir.
And then he ran away?
Yes, sir.
And while he was hiding he ate the fruit of a cove palm.
It was just a joke, sir. I didn't think this was going to happen.
Are you aware of the infectious nature of the parasites which inhabit cove palm?
I am, I am now, sir.
Are you also familiar with the terms I agreed to keep you boys on the Enterprise when your parents went on sabbatical?
That we'd stay out of trouble, sir.
Mister Data?
On my way, sir.
Think about it, Mister Potts. And while you're at it, think about what may have happened had we not been this close to a starbase medical facility.
Were you able to contact the boy's parents?
They've been made fully aware of the situation, sir.
Good. Escort this young man to the quarantine anteroom. Perhaps he could assist us in lifting his brother's spirits.
Aye, sir.
He really could die.
Fortunately we are only two days from Starbase four one six, and their laboratory can isolate
Can isolate what, sir?
Their laboratory can isolate what, Commander? Sir, sir, I know I made a mistake, and I can tell you're angry, but if you're not going to talk to me
Back so soon, Mister Data?
La Forge to Bridge.
Go ahead, Commander.
Captain, we've completed our dilithium vector calibrations. We are currently at warp four point five. You're clear to increase to warp seven.
Very good, Geordi. Let me know if you
Captain, did you request a course correction?
I didn't say we could increase speed to warp nine point one, sir.
New course set for heading three four one mark two two one.
Course set by whom?
Not by me, Commander.
What's going on?
Data, who programmed the new coordinates?
Warp nine point three, Commander.
I don't advise this, Captain.
If we're going to maintain our realignment progressions we shouldn't be pushing warp eight for at least an hour.
Commander.
Evacuate Bridge. Deck one life support failure in thirty seconds.
Turbolifts two, three, four, everyone.
Transfer helm to Engineering, Geordi.
Aye, sir.
La Forge, let's get a diagnostic sweep underway.
Evacuate Bridge. Deck one life support failure in twenty seconds.
Reassemble in Engineering.
Evacuate Bridge. Deck one life support failure in ten seconds.
Deck one life support has been terminated.
Our velocity is holding steady at warp nine point three. Do you wish to override, Commander?
No, not yet. Computer, isolate cause of life support failure.
Atmosphere conditioning pumps on deck one are operating in negative mode.
How could that be? There are seven independent safety interlocks to prevent that.
Captain, I believe we've found the problem, but it really doesn't make sense.
Bring the Enterprise to a full stop, Commander.
Aye, sir. Full stop, Ensign.
It's not responding, sir.
I'm going to have to do this at the manual input level, sir. Wes.
We're still at the altered heading, Captain, holding at warp nine point three.
Captain. Force fields have been established on all main Bridge turbolift doors and service crawlways.
Computer, locate Lieutenant Commander Data.
Commander Data is on the main Bridge.
What the hell is he up to?
Number One, take a security team up to deck two. Try and break through from below. Commander?
Everything's locked up, Captain. We have no control of impulse or warp engines from here.
Navigation's not responding either, sir.
Picard to main bridge.
Commander Data, do you hear me? I repeat. Data, do you hear
Computer. Recognise Data, Lieutenant Commander. Alpha One clearance.
Priority clearance recognition Alpha One.
Maintain minimum auxiliary power and disengage subspace communications.
Acknowledged.
He is on the Bridge, sir.
Mister La Forge, prepare for saucer separation.
Sir, we're at Warp nine three.
I am aware of the risks, Ensign. When the umbilical splits, we should regain primary control, do you agree?
Yes, sir.
The saucer module should fall out of warp in two minutes. Be prepared to sweep back. Pull it in with a tractor beam.
Aye, sir.
Initiate auto sequence.
Computer, recognise Picard, Jean-Luc. Alpha Two clearance.
Priority clearance recognition, Alpha Two.
Cancel separation sequence.
Sequence cancelled.
Isolate all remaining command functions and accept related orders and inquiries from main Bridge only.
The separation sequence has been aborted, Captain.
Computer, recognise Jean-Luc Picard, Alpha Two priority, and re-establish separation procedure immediately.
Orders regarding command functions are no longer accepted from your present location.
And just what location are they accepted from?
Interface terminals on main Bridge only.
You're the only one who has clearance to localise command functions.
It seems Commander Data has it them as well.
The isolinear subprocessor extends three point five metres.
I've got a clear path to panel J14 baker. What's that going to do for us?
J14 baker backs onto science station two, Commander.
Have they reinverted the environmental control sequencer?
Yes, sir. Life support has been re-established.
Then you and Casey get up here. Let's get to it.
Computer, configure a perimeter field charge, sections Nine K through Twelve T.
What the hell was that?
He's activated a force field, sir.
Great. Just great.
Chief O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:Yes, Captain.
We had better disable the site to site transport function.
When we get wherever we're going, I don't want Mister Data beaming off the Bridge.
O'BRIEN:I'll get right to it, sir.
Doctor Crusher.
Yes, Captain.
Is your quarantine intact?
So far, sickbay force fields don't seem to have been affected.
The boy?
He's alright. But he's not going to stay alright. Sir, we have to get this ship to a starbase medical facility.
It seems, Doctor
That Data has other plans for the Enterprise right now.
Oh, Come on, I can't believe that. Everybody's played a practical joke on somebody at one time or another.
Not me.
Not even a little one? How about April Fools? I can't believe that you're telling me that you've never tried to pull something even on April Fools' Day?
What for? It's never funny to the one getting fooled.
Well, I'm sure your brother didn't intend for it too get out this of hand. Certainly not to the degree it has. Take a deep breath.
What's so funny about making someone think you killed them?
Take a deep breath. Have you been drinking all the water I asked you to?
Yes.
Well, keep it up. There might have a short delay in reaching starbase and I want
There, you see? How can I tell him if he's not going to listen to me?
Why don't you try, Jake?
It's just a waste of time. He won't listen.
Computer, prepare to transport me directly to the following coordinates.
Site to site transport interlocks have been manually deactivated.
Can you override?
Negative.
Show me the shortest route to Transporter room one. Computer, prepare to activate cascade force field sequence in the following progression.
No matter what we try, the computer will only accept commands from the Bridge, sir.
He has blocked every subspace channel, sir. We cannot even call for help.
Have you tried tracing back navigation inputs?
We don't even know what star system we're in, sir.
The only way we knew we'd come out of warp was by looking out a window.
O'BRIEN:O'Brien to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Chief.
O'BRIEN:Captain, he's up to something.
What now?
O'BRIEN:He discovered the site to site lockout. I wouldn't be surprised if he
O'BRIEN:Tried to make it to a transporter room now.
Mister Worf, I want security teams along the main passageways and in every transporter room. And see if the computer would be good enough to give you the precise stun setting to disable Mister Data.
Yes, sir.
Computer, estimate the time from this location to Starbase four one six at warp nine.
Inquiries regarding command functions are no longer accepted from your present location.
Computer, establish a security code for access to all functions previously transferred to Bridge.
Enter code.
One seven three four six seven three two one four seven six Charlie three two seven eight nine seven seven seven six four three Tango seven three two Victor seven three one one seven eight eight eight seven three two four seven six seven eight nine seven six four three seven six. Lock.
Security code intact for all specified inquiries and orders.
Computer, initiate cascade sequence, accepting instructions from Commander Data en route.  Now.
He's out! Security team approaching location.
Intersection eight J, aft port. Establish.
I order you to stop.
Computer, begin scan phase.
No, no, that's too close.
This has gone far enough, Data.
Computer, three metre cross seal.
O'BRIEN:I wouldn't advise that, sir. The phase coils don't take well to ricochets.
What's he doing?
O'BRIEN:He's reactivating the site to site transport interlocks.
Does that mean he'll be able to
You're right on time.
Open. One of these. And one of these. There you are.
I fail to recall how I arrived here.
I sent for you. In a manner of speaking.
And who are you, sir? Data to Enterprise. Enterprise, do you read me?
I always loved that face. Please sit down.
We were heading for a medical facility. I was taking the boy's brother to Sickbay and
I'm sure your starship will be back for you soon. Please, sit down.
I must find a way to contact the Enterprise.
Tell me, do I look somewhat familiar to you?
You do bear a resemblance to Doctor Noonian Soong, the cyberneticist who constructed me. But, Doctor Soong was killed shortly afterward by the Crystalline Entity.
There we are. It's your lucky day, Data. You've found your long lost father, and he's alive. What do you think of that?
But the colony was destroyed. There were no survivors.
I've never felt too comfortable living anywhere without a prearranged route of escape. I admit, I wouldn't have guessed I'd be running from a giant snowflake, but
It is really you.
Captain, the quarantine field in Sickbay.
You have access to it?
When he transferred force field control to the Bridge, he must have only specified fields he was planning to initiate. The quarantine field was already operating.
Under normal circumstances, we could divert that field energy and use it to cancel the force field protecting the Bridge, but we have to retain the medical quarantine.
Determine the absolute minimum field energy Doctor Crusher needs and use the rest to get me onto my Bridge.
How are you this morning?
Not so great. I'm having trouble standing up. I get sort of dizzy.
You heard the old story about the man who goes to his doctor? He says, Doctor, it hurts when I raise my arm like this. The Doctor says, then don't raise your arm like that.
So, if I get dizzy standing up
Then don't stand up.
Okay Doc, we're ready. If all goes well, you shouldn't notice a thing.
Make sure it goes well, Commander.
Your brother tells me that you still won't speak to him.
So?
It's very hard on him, too. He feels very guilty about what happened. He's your brother.
Why is everybody so worried about him? I'm the one who's sick. I'm the one who's going to die.
Hey, nobody is going to die, Willie. Do you hear me? Nobody!
Captain, we are in.
We're on our way, Lieutenant.
Computer, restore tactical station.
Deactivation of command function overrides requires Alpha Two clearance.
Beverly thinks its going to be tight. Let's hope he didn't take us too far off course.
Let's hope.
It won't answer to my clearance, sir.
Computer, this is Captain Picard. Return all command functions to the stations.
Alpha Two clearance recognised. Please enter security code.
Security code?
Data! I was afraid of something like this.
Sensors are operative.
Well, at least that's something. What have you got?
No fix on Data, but I am picking up a single life form on the surface, sir. It appears human.
That's a human that has the answers to a lot of questions.
Something else.
What is it?
A small vessel, entering orbit. I detect no lifeforms aboard, sir.
Good. Good, good, good. Keep it up. Keep it up. Old Tom Handy swore you'd never master that. Data, Data, whistle for me.
Oh, well. All right, that's enough. Sit down.  Beautiful, beautiful. You know, I've been able to keep track of you from time to time. You've become something of a celebrity in cybernetic circles. Data, why Starfleet?
Sir?
I gave you the ability to choose whatever you wanted. To do whatever you wanted. Why Starfleet?
It was Starfleet officers who rescued me.
Ah. So you decided to emulate your emancipators, huh? How disappointing.
What choice of vocation would have met with your approval, sir?
Well, I often hoped you might become a scientist. Perhaps even a cyberneticist.
To follow in your footsteps, as it were?
I see nothing wrong with that.
May I ask you a question, sir?
Certainly. Anything you like.
Why did you create me?
Why does a painter paint? Why does a boxer box? You know what Michelangelo used to say? That the sculptures he made were already there before he started, hidden in the marble. All he needed to do was remove the unneeded bits. It wasn't quite that easy with you, Data. But the need to do it, my need to do it, was no different than Michelangelo's need. Now let me ask you a question. Why are humans so fascinated by old things?
Old things?
Old buildings, churches, walls, ancient things, antique things, tables, clocks, knick knacks. Why? Why, why?
There are many possible explanations.
If you brought a Noophian to Earth, he'd probably look around and say, tear that old village down, it's hanging in rags. Build me something new, something efficient. But to a human, that old house, that ancient wall, it's a shrine, something to be cherished. Again, I ask you, why?
Perhaps, for humans, old things represent a tie to the past.
What's so important about the past? People got sick, they needed money. Why tie yourself to that?
Humans are mortal. They seem to need a sense of continuity.
Ah hah!! Why?
To give their lives meaning. A sense of purpose.
And this continuity, does it only run one way, backwards, to the past?
I suppose it is a factor in the human desire to procreate.
So you believe that having children gives humans a sense of immortality, do you?
It is a reasonable explanation to your query, sir.
And to yours as well, Data.
Lore!
Looks like we have ourselves a family reunion.
Open.
I implore you, do not reactivate him.
Don't be ridiculous, Data. Lore is far from the maniacal android you have made him out to be. In any case, he'll obey me. He always did.
But he admitted to an alliance with the Crystal Entity. To gain its favour, he betrayed the colonists and would have betrayed the Enterprise as well had I not
Shh! One more. That should do it.
So, you're still alive. I'm surprised you woke me. Why didn't you just take me apart again and be done with it? That is why the two of you captured me, isn't it?
Data had nothing to do with this, Lore. And nobody captured you. Not exactly, that is. You see, both of your brains contain a simple homing device. Data's was activated purposefully. Yours, well, until you walked through that door I had no idea you'd ever been reassembled.
No thanks to you. But thanks to you, dear brother, I spent nearly two years drifting in space. If it hadn't been for a fortunate encounter with a Pakled trade ship, I'd still be out there.
I had no alternative. You would have destroyed the Enterprise.
Well, since I appear to be an uninvited guest at your little party, I'll leave you with your beloved son and be on my way.
Lore, wait. There are questions I can answer. You'll have no chance to ask them later. You see, I'm dying.
Yes, I'm dying.
Dying from what, sir?
Wait a minute. Wait a minute. What do you mean, you're dying? You look fine. You're not that old. You look fine. What is this? Some kind of a trick?
I wish it were.
We have control of sensors, life support and auxiliary power, Captain. Nothing more.
The code, Mister La Forge?
We can't even locate the file address. At least that would tell us how many digits we're talking about. Not that it would really help.
I want something that will really help.
And quickly too. Willie Potts has twenty four hours, thirty six tops. If it goes much longer than that, the only thing left for Starbase four one six will be to do a postmortem.
Geordi, if the computer's programmed to allow Data to transport down, it would figure that it would allow him to beam back up. Right?
It would figure.
And Data would have left a trace imprint when he beamed down?
Sure. Everyone does.
So what would be involved in pulling that trace and finding a way to make the computer think someone else is Data? Maybe a few someone else's?
We'd have to access the transport controller, reset it to a testing mode, convince it that it's back in school accepting simulated inputs. That's not going to be easy without the main computer. But I suppose we could network a few tricorders together.
Try, Mister La Forge.
Yes, sir.
You did what you had to do? What kind of answer is that?
The only one I can give you. You were not functioning properly.
Lore told me the colonists envied him because you made him so completely human.
I wouldn't exactly have used the word envious, Data.
You disassembled me. You took me apart.
Lore also told me the colonists petitioned you to replace him with a less perfect android.
The last thing you should think of yourself as, Data, is less perfect. The two of you are virtually identical, except for a bit of programming.
It was a lie. Another lie.
I would have proven myself worth to you, if you'd just given me a chance. But it was easier just to turn your back and build your precious Data.
You were the first. You meant as much to me as Data ever did, but you were unstable. The colonists were not envious of you, they were afraid of you. You were unstable.
I am not less perfect than Lore.
Why didn't you just fix me? It was within your power to fix me.
It wasn't as easy as that. The next, the next logical step was to construct Data. Afterward, I planned to get back to you, to fix you.
Next logical step.
I am not less perfect than Lore.
I am not less perfect than Lore.
Enough! Both of you, sit down. Sit down. For all these years I've been plagued by what went wrong. With all of your complexities, Lore, your nuances, basic emotions seemed almost simple by comparison. But the emotion turned, and twisted, became entangled with ambition. Lore, if I had known you were no longer sitting in pieces on some distant shelf, if I had known that I could simply press a button and bring you here, I would have spent those years trying to make things right for you as well. But all I knew of was Data. So I worked long and hard, and now I believe I've succeeded. This is why I brought you here, Data. Basic emotions. Simple feelings, Data. Your feelings. I've imagined how hard it's been for you, living amongst beings so moved by emotion.
I don't have to imagine. I know how hard it's been. You'd be surprised, Data. Feelings do funny things. You may even learn to understand your evil brother. To forgive him. We will be more alike, Data, you and I. You'll see. I'm happy for you.
I question your sincerity, Lore.
Perhaps with this you'll learn to be more trusting, Data. Your brother has had good reason to be bitter.
But sir, Lore was responsible for
He wasn't given the chance that you and I were given, to live. But now I'm sure he understands why I had to do what I had to do. If there were only time, Lore. What a shame. The procedure is quite simple. I'm tired. I need to rest, first, I'm tired.
They're sure this is going to work?
Nobody knows the transporters better than O'Brien and La Forge. They tell me they've managed more than a little sleight of hand with our authorisation codes.
They can insert them into the recall loop?
The computer should think all three of us are Data.
I just hope we don't all beam back looking like Data.
O'BRIEN:Whenever you say, sir.
Bring him home, Number One. Energise.
Data?
'The sons of the prophet were valiant and bold, And quite unaccustomed to fear. But of all the most reckless, Or so I am told, Was Abdul Abulbul Amir.'
How do you feel?
I've always loved that ditty. I could never quite get the cadence right. Thank you, Father.
You called me Father.
What would you prefer I called you? Often Wrong?
What did Lore tell you about that?
That is what the colonists called you, isn't it? Often Wrong Soong. It's a very sloppy rhyme. Wrong Soong. Wrong Soong. It just doesn't work. Let's see.
Data, how you are feeling?
Often Wrong's got a broken heart. Can't even tell his boys apart.
Lore!
Well, well, well, well, well. You're not as feeble as I thought you were.
This won't work. Those circuits, they weren't designed for you. Where's Data?
Where's Data? You didn't fill Data with substandard parts, did you, old man. No, that honour was bestowed upon me. You owe me, old man. Not him, me!
It was not meant for you. You're not listening to me. It must be removed.
Nice try, Often Wrong. Nice try.  I don't know exactly what it's doing, but its doing something.
I didn't know you were alive. If I had
'There were brave men a-plenty, All well known to fame, Who served in the ranks of the Tsar.'
The human is here.
And Data?
No way of knowing.
Set them on stun.
Down here.
Worf.
It's all right. Take it easy.
This, this is Doctor Noonian Soong.
That's impossible. Soong's dead.
No, I'm telling you. Look at this stuff. It's Soong, all right.
Here. Let me.
Would you mind telling me what's going on here?
He surprised me.
Commander.
What has happened here? Doctor. Doctor Soong.
So alike. He saw I couldn't tell you apart. There was only one chip. I tried to tell him, but I couldn't. If I wanted to I couldn't build another one.
Tried to tell who? Damn it, Data, what's going on?
Lore, sir. He was inadvertently summoned here by the same signal which activated my homing circuitry. It seems that after nearly two years in interstellar space, he was
Mister Data, there's a very sick little boy onboard the Enterprise who's not getting any better. We're dead in the water until you get us out of here.
It's all right. Access your third nested memory file and execute instruction five one five five. That will clear your memory block.
I was unaware of having caused any inconvenience, sir.
We'll discuss it later, Mister Data. Doctor, you're coming with us, too. You need to get to Sickbay.
Young man, I've lived here a long time. I have no plans to die anywhere else.
But sir, our medical facility may be able to
Go, go, go, go Data. Go. Go with your friends.
May I say goodbye to Doctor Soong, sir? Alone, sir?
Everybody dies, Data. Well, almost everybody.
Do you believe that we are in some ways alike, sir?
Yes, in many ways, I'd like to believe.
Then it is alright for you to die, because I will remain alive. You know that I cannot grieve for you, sir.
You will, in your own way. Goodbye. Goodbye, Data.
Goodbye, Father.
Captain's log, Stardate 44091.1. We have been at Starbase four one six for three days. Young Willie Potts is responding well to treatment and has been returned to the Enterprise.
The transfer went well?
He'll remain in quarantine for another week or two, but he's out of the woods.
Splendid.
Mister Data, I see you gifts have been well received.
Yes, sir. The boys appear to have reconciled their differences.
They're brothers, Data. Brothers forgive.
In reference to your most recent letter, I agree that your study lacks sufficient primary source information on my programming and operation. Therefore, in response to your request, this correspondence will include a complete record of my activities during a normal day, with particular emphasis on my perceptions of friendship.
Commander Riker, you are fifteen minutes early.
Well, it's a very special day. I thought the father of the bride would enjoy being relieved early on the wedding day.
Thank you, sir.
Nervous?
I cannot become nervous, sir. However, I do sense a certain anticipation regarding my role in the wedding.
Anything to report?
All systems normal, sir. Sickbay reports that Lieutenant Juarez went into labour at zero four hundred hours. We remain at station awaiting the arrival of Starship Zhukov and guest quarters have been prepared for Ambassador T'Pel.
Very well. I have the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
Begin day watch.
Initially, Commander Maddox, I found it difficult to maintain friendships, since human emotions are often puzzling to me.
Eventually, I developed a programme enabling me to predict human emotional responses to specific actions.
Come in.
It is time for the wedding rehearsal.
I know. Data, I've decided not to go through with it.
You do not wish to rehearse?
No, I'm calling off the wedding.
May I ask why?
It's just the right thing to do.
Have your feelings for Chief O'Brien changed?
I'm supposed to be getting married, Data. I should be happy, but I'm not. I just feel this weight pressing down on me.
Will cancelling the wedding make you happy?
Yes. He'll probably be just as relieved as I am. Data, you introduced us to each other. You mean a lot to both of us. I would really appreciate it if you would tell Miles for me.
If you wish.
My friend Chief O'Brien often says that above all else, he wants to make Keiko happy. Since cancelling the wedding will make her happy, I must conclude the Chief will be pleased at her decision.
I have good news.
O'BRIEN:Oh?
Keiko has made a decision designed to increase her happiness. She has cancelled the wedding.
O'BRIEN:She what? Cancelled the wedding? Today? Without even a word? Of all the childish, selfish, irresponsible things to do!
Next time, maybe I should break the good news.
Commander Maddox, it would appear that my programme designed to predict the emotional responses needs adjustment.
Second Officer:Second Officers personal log, supplemental. This is the one thousand five hundred fiftieth day since the Enterprise was commissioned. Besides the arrival of Ambassador T'Pel, other events occurring today include four birthdays, two personnel transfers, a celebration of the Hindu Festival of Lights, two chess tournaments, one secondary school play, and four promotions. Overall, an ordinary day.
The Zhukov is ready for transport, sir.
Energise.
Welcome aboard the Enterprise, Ambassador.
T'PEL:I would meet with your Captain.
Sine I am not affected by emotional considerations, I am closer to being Vulcan than human. However, while their devotion to logic does have a certain appeal, I find their stark philosophy to be somewhat limited.
Come. Ambassador T'Pel.
T'PEL:I come to serve.
Your service honours us. This is my first officer, Commander William Riker.
T'PEL:Leave us, please.
Charming woman.
The tone of Commander Riker's voice makes me suspect that he is not serious about finding Ambassador T'Pel charming. My experience suggests that in fact he may mean the exact opposite of what he says. irony is a form of expression I have not yet been able to master.
V'SAL:You don't need a haircut. You were just in here last week.
Hey, if you'd done it right the first time I wouldn't be back here so soon.
V'SAL:I know you want to look beautiful, but I'm just a barber, not a miracle worker.
Just try to keep my ears on straight today, all right?
Friendly insults and jibes, another form of human speech that I am attempting to master, in this case with the help of Commander Geordi La Forge.
Hi Data.
I consider Geordi to be my best friend.
Here for a trim?
My hair does not require trimming, you lunkhead.
What?
My hair does not require trimming
Lunkhead?
I am experimenting with friendly jibes and insults. It was not meant as a serious disparagement.
Well, just don't try it on the Captain.
No. Geordi, I am still confused by Chief O'Brien's reaction this morning.
Yeah. He was just surprised, Data. He didn't mean to blow up like that. He knows that Keiko probably doesn't want to call off the marriage. She's just getting cold feet.
Cold feet? Jitters. A nervous reaction to an impending event of great importance.
Right. Don't worry, everything's going to be fine. She'll change her mind again.
She will?
Absolutely.
So you believe the wedding will still proceed?
Trust me, they're going to get married. So you'd better find a gift.
I find Lieutenant Worf to be what is called a kindred spirit. We were both orphans rescued by Starfleet officers. In many ways, we are both still outsiders in human society.
Are you here to find a wedding gift?
Yes.
I would appreciate your help in selecting an appropriate item.
Of course. I have attended human weddings before.
Hold.
This is a traditional gift?
Yes, my adoptive parents often give these things at family weddings. A human custom.
Hold.
It is my understanding that the item selected should reflect the personality of whoever is giving it. This does not remind me of you. Have you ever been an actual participant in a human wedding?
No.
You would not consider it to be an honour?
An honour, perhaps. But human bonding rituals often involve a great deal of talking and dancing and crying.
Dancing.
I am rarely in need of Doctor Beverly Crusher's professional services as my bio-mechanical maintenance programme is self sufficient. But I often observe as she practices medicine on others and have learned a great deal about human interaction from her.
Doctor, may I ask a favour of you?
Of course, Data.
Would you teach me how to dance?
What?
I would like to learn how to dance.
Why me?
It was in your service record. Awarded first prize tap and jazz competition, Saint Louis Academy.
Okay, okay.
Have I said something to upset you?
It's just that, that was a long time ago, and I don't want to be known as the dancing doctor. Again.
Then your answer is no.
All right. But let's keep this between you and me.
Of course, Doctor.
Commander Data, please report to the Bridge.
Acknowledged.
Data, I want a tactical projection of possible future Romulan deployments along the Neutral Zone. Access all Federation records on the subject and report to my Ready Room.
Captain, is there a specific area you wish me to study?
No. Ambassador. Number One, set a course one three zero mark two four six, warp seven.
That will take us very close to the Neutral Zone, Captain.
I'm aware of that, Number One. Proceed.
Lay in the course.
It is fortunate that I am able to perform my duties without emotional distractions. If that were not the case, a sudden course correction toward the Neutral Zone would make me very nervous.
Personal Log, supplemental. Commander Maddox, there are still many dynamics of social interaction which I do not understand.
Mister Data, based on your analysis, what is the current Romulan strategy behind the deployment of their ships in this sector?
Their ships are deployed to support a policy of confrontation designed to test Federation defenses along the Neutral Zone.
Do you predict any change in the near future?
I project a ninety percent probability that they will continue to support that policy.
Is there any indication of a more conciliatory attitude on their part?
No, sir.
T'PEL:Caution is clearly called for, Captain. However, the mission must proceed as planned.
Starfleet Command agrees with you, but I would feel better if you would consent to an escort or
Thank you, Mister Data.
Feline supplement seventy four.
Computer, run fluidic sensor diagnostic.
Diagnostic complete. All systems functioning within normal parameters.
Come in.
O'BRIEN:Am I intruding, Commander?
No. Would you care to sit down?
When one of my friends is distraught, I have learnt that the thoughtful thing to do is to attempt to make him feel more comfortable.
May I offer you some refreshment, Chief?
O'BRIEN:No, thank you, sir. First of all I'd like to apologise for this morning in Ten Forward
There is no need to apologise. I was not offended. Would you like a pillow or a more comfortable chair to sit upon?
O'BRIEN:No, sir. Thank you, sir.
Perhaps you would like some music? Brahms? Aurelia?
O'BRIEN:No, really, sir I'm fine. I came to ask for your help. It's about Keiko. I'd like you to talk to her. Convince her to go through with the wedding.
Would Counsellor Troi not be a more appropriate choice to speak with Keiko?
O'BRIEN:She already has. It didn't help. You've known her longer than I have. I just thought she might listen to you. She won't even talk to me
I do not know what to say to her.
O'BRIEN:Just talk with her. Make her see reason. She's going off half-cocked, not thinking this through. You've worked with her for a long time. She respects your opinion.
Perhaps she has not fully analysed her decision. I will try.
O'BRIEN:Thank you, sir. I won't forget this.
Commander Maddox, I noted that Keiko was quite calm and rational when she informed me of her decision this morning. Therefore, I can predict that she will respond to an objective analysis of the situation based on the available facts. It is fortunate that she has not let emotional considerations cloud her judgement. It should make my task much simpler.
What?
I believe you made an incorrect analysis of the facts at hand.
What do you mean?
You do not seem happy.
Well
Your decision was based on the assumption that cancelling the wedding would bring you happiness. This has proved to be incorrect.
Data, it's not that simple.
Since your action did not produce the desired results, the only advisable solution should be to re-examine your decision making process, and look for errors.
I knew what I was doing. It's my decision.
That fact is not in dispute. However, you may have acted with undue haste and in doing so, unintentionally hurt Chief O'Brien's feelings.
I did what I had to! Why are you doing this? I thought you were my friend.
I am your friend.
Then leave me alone.
If I have offended.
Just leave me alone.
It is clear that I need guidance to resolve this situation. Counsellor Troi's advice should be useful.
In many ways, Deanna Troi is the friend that I understand the least. Her life and her duties are predicated on her understanding and perception of emotions. Since I have none, no doubt she finds me as much of a mystery as I find her.
Chief O'Brien talks to me. Keiko talks to you. Why do they not talk to each other?
That's a good question, Data. I wish I had a good answer for you. Perhaps when they're ready, they will.
Many aspects of this situation are puzzling to me. I have been studying various texts on the subject of marriage, but I have not found a suitable guide.
A suitable guide for what?
In an effort to be helpful, I am attempting to calculate the variables involved in a successful marriage.
Good luck.
There are many opinions. On Galvin Five, a marriage is considered successful only if children are produced within a year of the wedding. Andorian marriages require groups of four people unless
Data, would you like my advice on how to help them? Don't. This is something they have to work out for themselves.
But I am their friend. Should I not stand with them in a time of difficulty?
There are many ways to help a friend, and sometimes the best way is to leave them alone.
Do you believe it to be the right decision for them to marry?
I don't know. They're very much in love, but sometimes that isn't enough. Marriage is an agreement to share who you are with someone else. To spend your lives together. To grow old together.
To grow old together? That is an integral component of marriage?
Usually. Why do you ask?
Although I am an android, I have not excluded the possibility that I, too, may someday marry.
Data, I had no idea you'd thought about getting married.
I believe I have much to offer a potential mate. However, we cannot grow old together because I will not grow old.
Data, you do have a lot to offer.
T'PEL:Commander Data, this is Ambassador T'Pel. Please report to my quarters.
Acknowledged.
T'PEL:Enter.
T'PEL:You have priority three clearance aboard the Enterprise?
That is correct, Ambassador.
T'PEL:I require information on this ship's defence and navigational systems. Access code kappa alpha four six zero one seven zero four.
The code is valid.
T'PEL:What is the field strength of the ship's deflector shields at maximum output?
May I ask the purpose of your request?
T'PEL:I require the information.
I have the same safeguards as the ship's computer. Therefore, I must report any inquiry regarding restricted information to the Captain. Your reaction suggests you do not wish the Captain to be informed of your inquiry.
T'PEL:I was not interested in the information. I was curious as to your security safeguards. They appear to be adequate. Cancel the request. You may leave.
Commander Maddox, I have often wished for the sense that humans call intuition or instinct. Since Vulcans are incapable of lying, I must accept the Ambassador's explanation as the truth, but I would still prefer a gut feeling to back up this conclusion.
Programme Crusher four in progress.
Hi, Data. Well what do you think? It is a recreation of the studio I had my first dance lesson in.
It appears to be quite suitable, Doctor.
Let's start with something simple. Stomp. Hop. Try it.
Again. Good! Good.
Am I dancing, Doctor?
Not quite. Stop, Data. Now try this.
Doctor, perhaps it would be beneficial to show me the final lesson.
Okay.
That's great. Watch. Good. Triples. Watch. Stop, Data. And you say you've never done this before? Try this.
Stop, Data. Not bad.  Yeah, not bad.
Then I have successfully learned to dance?
I'd say you've picked up the basics.
Thank you, Doctor. I am now prepared to dance at the wedding.
Wedding?
Keiko's wedding.
Data, you never told me this was for the wedding.
Is that important?
Well yes. They don't do a lot of tap dancing at weddings.
Why?
Well, Data, because, I don't really know why, Look, why don't I just teach you a style of dancing that they will do at the wedding? Computer, run 'Isn't It Romantic'.
Compared to what we've just doing, this will be simple. Just look up and follow me. One, two, ready, and
No, Data, wait a minute. Ow! No, no, you're just. Ow! Move slowly. Ow! Ow! Stop music.
Sorry, Doctor.
I don't understand, Data. You picked up the tap dancing so quickly.
I cannot reproduce your performance if I cannot see your feet.
All right, let's try it again. And this time, watch my feet. Computer, start music. And.
Now, don't just imitate me. You've got to lead.
Lead where, Doctor?
Indicate to your partner where you want her to step.
And how is that accomplished?
I'll show you. I'll lead. Now, you'll notice that I don't just repeat the same pattern over and over. I improvise. Now you lead. That's good. Now, look up, Data. Look into my eyes. You're holding me too tight.
This is a very complex set of variables to coordinate, Doctor.
You are doing fine. Now, smile. Act like you're enjoying yourself
Doctor Crusher, please report to Sickbay.
Is it Lieutenant Juarez?
Yes, Doctor. Her contractions are now one minute apart.
I'm on my way. Why don't you programme up an artificial dance partner. And don't be afraid to experiment.
I will. Thank you, Doctor.
Computer, create dance partner. Female. Begin music.
And just as the headsman swings his axe, the blade is about to fall
Commander Riker's easy going manner and sense of humour is fascinating to me. I believe it to be one reason he is so popular among the crew. It may also be partly responsible for his success in matters of love. There may be a correlation between humour and sex. The need for more research is clearly indicated.
Commander.
Picard to the Bridge. All stop.
Aye, sir.
Sir, we have reached the designated coordinates.
Hold this position. Long range scan.
Captain, I am detecting a ship in the Neutral Zone. Configuration, Romulan warbird.
Yellow alert. Hail the Warbird, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir. They are responding. Text only. We are to proceed to the agreed coordinates.
Set course zero three seven mark zero zero five, warp four. Take us into the Neutral Zone, Ensign.
Captain, the warbird is holding position. In three minutes we will be within phaser range.
Red alert. I trust my crew, Ambassador. They will take no provocative action unless I order them.
T'PEL:Hold position on these coordinates.
Slow to half impulse.
T'PEL:Open a channel.
Open.
T'PEL:I am Ambassador T'Pel.
I am Admiral Mendak.
T'PEL:There is no established protocol for a meeting of this nature. The logical course is that I transport aboard your ship and begin the negotiations.
Yes. Captain, I note your defensive systems have been activated.
As have yours.
It was not meant as an accusation Indeed, I salute your show of strength. Ambassador, we are honoured by your presence. You may transport aboard at your convenience.
T'PEL:The honour is mine.
T'PEL:Have your Transporter room stand by. I will beam to their ship with no further delay.
Ambassador, I urge you once more to reconsider. The Enterprise can accommodate a Romulan delegation without sacrificing our security or
T'PEL:Captain Picard, I find your argument illogical. Please carry out my instructions.
Picard to Chief O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:O'Brien here.
Prepare to transport Ambassador T'Pel to the Romulan ship.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, maintain a lock on her signal once she's aboard. At the first sign of trouble I want to be able to bring her back.
Understood. Transporter activated. Captain!
O'BRIEN:Transporter emergency! I'm losing her signal!
Boosting power to autosequencers.
Engaging computer override.
O'Brien, what happened down there?
O'BRIEN:I'm losing the pattern. Trying to re establish. I'm sorry, sir. I wasn't able to retrieve the signal. The Ambassador's dead.
Second Officer:Second officer's personal log, supplemental. The risks aboard a starship are accepted by all who serve, but I have never failed to observe a deep emotional response to the loss of a comrade. It is at times like this that I greatly miss the ability to share human feelings.
O'BRIEN:The signal lock wasn't broken, sir. I had just entered the transfer sequence when the Ambassador's pattern began to break up. I tried to switch to emergency manual control, but the pattern deteriorated too quickly and
Captain, there is no prior record of this type of accident occurring aboard a starship. Backup systems and safeguards are designed to prevent just such an occurrence.
I can't find any system flaws in the unit, Captain. The Engineering status reports were all normal. None of the backups were activated and the autosequencers were all functioning normally.
Any prior malfunctions on this transporter unit?
O'BRIEN:No, sir. In fact, we replaced the transition coils only last week.
Could there have been some kind of interference from the Romulans?
O'BRIEN:Nothing that I could see. Their shields were down. There was no power interruption, no subspace bias.
I want this unit pulled and its systems checked again. I want a level one diagnostic on all transporters.
Yes, sir.
Her molecular structure dissipated instantly once the pattern was lost. There were some organic compounds left on the pad, but there wasn't enough material to do an autopsy.
To die on a transporter. Hardly a fitting end for one of the Federation's most honoured diplomats.
Bridge to Captain Picard. Admiral Mendak is hailing. He wishes to speak with you.
We're still waiting, Captain. Is there a problem?
There's been an accident. Ambassador T'Pel has been killed in a transporter malfunction.
What kind of malfunction?
We are still investigating that. As soon as
I should have known the Federation wasn't serious about this conference.
Admiral, I assure you. The Federation places the highest priority on this mission and its goal.
Well played, Captain well played. Starfleet opposes normalisation of relations with the Romulan Empire, and so you are ordered to create an accident.
You're mistaken. I am ready and willing to discuss the establishment of full diplomatic relations under the same terms as Ambassador T'Pel.
A generous offer, since you know we were willing only to negotiate with T'Pel. I salute you again, Captain. It was a manoeuvre worthy of a Romulan. I suggest we both leave the Neutral Zone before there is another accident.
Set course for Federation territory, warp two. Engage. Mister Data, I want you to take charge of this investigation. Study computer logs, sensor information everything. I refuse to believe that this was a simple malfunction.
Aye, sir.
Captain Picard was the person who first interested me in the works of Sir Arthur Conan Doyle. I have subsequently become a great admirer of the fictional detective Sherlock Holmes and his ability to solve mysteries by careful examination of the available evidence.
I have found Holmes' methodology of deductive reasoning to be quite useful. One of his adages is that once you have eliminated the impossible, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth.
I'm sorry, I don't have time to give you another lesson right now, Data.
That is not my purpose. I would like to examine the remains of Ambassador T'Pel left on the transporter pad.
I'm working on the report right now.
Have you compared the genetic code with the Ambassador's last recorded transporter ID traces?
No, that's not standard procedure. Why?
I could be chasing an untamed ornithoid without a cause.
A wild-goose chase? All right. Computer, access the transporter ID trace for Ambassador T'Pel. All right, there's the genetic record of the Ambassador when she beamed aboard the Enterprise. Now, the breakdown of the organic material found on the transporter pad should be identical. Mitochondrial structure fits the general parameters, no change in the nucleotide bases. There's a slight discrepancy in the base pair sequence. Chemically, these are identical. However, the organic sample from the transporter is showing numerous single-bit errors, like replicated material.
Can you postulate an explanation for the discrepancy?
I'd say the DNA was either mutated by the transporter during the rematerialisation process
A supposition not supported by the transporter records.
Or these aren't the remains of the Ambassador.
The only abnormality found during my investigation was a temporary increase in the matter to energy signal ratio. Due to the circumstances, I decided to investigate the possibility that a second transporter signal had caused the fluctuation. Although this was highly improbable, it was the only remaining theory.
A second transporter signal? From where?
From the Devoras.
Romulan transporters operate on a similar subspace frequency to our own. With only minor adjustments, they can be made to simulate our own transporter carrier wave.
Are you saying they beamed the Ambassador off our own pad?
While simultaneously, a small amount of genetically similar material was left in the Ambassador's place.
To make us believe she had died as a result of the malfunction'
Yes, sir.
Mister Worf, where is the Devoras now?
The ship is still in the Neutral Zone on course zero seven nine mark one two five. Speed, warp two.
Heading for home.
The safest and most logical decision in this situation is to contact Starfleet and await further instructions. However, based on past experience, I project only a seventeen percent chance Captain Picard will choose that alternative.
Red Alert. All hands stand to battle stations.
Lay in an intercept course for the Romulan ship.
Shields up. Load all torpedo bays. Stand by phasers.
Warp factor eight. Engage.
Open a channel to the Devoras.
Aye, sir. No response.
The Devoras is dropping out of warp, sir. Their weapon systems are powering up.
Go to impulse power.
Aye, sir.
Message coming in, sir.
On screen.
Captain, you agreed to leave the Neutral Zone without
Admiral Mendak, you have taken our Ambassador captive.
I can assure you there is no one being held captive aboard this ship.
We know about the transporter malfunction and that you are holding Ambassador T'Pel.
Captain, Romulan warbird decloaking to starboard.
I suggest you leave. Now.
It is my responsibility to protect the lives of Federation citizens. I will not permit this abduction to succeed.
Captain, you're not going to start an incident which might
Admiral Mendak, I will take whatever action is necessary to obtain the return of the Ambassador.
In the game of poker, there is a moment when a player must decide if an opponent is being deceptive or actually holds a winning hand. This decision is based not only on the odds, but also on an appraisal of the man. Is he bluffing or does he have the cards?
Fortunately, Captain, I am not ready to start a war today.
T'Pel.
T'PEL:Sub-Commander Selok, actually.
A spy.
A patriot, Captain. She has performed her service to the Empire with distinction.
T'PEL:Thank you for your help, Captain.
You see now that we are not holding one of your citizens, and we thank you for returning our sister to us. But my patience has limits. The game is over. I expect you to leave peacefully. Now.
Captain, long range sensors detect three Romulan warbirds entering this sector.
Some days you get the bear, and some days the bear gets you.
Reverse course. Take us back to Federation territory, warp six. Engage.
Keiko, I need your help. I have offended you and need to find a way to rectify my mistake. I am not sure what to do.
You haven't offended me.
I should not have interfered. It would be best if I apologised.
It would be best if you got dressed. For the wedding?
But
Come here. I have the most beautiful carnation for the father of the bride. Now, don't be nervous.
I am not nervous. I am confused.
Since the days of the first wooden sailing ships, all captains have enjoyed the happy privilege of joining together two people in the bonds of matrimony. And so it is my honour to unite you, Keiko Ishikawa, and you, Miles Edward O'Brien, together in matrimony
There are still many human emotions I do not fully comprehend. Anger, hatred, revenge. But I am not mystified by the desire to be loved or the need for friendship. These are things I do understand.
Congratulations.
I was looking for Doctor Crusher.
Shh.
The Juarez child?
A boy. At the same time we were facing destruction, this small miracle was taking place. Welcome aboard.
All systems normal, sir. We are on course for Adelphous Four. Engineering is realigning the main deflector dish. Sickbay reports Lieutenant Umbato broke two ribs during a holodeck exercise, and sensors continue to gather long-range information on the Murasaki quasar.
Very well. I have the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
If being human is not simply a matter of being born flesh and blood, if it is instead a way of thinking, acting and feeling, then I am hopeful that one day I will discover my own humanity.
Begin night watch.
Until then Commander Maddox, I will continue learning, changing, growing, and trying to become more than what I am.
Computer, dispatches.
A research enquiry from the Manitoba Journal of Interplanetary Psychology and three communiqués from your mother.
Transfer the letters from my mother to the viewscreen. And, computer, I would like a real chocolate sundae.
Define real in context, please.
Real. Not one of your perfectly synthesised, ingeniously enhanced imitations. I would like real chocolate ice cream, real whipped cream
This unit is programmed to provide sources of acceptable nutritional value. Your request does not fall within current guidelines. Please indicate whether you wish to override the specified programme?
Listen
Picard to Counsellor Troi.
Now what? Yes, Captain?
The pleasure of your company is requested, Counsellor. We're having a little impromptu reception for the arriving delegates.
Captain, I'm not really dressed for a reception.
Oh, Counsellor
Just throw on any old thing. We're about to get our first look at the wormhole.
Of course, Captain. I'm on my way.
God forbid I should miss my first look at the wormhole.
May I escort you, Miss Troi?
Just tell me there's some chocolate here.
Ah, Counsellor Troi. Will you allow me to do the introductions? This is Premier Bhavani of Barzan. Counsellor Deanna Troi.
Your discovery has produced a great deal of excitement, Premier.
Hopefully, it will also produce a new era of prosperity for my people.
We'll see to that.
You know Mister Mendoza, the Federation negotiator.
A pleasure to see you again, Counsellor Troi.
This is a worthy Federation competitors in the bidding, Leyor of the Caldonians.
Madame.
And I'm Devinoni Ral.
Ship's Counsellor Deanna Troi.
My good friend, Ral, is the best hired gun in the business.
Hired gun?
My good friend Mendoza means that I'm a negotiator who serves a variety of clients. On this particular occasion I represent the Chrysalians.
I believe it's almost time, isn't it Captain?
Indeed. It will be visible directly ahead.
Is it always on time, Bhavani?
Always. We see it every two hundred and thirty three minutes. Our scientists say it's due to radiation buildup in the accretion disk. The visible burst is very brief.
There it is, ladies and gentlemen, the first and only stable wormhole known to exist. It's yours, for the right price.
Captain's log, Stardate 43385.6. We are orbiting Barzan Two, which is entertaining bids for control of what appears to be a stable wormhole, which could provide a permanent shortcut to the distant Gamma Quadrant.
And as you all know, the environment on my planet is completely inhospitable to most other life forms. So I'd like to express my appreciation to you, Captain Picard, for hosting these negotiations. The Barzan has been a society dependent on others for generations. We want that to end. The appearance of this stable wormhole in our space provides us with our first true natural resource. We have neither the experience nor the technology to exploit it. But you do.
Excuse me. There's a delegation of Ferengi who wishes to be beamed aboard, sir.
Were you expecting the Ferengi, Premier?
No, but I do not wish to create ill will, Captain. If they are interested in bidding, I have no objection.
Chief O'Brien, this is Captain Picard. Will you beam the Ferengi directly to the Observation lounge?
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
On behalf of all Ferengi, I protest. Why were we not invited to these negotiations?
My apologies. We did not anticipate your interest. You're welcome to join us.
My name is DaiMon Goss. These are my consuls, Kol and Doctor Arridor. We'll need chairs.
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise. I'm serving as host for these proceedings.
Good, then see to it that we get chairs.
Let me explain.
Fine, fine, just have your Klingon servant get us some chairs.
I am in charge of Security.
Then who gets the chairs?
DaiMon, due to the delicate nature of these negotiations, all parties have agreed that one representative would suffice. Now I will be happy to provide your consuls with accommodations and you may have my chair.
Very well.
Premier.
Kol, the bag.
Gentlemen, this way.
We can handle all the pleasantries later. Now, let's get down to business.
I'll match anyone's best offer, and add the gold on top of it.
Devinoni Ral, human. Age forty one. Born Brussels, European Alliance. Relocated at age nineteen to Hurkos Three.
Come in.
Should I call for an appointment ?
No, I was just looking over some personnel files.
Well, that's too bad. I thought you might be thinking about me.
I thought you'd be deep in negotiations by now.
In recess. I never play the opening rounds, anyway. Inconsequential. Besides there are much better things to negotiate on this ship. Like dinner tonight?
What about your travelling companion?
My travelling companion is travelling. I sent her home.
Why?
You know why.
Weren't you getting along?
Don't do that.
What?
Don't do Counsellor Troi.
Was I?
Yes, you were. When you leave this office, who are you? Oh. So that's how it goes. You never do. You never do leave the office.
What
Shush.
Dinner at eight?
The data from the Barzan's probe of the wormhole are quite impressive, Captain. The wormhole delivered the probe beyond the Denkiri Arm, in the Gamma Quadrant.
It would take nearly a century at warp nine to cover that distance.
The same distance could be achieved in a matter of seconds through the wormhole.
Imagine the Ferengi collecting tolls if we lose to them.
I don't think the Ferengi are the greatest threat at the table. With all of DaiMon Goss' bluster, they don't have the resources the Barzans need.
I think that Devinoni is the one that we need to watch out for.
An accurate observation. How did you recognise that?
He was the most one in the group.
You must play poker, Commander.
Poker? Is that a game of some sort?
Commander Riker conducts masterclasses in poker.
Our skills are not dissimilar, Commander.
Mister Mendoza, if this lives up to its billing, it will be a discovery of extraordinary value. But it is a big if.
A wormholes is there one moment, and then gone the next. A stable wormhole is unheard of.
Are you saying this may not be what it seems?
The Barzans do not have manned space travel, so they had to resort to an automated probe. Its findings are limited. It cannot be determined from these charts how stable the wormhole really is, or how long it will remain intact.
The Federation could wind up buying a proverbial lemon.
Proverbial lemon?
Later, Data.
And of course that means, once the contract is negotiated and closed, we would be obliged to fulfill the terms.
We think we should take a look for ourselves.
I don't think Bhavani could object to that.
Geordi has continuous visual contact with the wormhole, Captain. I think he's the logical choice.
I would also like to volunteer, sir.
Nobody's going in there until we have done a full sensor analysis. I want to do everything possible to determine that it's safe, and when I am satisfied, then you, Data, and Commander La Forge will enter the wormhole tomorrow.
Just a moment of discomfort for a good cause, DaiMon. You understand this will not be lethal.
Doctor, you surprise me. I have no wish to kill anyone. A short term crippling will suffice.
Then, this will be just fine.
A distillation of your own blood pyrocytes. Harmless to you. Undetectable by the ship's bio-filters, but when absorbed through your victim's skin, it will provoke an extreme allergic reaction.
I'd say it is time to extend the hand of the Ferengi to the representative of the Federation.
Much better.
Thank you. Come in for a drink?
Ah, Federation decor.
Not your style?
Well, conformity is not my style.
What would you like?
I'd even like another. There she is again, Counsellor Troi.
I'm not. Computer, champagne.
For two. Am I moving too fast for you?
No, I'm moving too fast for me.
I like that better.
I haven't been able to stop thinking about you all day.
You must have had a nice day.
Anticipation is fun.  We'll be late for dinner.
Very late.
Mister Mendoza.
I seem to be a bit warm.
I need some help here
You attempt to gain every unfair advantage, Picard.
Premier Bhavani has no objection.
Well, I most certainly do. First, you conveniently arrange to play host, then you plan to send your own manned probe into the wormhole. The Federation thinks it can do anything it wants to. Well, I will not tolerate it!
I will gladly share the results of our exploration with all the delegates.
And you expect us to believe what you report?
Then send in your own probe, Goss.
That's exactly what I intend to do. And I should strongly suggest you stay out of our way.
Tell Data and La Forge to do themselves a favour, and stay out of their way.
Captain Picard, please come to Sickbay.
Acknowledged, Doctor.
Whatever he's got is obviously not life threatening. It's some kind of system-wide histaminic reaction. He certainly can't go back to negotiations for several days.
Will you keep me informed?
The Federation's top negotiator taken out by a mysterious ailment. Suspicions?
With the Ferengi around? Always.
You'll have to fill in, Number One.
Me?
Well, I'm the designated host. It would be a most awkward transition. You're the next likely choice. And Mister Mendoza will certainly agree. He's quite impressed by your natural instincts.
Excuse me, sir, but those weren't natural instincts. Those were poker instincts. A card game doesn't exactly prepare me for this.
Yes, the stakes are higher. But then, isn't that when the game gets interesting, Commander?
The wormhole will reappear in thirty seconds, sir.
The Ferengi pod is moving into position.
Shuttle nine, stand by.
Ferengi pod, this is Lieutenant Commander La Forge in the Enterprise shuttle.
This is Doctor Arridor, go ahead.
Would you care to take the point, Doctor?
We will gladly yield that honour to you, Lieutenant Commander.
You know, if this doesn't work, the thought of spending the rest of my life in here is none too appealing.
There is a bright side, Geordi. You will have me to talk to.
It is visible, Captain.
Proceed when ready.
and intense energy fields which appear to be stabil
They've travelled beyond our communication capabilities, sir
A complete analysis of our bid is available on the ship's computer for your consideration.
Commander, I realise what a difficult position this must be for you. If you don't understand something, I hope you won't be too embarrassed to ask me.
I think I have an idea what the rules are.
Well, that's what makes it so interesting. The rules of the game change to fit the moment.
Not unlike commanding a starship, Mister Ral.
Well, Mister Riker's placed a great deal of emphasis on defence, a subject he obviously knows well, having served Starfleet in a number of conflicts. Now, the Chrysalians, we're enemies to no one, and we choose to remain that way. Neutral.
Neutral, and uninvolved, sir, in virtually all interstellar matters of consequence.
No one would claim that the Chrysalians are as powerful as the mighty Federation, but we have resources, and technology, and scientists too. But we also have had peace for ten generations.
You know, I was thinking.
Mmm?
Maybe I could stretch out these negotiations for a few days. Would you like that?
Mmm-hmmm.  Devinoni Ral. Who are you?
Well, what do your Betazoid senses tell you about me?
Not much. My human physical response must be blocking them out.
Good.
It never happened to me before.
I rather like it that I'm more difficult to read than your other men.
There aren't any others. Currently.
What about Commander Riker?
Who have you been talking to?
No one. No one. I just sensed something when I saw the two of you together.
Will Riker and I are good friends.
Ah ha.
It was once a little more than that.
Ah.
How come we're talking about me instead of you?
Don't you have enough people talk about their lives to you? Who counsels the Counsellor?
Oh no, I want to know about you.
I'm what you see right now. Just me, wanting to run away with you, but knowing you'd never leave this damned ship.
When I first saw you, I felt as if I'd been waiting for you. I'm trying to understand why or how that's possible.
Does it matter? Well, it will when I tell you. But you must promise never to tell anyone else.
What?
I am part Betazoid too. My mother was one half, I am one quarter.
You're empathic?
The only one of five children. I must admit I was never as comfortable sensing emotions as you seem to be.
That's why you left Earth.
Yes. I learned to live with it, use it, as you have. But still, it isolates us, doesn't it? And I thought it would always would, so I tucked my heart away. I didn't need it, I didn't want it. At the negotiating table, it can be fatal to have a heart. But I never realised how much I needed mine until I looked at you.
I'm picking up an increase in accretion matter filtering in from the terminus.
Monitors are functioning normally again.
Ferengi pod, everybody in one piece over there?
Our condition is no concern of yours, Enterprise shuttle. We are competitors in this venture, not partners.
Ferengi pod, out.
Yeah, happy landings to you, too.
Curious. We are not where we are supposed to be.
What do you mean? We're on the other side of the wormhole, aren't we ?
According to the Barzan probe, we should be in the Gamma Quadrant but these readings clearly indicate we are nearly two hundred light years away in sector three five five six of the Delta Quadrant.
Maybe the Barzan readings were wrong.
Perhaps the readings were correct. Their probe could have exited the wormhole at a completely different location.
Data, my Visor's picking up subatomic fluctuations. Meson and lepton activity is definitely increasing.
Gravitational acceleration is also increasing.
Something very strange is happening to this wormhole.
Sorry.
You're unusually limber this morning.
I'll say. Devinoni Ral. It's ridiculous, and wonderful. I feel completely out of control. Happy. Terrified. But there's nothing rational about this.
Who needs rational when your toes curl up?
I'm afraid I'm going to lose myself. I can't get enough of him. Is it possible to fall in love in one day?
I did.
It was like this for you and Jack?
No, it was another fellow. I fell in love in a day, it lasted a week. But what a week. Then I met Jack. It took months to figure it out with him.
Well then, maybe I should slow down. Catch my breath. Not let this get out of control.
CRUSHER + TROI:No.
To be honest, I was surprised to see the Caldonians here at all, Leyor.
You must think Caldonia very insular, Mister Ral.
Oh, no, no, not at all. Not at all. On the contrary, I've respected your world's commitment to pure research. It's just that, well.
Go on, please.
Well, scholars don't always enjoy administrative demands. And certainly we've seen here that the administration of the wormhole is
Yes, I must admit, I have begun to feel some trepidation about that.
Yes. Yes, I'm sure you have, Leyor. I'm sure we all have. Do you realise that in the next century, the number of ships that will pass
Gentlemen, this open session is called by request of the Caldonian delegation.
Madame Bhavani, Caldonia withdraws from these proceedings.
For what reasons, Leyor?
It has been made very clear that the maintenance and administrative requirements are beyond our abilities.
Leyor, the Federation would like to negotiate a trade agreement in which we could acquire your planet's rich deposits of trillium 323 which we would add to our bid, Premier Bhavani.
My apologies. We have already reached an agreement with the Chrysalians.
Mister Ral? You either had very good instincts, or foreknowledge of the Caldonian withdrawal.
Some people just don't wish to transact business with the Federation, Commander. The Chrysalians hereby add the Caldonian trillium 323 to its bid, Premier.
I'm telling you, it's changing.
I can see it with my Visor.
I have no intention of leaving yet. We have not finished taking our readings.
Listen, Doctor.
Your readings must be telling you the same things we're getting. This is not the Gamma Quadrant.
I will not confirm your speculations.
This is not a speculation, Doctor. We are not where the Barzans said we should be, which would indicate
This side of the wormhole is not stable.
There are meson and lepton fluctuations. Local gravitational fields are increasing exponentially. Everything says we'd better get the hell out of here.
It will be visible again in forty seconds. We will make our own judgments then.
I can see it now and I'm telling you that you don't have time to wait. Not even forty seconds.
Ferengi pod out.
Damn it, Arridor, we're seventy thousand light years away from our ships. Come on, now. Follow us in. We'll lead you.
Idiots. It's getting worse. I'm taking us in, Data. With or without them.
Thrusters at half power. Three quarters.
Entering outer event horizon.
They panic quickly under pressure. There, precisely as scheduled. Right where I expected it to be.
Everyone was talking today about the way you absorbed the Caldonian bid.
Well, the opening was there. I took it
Commander Riker didn't know how you managed it.
Let me tell you something about Commander Riker. He's good. He's the most dangerous man in the room to me.
But he doesn't have an edge. Your edge.
Our edge. You make it sound unethical.
Isn't it?
Deanna, it's just business.
Why haven't you told anyone you're an empath?
Because I find it makes people uncomfortable.
I think you don't tell them so you can gain an advantage.
Well, I gained an advantage by using it with you. You didn't seem to mind that. Look, Deanna, the point of negotiating is to take advantage. I don't know what the other side is offering, and they don't know what I'm offering. So we dance around each other until somebody wins. I never cry foul when I lose.
But you're reading their emotional states, their inner selves, and then using that to manipulate them.
Well, people have been doing that for thousands of years, just by listening carefully, by watching body language. I just happen to be better at it. You do it.
I do it to help my crew, not outmanoeuvre them. And I don't hide that I'm an empath.
Oh, so you announce it to every alien culture you encounter? Or do you use it to give your side an advantage. Do you tell the Romulan that's about to attack that you sense that he may be bluffing? Or do you just tell it to your Captain?
That's different. That's a matter of protection.
Yes, protection. Your protection, your Captain, your crew, your edge. Yes. Now it's a matter of life and death when you take the advantage. Me, I deal in property. Exchanges. No body gets hurt. So you tell me, which one of us would you say has more of a problem with ethics? Excuse me.
May I join you, Commander?
Bought out the Ferengi yet, Ral?
Think I should give it a try?
No, but I think that you will. One way or another, it's going to come down to you and me.
You know, you're very good at this. Very good. Much better than you realise.
I hope I'm better than you realise.
The last mile of the marathon is always the toughest. That's when the winners are willing to take the big risks. Are you willing to do that?
We'll see, won't we?
Well, let's see now. I'm prepared to reach a firm agreement with Bhavani before we learn the outcome of your probe's expedition. Are you? Well, well, well. That would not be looked upon favourably by the Federation, I'd imagine. See, you have to be willing to take that last step alone or it just isn't worth playing.
Your point of view, not mine.
Oh, I see that, Commander, I see that. Otherwise you wouldn't be second in command of this starship. You know, I feel responsible for you in a way. Related. Deanna. We both love Deanna. Oh, in different ways, of course.
I will remove the burden of that responsibility right now. My relationship with Deanna stands very well on its own without any help from you.
Of course it does. Of course it does. It's just that, well, she's an extraordinary woman. Brilliant. Lovely. Very passionate. And she could have been yours, Will, but you just didn't do enough to keep her. And now, well, I'm here, and I'm going to take her too.
That's the first bad play I've seen you make. If you can bring happiness into Deanna's life, nothing would please me more. You know, you're really not such a bad sort, Ral, except you don't have any values, beyond the value of today's bid, that is. Deanna is just the woman to bring some meaning to your sorry existence, if you're smart enough to take it. I doubt that you are. To the last mile.
Sir, the Ferengi vessel is moving out of orbit. Impulse power They are approaching the entry to the wormhole, sir.
Computer, is the Ferengi Goss still on board the Enterprise?
DaiMon Goss departed the Enterprise at fourteen hundred hours.
They are powering forward missile launchers, sir.
Yellow alert. Hail the Ferengi.
Request an explanation of your actions, DaiMon Goss.
I've learned from informed sources that the Federation has manipulated these negotiations from the very beginning, and has already signed a secret agreement with the Barzans.
That is not true.
The Ferengi offer was never seriously considered.
Premier Bhavani welcomed you to these proceedings, despite my better judgment.
We will be ignored no longer.
They've fired a missile directly at the opening, sir.
Destroy it.
On screen. Firing phasers.
Your offers both have merit, gentlemen. if I could find a deciding factor
Riker to Picard. What's happening, Captain?
Goss has fired a missile at the wormhole.
I need you on the Bridge, Number One.
Excuse me.
Excuse me for saying so under the circumstances, Premier, but this fight is really between the Federation and the Ferengi. Now it seems unconscionable that your wormhole is being used as a pawn in their power struggle.
You must know we will not allow you to do this.
If the Ferengi cannot have the wormhole, no one will.
A missile will have no destructive effect on a wormhole, but if it should explode near the shuttlecraft they will be destroyed.
Casualties of war, Commander. My men are prepared to die. Are yours?
Captain, he's lying. I'm almost sure of it. He doesn't mean what he says.
Why? What is he doing it for then?
Permission to enter the Bridge, Captain.
Premier, with all due respect
Captain, I believe I am in a better position to settle this with DaiMon Goss than you are. May I address him?
Premier.
DaiMon Goss, this is Devinoni Ral.
I have nothing to say to you, Ral.
Well then, just listen. The planet Barzan has reached an agreement with the Chrysalians for long term control of the wormhole. Now on behalf of the Chrysalians, I am prepared to offer the Ferengi free access to the wormhole in perpetuity.
I have your word on this?
Yes, my word, sir, in exchange for Ferengi convoy privileges to be negotiated in good faith.
This is an acceptable offer.
Ferengi vessel has shut down its forward missile launcher.
Stand down red alert.
Commander Riker. I'm sorry you had to learn about my decision this way. You represented the Federation well, but I have come to believe that the Chrysalians' tradition of peace is more desirable to my planet.
Excuse me, Premier. There's something you should know. I'm sorry, was there something you wanted to say?
No, not at all.
I sensed you suddenly felt uncomfortable.
Well, after all, it was a very tense situation.
But that's what's so odd. It wasn't tense at all. In fact, I sensed no tension from you or Goss.
But I was tense! I was ready to blow it up! I strongly protest!
Screen off.
It was as though you were performing a scene for all of us.
Pardon me, Captain, I believe there's a slight conflict of interest here.
I agree, entirely. Mister Ral asked me not to tell anyone he has empathic powers which he uses to manipulate his competitors in a negotiation. And yes, it did put me in a conflict of interest, which I hope I have now resolved. Premier, I believe Ral has used your fear of continuing aggression between the Federation and its enemies to undermine our position. I also believe that this incident was staged by Ral and Goss to provide you a reason to choose in favour of the Chrysalians.
Captain, it's the shuttlecraft. They're coming back through.
Shuttle nine to Enterprise.
On screen.
This is shuttle nine reporting in.
Barely.
And the Ferengi pod, Commander?
Trapped on the other side, sir.
In the Delta Quadrant. We tried to warn them. They wouldn't follow us.
Elaborate.
Captain, this end of the wormhole is currently stable, but the other end apparently shifts positions periodically.
The Barzan probe had no way to recognise this. Eventually, both sides will be unstable.
It's a dry well, Captain. Worthless.
Acknowledged, Shuttle. Main shuttlebay, prepare for final approach.
Aye, sir.
Captain, DaiMon Goss is demanding to know where his men are.
Advise him to set his coordinates for the Delta Quadrant. He may run into them in eighty years or so.
Mister Ral, congratulations on winning the rights to the Barzan wormhole.
I take the risks, Mister Riker, and I stand by my agreements.
Come in. When do you leave?
Soon. I've been recalled by the Chrysalians. Explanations demanded and so forth.
I'm sorry.
I've done well for them over the years. They understand the stakes. It'll be fine. I had to do it, Troi. Bhavani was ready to go with the Federation. I sensed it. I'd used up every card in the deck. I needed to change the rules.
You must have known I couldn't allow you to do that
My human physical response must have been blocking my Betazoid senses. I'm very grateful for what you did, in a way. It's made me take a hard look at who I am. I don't like what I see. I once asked you to run away with me. Now I'm asking again. I need you. You could help me change. You could be my conscience.
I already have a job as Counsellor. If you want to know what happens to Arridor and Kol in the Delta Quadrant,  here is the tale.
Geordi?
In here, Data.
Got her now. She's trapped. Come on out of there, you. Hey, don't you spit at me.
Why is Spot under the bed?
Probably because she knows if I catch her, I'm going to kill her.
Has Spot been misbehaving?
So far she's broken a vase, a teapot, she's ruined one of my chairs using it as a scratch post, and she's coughing hairballs up all over my carpet.
These incidents are common to cat owners. When you borrowed Spot, you said you wanted to experience the full range of feline behaviour before getting a cat yourself.
Yeah, well, I'm not ready. You can take her back with my blessings. Go ahead, call her.
Spot does not respond to verbal commands.
She won't come when you call her? Data, have you ever considered training this cat?
I never found it to be necessary.
Necessary? Data, the cat is out of control. Half the time I wasn't sure if she was going to lick me or scratch my face off.
I have never experienced this kind of behaviour in Spot. Although she does have the unfortunate habit of jumping on my computer console when I am working.
She needs training.
Riker to senior staff. Please report to the Observation lounge. Mission briefing in ten minutes.
Right, we have to get her out of here. I'll scare her. You grab her when she comes out, okay?
I do not think it would be wise to startle her.
Ready? Ow!
Training. Definitely.
Captain's log, Stardate 47310.2. We're investigating the disappearance of the Medical Transport Fleming somewhere in the Hekaras Corridor. Our search is complicated by the unique properties of this particular region of space.
The Fleming's last contact with Starfleet was four days ago. According to them, there was nothing out of the ordinary when they entered the Corridor.
Data.
The unusually intense tetryon fields in this sector pose a severe navigational hazard to warp driven vessels. The Hekaras Corridor is the only route through the area which is free of tetryon fields. Ships travelling at warp must use the Corridor to ensure safe passage through the region.
How long will it take to complete a level one search?
At least two days, sir. The Corridor is over twelve light years long, and the surrounding tetryon interference will limit our sensor range.
Could we send out reconnaissance probes to supplement the sensors?
They won't be very effective. The interference will make it difficult to maintain contact with the probes. The best we can do is to increase sensor efficiency. We've installed multiphase buffers on all the sensor modules, Captain. It should help a little.
Hekaras Two is inhabited, isn't it? Maybe they've had contact with the Fleming.
They haven't. I've already spoken to the Hekaran government. According to them, only one ship has passed through the system in the last week. It was a Ferengi trader.
The Fleming was carrying a supply of rare biomimetic gel, which is very valuable. Is it possible that the Ferengi might have hijacked it?
I wouldn't put it past them. I think we should prepare for that contingency.
I agreed. All right then. Mister Worf, initiate your search pattern. Let's head in.
Geordi, there has been a slight drop in sensor efficiency. Perhaps we should examine the phase buffers.
No problem, Data. I'll be right with you. Okay, Hansen, transfer EPS conduit thirteen to the stabiliser matrix.
Aye, sir.
Is there a problem with the engines?
No.
Then why are you stabilizing the EPS conduit?
I'm just trying to get a slightly higher power conversion level.
But that would not affect the engines in any way.
I know that, Data. It's not the point.
What is the point?
I'm just trying to get a higher conversion level, that's all.
Why?
You know the Intrepid?
Yes.
Well, their Chief Engineer is Commander Donald Kaplan. He and I went through the Academy together. I just like to make sure that our power conversion levels are a little higher than theirs.
I understand. You are in competition with Mister Kaplan.
You might say that. This is the flagship. We should be better than everybody else.
Then you are trying to outperform the Intrepid.
Actually it's more a point of personal pride. These are my engines. And there's nothing wrong with a little friendly rivalry. Okay. Computer, how much have the conversion levels increased?
Levels are unchanged.
All right, I'll deal with of this later. Let me give you a hand with those sensors.
How's that?
One moment. The phase buffer is functioning within normal parameters. Sensor efficiency has increased by six point seven percent.
Six point seven? One of the stages must still be out of alignment. Let's try junction A nine.
Geordi, I have taken your suggestion regarding Spot.
Coming down.
I have begun training her.
Really?
Yes. I am studying several new techniques.
I began with simple conditioned response exercises and followed with environmental enhancement. Next I plan to explore bioconditioning devices.
Devices?
Such as sensor nets for behaviour modification or biofeedback motivators. Unfortunately, I have been less than successful.
I've got an idea. How about a phaser? A low stun setting at just the right moment might do the trick.
Geordi. I cannot stun my cat.
I was kidding, Data.  Let's see what we've got. No, this isn't it, either.
Clearly there is a misalignment somewhere in this system.
That's for sure. Well, we've got one more possibility. Junction C twelve.
I am somewhat concerned that my training efforts will ultimately fail.
Maybe you're just going about it the wrong way, Data.
I have consulted numerous animal training manuals. Some of them claim that cats are inherently untrainable.
I don't believe that for a second. Listen to me. My sister didn't know a thing about animals and she was able to train her cat. How complicated could it be?
What did she train her cat to do?
She had that cat jumping into her arms on command.
Interesting. Perhaps I could modify your sister's techniques to keep Spot from jumping on console. Do you know how she was able to train her cat?
Well, as I recall, she walked around for two months with a piece of tuna in her blouse.
I was right. This buffer is out of alignment. Okay, try that.
Phase alignment is stabilised. However, sensor efficiency has increased by only an additional one point three percent.
It's not much, but every little bit going to help.
Riker to Data.
Data here.
We're picking up a ship ahead on long range sensors. If you and Geordi are through down there, we'd like to have you on the Bridge.
We're not going to squeeze anything else out of these systems.
Acknowledged, sir. We are on our way.
We are within visual range, sir.
On screen.
It is a Ferengi transport ship, D'Kora class.
That's the same Ferengi vessel that entered the Corridor a week ago.
Captain, there are no emissions from their plasma vents. Their warp drive must be completely inactive.
That is correct, sir. Their impulse system is down as well, Power generation is at extremely low levels.
What about life signs?
Life support systems are also functioning at low levels. There are approximately four hundred fifty Ferengi on board. That is a standard complement for a ship of that class.
Mister Worf, open a hailing frequency.
There is no response on any channel, sir.
I'm not picking any subspace emissions from the ship at all, Captain. It looks like every one of their field coils has been overloaded.
That would explain why they haven't respond to our hails.
It would also explain the failure of their warp drive.
Captain, Ferengi sensors are still online. I could modify one of our deflector emitters to transmit old style delta waves. If I modulate that with a comm. signal, the Ferengi should be able to pick that up.
Make it so.
If they did hijack the Fleming, they sure didn't get very far with the cargo.
Mister Worf, have tractor beams standing by. We may have to take them under tow. Helm, take us within tractor range.
Aye, sir.
Captain, I am picking up power emissions from the Ferengi ship. They are locking weapons.
Shields up.
Ready phasers. Prepare to return fire.
Target their weapons array only.
Phasers locked.
Fire.
Direct hit. Their weapon systems are down.
Damage report.
We sustained minimal damage to decks five and seven, sir.
Sir, the Ferengi ship's power has stabilised. They appear to have impulse capability.
They were just playing dead. Conserving power until we got in close enough.
But why would they attack us in the first place?
Somehow I don't think they'll let us beam over there and ask them.
Mister La Forge, how are you coming with that comm. link?
Almost ready, Captain. All right, let's give it a try.
Open a channel.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise. Will you please explain why you attacked us?
Our attack? We were defending ourselves. Do you deny that you are responsible for disabling my vessel?
DaiMon, your ship was adrift, your communications inoperative. We were attempting to assess your status.
You were attempting to move in for the kill. Do not toy with me, Picard. We are obviously at your mercy, but know this. When the Ferengi Council learns of your actions, they will consider this an act of war.
DaiMon, clearly there has been some misunderstanding. I think it would be in all interests if you were to come aboard and we discuss this situation.
I see no reason to trust you, human.
In that case, we'll be on our way. I'll relay your position to your government if you wish, in case you're unable to complete your repairs and you remain stranded.
Perhaps it would be better to discuss the situation.
We detected what appeared to be a Federation signal buoy. When we approached it, it emitted a massive verteron pulse. Our warp drive, our sensors, our communications systems were all disabled. We assumed we were the victims of a new Federation weapon.
The Federation established this corridor to ensure safe access through this sector. We have nothing to gain from mining it.
Whatever happened to your ship may not have been an isolated incident. A Federation Medical transport was recently lost in that corridor.
We passed a Federation ship several days ago. It did not appear to be in any distress.
Can you give us an idea of its heading?
It is possible that information was recorded in our sensor logs, Commander. Unfortunately, my entire crew is occupied with our repairs. I don't think there will be time to search our records.
DaiMon, if we assigned an Engineering team to assist you with your repair efforts, would that give you time to retrieve your logs?
I believe it would, Captain.
Spot. Spot. Spot, down. Spot, down. Down. Spot.  Down. This is down. Down is good. This is up. Up is no.
One moment. Come in.
Data. I had another idea that might help boost the power conversion levels. Could you give me a hand?
I would be happy to.
Don't tell me you're trying to teach the cat to use the console.
It is part of her training programme. I am teaching Spot to jump down from the desk on my command.
How's it going?
I have not been entirely successful.
Feline supplement number two twenty one.
Data, that cat definitely has a mind of her own. Maybe she's just not trainable.
I suppose I must accept that possibility. It may be that Spot lacks the intelligence necessary to learn the appropriate responses to my commands.
I don't know about Spot, but it seems to me your training is coming along just fine. Come on, let's go.
Data, keep the EPS flow constant will you, while I re modulate the power taps.
This procedure will only increase the conversion level by point eight percent.
I know, but it could be just enough.
Enough?
I just received this from Commander Kaplan, subspace.
La Forge, I got the Intrepid's power conversion levels up to ninety seven point one percent. Maybe you should try cleaning your plasma grid once in a while.
Can you believe the nerve of that guy?
We perform maintenance on the plasma grid at regular intervals.
I know. He's just trying to get me angry. There. That should do it. Computer, what are the current power conversion levels?
Power conversion levels are at ninety seven point two percent.
Too bad, Mister Kaplan.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have traced the Fleming's most likely course. It now appears that the vessel may have come to an unfortunate end.
What's the origin of this debris field?
Unknown, sir. It does not appear in any Federation charts of the Corridor.
Could it be what's left of the Fleming?
It is a possibility. The debris consists primarily of duranium and polycomposite fragments which suggest a ship. Furthermore, the field contains sufficient mass to account for the Fleming.
All right, let's take a closer look. Perhaps we can find something that will give us a more positive identification. Helm, take us through the debris field, ahead slow.
Captain, I am picking up a small metallic object, approximately three point five metres in diameter.
Could be a ship's log recorder, or a probe casing.
I do not believe so. It is emitting an unusual signal. Captain, it is beginning to generate a verteron field.
Shields up! Full reverse. Now!
Damage report.
Warp engines are offline. Shields are down. All subspace systems are inoperative.
Just like the Ferengi ship.
Unidentified ship heading toward us. Two life forms are aboard.
On screen.
Captain, they are initiating their transporter system.
Can we get more power to the shields?
No, sir.
All decks, security alert.
Captain, we are being boarded.
La Forge to Bridge.
We have intruders in main Engineering. I need a security team down here immediately.
It's on its way.
What do you want?
We're trying to make you listen.
You're killing us.
You have made a very serious accusation. I want you to explain it.
Captain, according to our research, warp fields cause a dangerous reaction in this region of space.
Our planet is already being affected. We have measured large gravitational shifts throughout our system.
If something isn't done, our planet will become uninhabitable.
Captain, I've heard this theory before. Their research was evaluated by the Federation Science Council a few years ago. Quite frankly, it didn't hold up.
That research was only preliminary. Our original analysis was incomplete.
If you wanted us to review your research, you should have made a request through the Science Council.
Their resources are limited. It would have taken over a year before they dispatched a science ship to come and evaluate our work.
We were not willing to wait any longer. We knew that if we disabled enough ships, Starfleet would come. Then at least we would be able to present our case.
That's how you rationalise these attacks?
Neither you nor the Ferengi suffered any casualties, Commander. The actual damage to your vessels was negligible.
We dispersed verteron probes in the Corridor merely to disable warp-driven ships. Nothing more.
You can call it whatever you like. The fact remains you deliberately disguised your probes. You made them look like signal markers. You hid them in debris field. You mined the Corridor.
Mister La Forge, how long do you estimate it will take to restore the engines?
Their verteron pulse overloaded our field coils, Captain. It'll take at least thirty six hours to get underway.
I know precisely how our pulse affected your field coils. With my help, your ship could be operational in ten hours. Provided you agree to review our research.
Because of the seriousness of your claim, I'm willing to listen to your case. But let there be no mistake. Our priority here is the recovery of the Fleming. Now I expect you to help us restore our engines and deactivate all of the remaining probes in the Corridor. If you do not, you will both be taken to the brig and from there to the nearest Starbase, where you will answer charges for what you have done.
My sister and I do not wish to impede your rescue process.
Rabal, don't. The probes are the only leverage we have. If we
Serova. We will do as you ask, Captain. But please, re-examine our data.
We will. It is part of our job to retain an open mind, even under these circumstances. Mister La Forge, take them to Engineering. Get the core back online.
Yes, sir.
Mister Data, I want you to review their research. I'd like your report as soon as possible.
There. Shields have been restored. You will be able to reengage your engines in approximately eight hours.
You know, even when we get the engines online, it's going to take at least a week to recalibrate them properly.
I'm sorry you've been inconvenienced. But that's all it is, an inconvenience. Our concerns are much more important than the condition of your engines.
What if the Fleming had been transporting perishable supplies or was on an emergency mission? Your little plan might have cost a lot of lives.
That didn't happen, Commander. And saving lives is precisely what we're trying to do.
Yeah, well, you have a very interesting way of going about it.
There's no point in trying to talk to you. You've already decided not to listen.
Commander, I know my sister can be somewhat, er, aggravating.
I'd have to agree with that.
But please, try to understand. She believes profoundly in this cause. She has sworn to dedicate her life to exposing the dangers of warp drive.
Warp drive has been around for three centuries. It's a proven technology.
And you sound just like I did, about four years ago.
You mean you didn't believe her either?
No. What I didn't realise was just how brilliant my sister is. It took two years of study for me even to grasp the principles behind her theoretical models. They're that sophisticated.
Well our Commander Data's no slouch. If there's anything there, he'll find it.
Well I hope so, because once we persuade Starfleet to stop warp travel through the Corridor, we're going to have to convince our own people to give up warp drive completely.
Hekaras Two is the only inhabited world in this region. Without warp drive, you'd be completely isolated from the rest of the Federation. Are you really willing to take that step?
Yes. And if you were in my position, I hope you'd be willing to do the same thing.
Serova and Rabal believe there are regions of potential subspace instability within the Corridor. They believe that if these regions continue to be exposed to warp field energy, they will rupture. Subspace will extrude into normal space, forming a rift.
It's like pacing up and down on the same piece of carpet. Eventually you wear it out.
That analogy is essentially correct, sir.
Can this theory be proven?
Not at this time, sir. There is insufficient evidence to do so. In order to determine whether or not a rift will form, region must be exposed to warp field energy approximately one million times greater than that normally generated by a starship.
Commander, we believe the warp field effect is cumulative. Each starship that passes through the Corridor at warp brings us one step closer to forming a rift.
I agree that is a possibility. Captain, I suggest we ask the Federation Science Council to send a research vessel to this area. A more detailed investigation would resolve many of our questions.
That's your response? More research? More delays. I suppose I shouldn't have expected anything different.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Number One.
We've located the
Fleming on long range sensors, approximately zero point three light years away.
What's their condition?
The vessel appears to be intact. They have shields, but it looks like their subspace systems are out.
Very well.
We'll be underway as soon as our engines are online.
Aye, sir.
I would like you all to put together a research proposal for the Science Council. I'll give it my full recommendation.
Captain, I appreciate the opportunity you're giving us. It's a beginning that we need
Not we. You can do whatever you want, Rabal. I'll have no part of this. It's just another delay.
Captain, the engines are back online. All systems are ready.
Very good. Helm, lay in a course for the Fleming.
Aye, sir.
They appear to be in pretty good condition. According to our sensors their shields back to full strength.
Captain, the Hekaran ship is moving off. There is one person on board. It is Serova.
Doctor, what is going on?
I don't know. Captain, may I speak to her?
Mister Worf, open a channel.
Serova, what are you trying to do?
They wanted proof. I'm going to give it to them. I'm sorry.
Captain, the Hekaran ship's engines are beginning to overload. I believe Serova's attempting to create a warp core breach.
No!
Prepare for impact.
Shields at maximum. Full reverse.
Report!
We have cleared the shock wave. However, tetryon flux in the area is increasing rapidly.
It's incredible.
Mister Data, what's your analysis?
The event is approximately zero point one light years in diameter, and it is emitting extremely high levels of tetryon radiation. It appears to be what Rabal and Serova predicted, a subspace rift.
She was right.
Can you get a fix on the Fleming? Is she still in one piece?
Scanning. The Fleming is near its previous coordinates. It appears to be intact, but it is now within the rift.
Doctor, is it possible for a ship to survive in there? Doctor. I'm sorry about your loss but we need your help now.
Of course, Captain.
Does the rift pose any danger to the Fleming?
I don't know.
What was that?
Some kind of high energy distortion wave. Looks like they're being generated from within the rift.
IF we maintain our current position, our shields should provide sufficient protection.
What about the Fleming? How long can they survive in there?
The waves are even more intense within the rift. I estimate her shields will fail in approximately twelve hours.
Can we risk going in there to get them out?
Not at warp, Commander. According to these readings, the rift is in a state of accelerating instability which would make it extremely sensitive to warp field energy. If we go in at warp, we might make it expand even further.
I don't think we have a choice. It would take weeks to reach them at impulse.
I want some better options. Data, Geordi, take Doctor Rabal and begin an analysis of the rift. We need to find some way to get the Fleming out of there.
Second Officer:Second Officer's log, stardate 47312.1. Our new sensor readings have greatly improved our understanding of the rift. However, we have been unable to find any way to counteract it.
Everything here supports Serova's theories. I can't find any way to close the rift or even reduce its size.
Doctor, is it possible there are areas inside the rift which are stable, where we can safely use our warp engines?
Perhaps. Computer, scan the rift for regions of low instability.
There's no area stable enough to withstand a warp pulse.
Wait a minute. This is strange. Computer, display grid delta seventeen. Enhance and magnify. What do you make of that?
It's a subspace instability outside the rift.
That should not be possible.
Commander, I'm going to begin a field enhanced scan of this sector. I'd like to take a closer look at this.
In the meantime, we'd better tell the Captain we don't know how to get to the Fleming.
I am not certain that is true. I believe I have an idea.
I suggest we coast into the rift.
Coast?
We can initiate a brief, high intensity warp pulse from our current position. We should be able to attain sufficient velocity to enter the rift, beam the crew off the Fleming and exit without using our warp engines.
All right, let's say we initiate a full power warp pulse. How much time do we need to drop out of warp?
If we field saturate the nacelles, we should be able to sustain warp speed for approximately two minutes.
That doesn't give us much time, and it could get pretty rough in there.
The timing will be critical.
Begin your calculations, Mister Data. We'll go as soon as you're ready.
Aye, sir.
I believe the maximum saturation level should be eighteen point three percent.
All right. With these parameters, we should be able to maintain warp speed for two minutes eight seconds. I don't think we can get any more than that.
I agree. But based on the size of the rift, it should give us sufficient time to complete the rescue. Computer, initiate nacelle field saturation.
How did we miss it, Data?
I beg your pardon?
How did we miss the connection between warp drive and the formation of the rift? Between the two of us we've logged thousands of hours on these engines. We're supposed to be warp field experts. We certainly were wrong this time.
Technically, Geordi, we were not wrong. Serova's theories rested on assumptions which were unprovable.
Seems to me she managed to prove them pretty conclusively.
By using methods any reputable scientist would never employ.
Yeah, she was willing to die to make her point. We should have listened to her more closely, Data.
We reviewed Serova's research to the best of our abilities, and we were prepared to continue studying the problem. But that was not satisfactory.
Yeah, I can remember times when I was a little stubborn, trying to get people to believe me when I didn't have enough proof.
I do not believe that you would have resorted to such extremes.
But she had to, just to get us to listen. Why was I so resistant?
Perhaps because her aggressive methods created an adversarial situation.
Yeah. Maybe I was taking the whole thing personally.
I do not understand.
Maybe I was a little threatened. The thought that warp engines might be doing some kind of damage. It's going to take another half an hour for the nacelles to saturate. Will you call me when they're done?
Commander.
May I join you?
I wanted to say I'm sorry about your sister.
Thank you. I'm trying to tell myself that she died for what she believed in, but somehow that isn't much comfort.
I wish it could have happened differently. Maybe I should have looked at the research more closely. It's possible there's something that I missed.
No. You didn't miss anything. The problem was time. We needed more time to do the proper research. Serova wasn't willing to wait.
No. I guess the question is now, where do we go from here?
I don't think we can look at space travel the same way anymore. We're going to have to change.
I've been in Starfleet for a long time. We depend on warp drive. I just don't know how easy it's going to be to change.
It won't be easy at all.
Captain, warp pulse calculations are complete. We will be firing the engines at maximum intensity for six point three seconds before disengaging.
Damage control teams are standing by on all decks.
The course to the Fleming is plotted and laid in, sir.
Mister La Forge, whenever you're ready.
Aye, sir.
Initiating warp pulse now.
Engines disengaged. We are now entering the rift.  Hull stress is increasing. Eighty three percent of maximum tolerance and rising.
How long until we reach the Fleming?
One minute twenty two seconds.
All transporter rooms are standing by.
Captain, I am picking up power emissions from the Fleming. They may be attempting to initiate their warp drive.
They might have been able to repair their engines.
Captain, if they activate
I know, Mister Data. Can we establish communication?
No, sir. Subspace interference is too high.
How long until we reach transporter range?
Fifty three seconds.
I don't think we're going to make it.
Captain, they have initiated their warp drive.
Report.
Damage on decks six and fourteen. Our structural integrity field is holding.
What about the Fleming?
They are badly damaged, sir. Their life support systems are failing.
All transporter rooms, prepare emergency evacuation procedures.
Captain, when the Fleming activated their warp drive, the rift expanded by two point three percent. We no longer have sufficient momentum to escape.
Distortion wave intensity has increased by a factor of ten.
We are within transporter range of the Fleming, sir. Commencing evacuation procedures.
Distortion waves occurring every fifty nine seconds. Hull stress is nearing maximum tolerance.
Data, what if we forced an EPS discharge through the impulse reactor. Would that be enough to get us out of here?
I do not believe so, sir, and the resulting explosion would likely destroy the saucer section in the process.
Captain
We might be able to get out of here without using the warp engines.
How, Geordi?
When was the last time you went surfing, Commander?
A distortion wave.
Exactly, Captain. If can phase match our deflector shield
To the EM variance of the distortion wave, when the next one hits we'll be pulled along with it.
We could ride it through the rift and then break away once we're clear. That is, if we survive the ride.
Is everyone off the Fleming?
The last of the crew has been beamed aboard, sir.
All right, Mister La Forge, get us out of here.
Yes, sir. Phase matching the deflectors shield now.
The next distortion wave will impact in fourteen seconds.
Matching phases. Prepare to engage the deflector shield on my mark.
Ten seconds.
And mark.
Engage deflector shield. Full power.
We lost it.
We were unable to maintain phase match with the distortion wave, sir.
What went wrong, Mister La Forge?
The speed differential was too high, Captain.
Another distortion wave approaching. Impact in twenty six seconds.
Our hull stress is already critical. We can't handle many more jolts like that.
Captain, I suggest we take the ship to full impulse. If we can attain sufficient speed, it will lessen the shock when the wave hits.
Helm, full impulse. Head us out of the rift. Mister Worf, channel all available power to the structural integrity fields.
Aye, sir.
Stand by deflector shield.
We're ready, Captain.
Distortion wave impact in five seconds.
Engage deflector shield, now.
We are now within the distortion wave. Hull stresses have exceeded maximum tolerance.
Structural integrity fields are failing on decks ten through sixteen. Switching to backups.
We're separating from the distortion wave. I'm attempting to compensate.
How much longer until we clear the rift?
Approximately twelve seconds, sir. Hull stresses one hundred twenty percent above tolerance.
A structural breach is imminent.
We have cleared the rift, sir. Hull stress has returned to normal.
Cancel red alert.
Captain's log, stardate 47314.5. We have been continuing our research, while the Federation Council studies our preliminary reports on the subspace rift. It now appears certain that what we've seen here will have repercussions for many years to come.
Our scans have shown a lot of subspace instabilities throughout the sector. If they're exposed to enough warp energies, they could eventually create other rifts.
Doctor Rabal?
Based on current warp drive patterns in the sector, we've projected where subspace rifts will be most likely to be formed over the next forty years. This is the way things are now. This is how they'll look in ten years. Twenty years. Thirty years. Forty years.
Thank you, Doctor, Mister La Forge.
Ah. We've received new directives from the Federation Council on this matter. Until we can find a way to counteract the warp field effect, the Council feels our best course is to slow the damage as much as possible. Therefore, areas of space found susceptible to warp fields will be restricted to essential travel only, and effective immediately all Federation vessels will be limited to a speed of warp five, except in cases of extreme emergency.
The Klingons will observe these restrictions, but the Romulans will not.
And what about the Ferengi? And the Cardassians, for that matter?
The Federation's sharing all our data with warp-capable species. We can only hope that they realise it's in their own interests and take similar action.
Putting limits on warp speed is only going to prevent other rifts from forming. What are we going to do about this one?
Unfortunately, right now there's not much we can do.
The gravitational shifts have already begun to affect my planet's orbit. Our climate is changing.
The Federation is setting up a weather control matrix on Hekaras Two. It's only a temporary solution, but it should suffice for now.
We're lucky the rift took place as far away from the planet as it did. It gives us some time to consider our options.
If there are no more questions, you're all dismissed.
We should have those thermal stabilisers ready for the Hekarans in another day, sir.
Very well. You know, Geordi, I spent the better part of my life exploring space. I've charted new worlds, I've met dozens of new species. And I believe that these were all valuable ends in themselves. Now it seems that all this while, I was helping to damage the thing that I hold most dear.
It's won't turn out that way, Captain. We still have time to make it better.
Come.
You wanted to see me, Captain?
Yes, Mister La Forge. It seems that the exemplary nature of your work has caught the attention of Starfleet Command. In fact, someone is coming on board just to see the engine modifications you've made.
Who, Captain?
The Senior Design Engineer of the Theoretical Propulsion Group. Doctor Leah Brahms.
Leah is coming here? This is terrific.
It is?
Well, I mean, I've studied her schematics for years. She was responsible for a lot of the engine design on the Enterprise.
Well, it should be a very enjoyable visit, then. She'll be transporting on board as soon as we reach the Starbase. Would you like to greet her on our behalf?
I would love to, Captain. Thank you.
If you keep picking at that uniform you'll wear it out.
I guess I am a little nervous. It's not every day a man comes face to face with his dream.
What?
You remember about a year ago when we were caught in that booby trap the Menthars set? Okay. While we were trying to get out of it, I went down to the holodeck to study an engine prototype that was made when the Enterprise was first designed. And the computer, well, it gave me an image of the engine but it also created this hologram of the designer. Doctor Leah Brahms.
So you met a computer-simulated female.
Yeah, but not an ordinary computer-simulated female. I mean, she was brilliant, of course, but warm, you know? Friendly. It' was like we worked as one. I would start a sentences, she'd finish it. What I didn't think of, she did. It was just so comfortable. Okay, I know it was just a holographic image but the computer was able to incorporate personality traits from her Starfleet record.
You know, Geordi, everybody falls in love with a fantasy every now and then.
No, no, Guinan, see, you've got it all wrong. I'm not necessarily expecting anything romantic here. It's just I know whatever, Leah Brahms and I are going to be good friends.
Doctor Brahms is ready to transport, sir.
Okay, bring her over.
Hi. I mean, welcome aboard, Doctor Brahms. I'm Lieutenant Commander Geordi La Forge, Chief Engineer.
La Forge. So you're the one who's fouled up my engine designs.
The matter-antimatter ratio has been changed. The mixture isn't as rich as regulations dictate.
Experience has shown me that too high a ratio diminishes efficiency. I worked with the mixture until I got the right balance.
The magnetic plasma transfer to the warp field generators doesn't correspond to the recommended specs.
Right. Again, I adjusted the flow. Sometimes things happen a little differently here is space than they do on the drawing board.
Is that a criticism, Commander?
No, of course not. It's just a well known fact. There's theory and there's application. They don't always jibe.
You've charted a completely new swap-out schedule for main components replacement.
You bet. I found the Starfleet estimates for the MTBF units to be unrealistic. I simply determined my own schedule based on observation and experience.
Is that going to be your only defence, Commander, that same tired rhetoric? Out here in the field we learn things you designers couldn't possibly understand.
In the first place, Doctor, I'm not aware of needing any defence. And in the second place, if you're determined to be.
Doctor Brahms, you have an incoming message on subspace.
I'd like to hear this message privately.
In my office. Be my guest.
Thank you.
Commander, I am picking up some unusual readings from the Alpha Omicron system. At this range, all I am able to discern is that it is an asymmetrical field of intense energy.
What type of radiation signature?
Unknown, sir. The Alpha Omicron system is yet to be charted. I recommend we take this opportunity for further research.
Well, we're way ahead of schedule. Alter course for Alpha Omicron.
Doctor Brahms, there's no reason for us to argue. We're on the same side here.
I'm aware of that.
So, why don't I take you on a little tour, show you the adjustments I've made, why I think they work and we can begin pulling together on this? Okay. Then why not start with the dilithium chamber. Okay?
Okay.
The anomaly is orbiting the seventh planet, sir. It is a mass of plasma energy contained within discrete boundaries by an outer covering of silicates, actinides, and carbonaceous chondrites.
On screen. Magnify. Is it a ship?
It does not conform to any known design.
Any records of similar phenomena in Starfleet listings?
None, sir. This has never been seen before.
Ensign Rager, ahead one quarter impulse.
Aye, sir.
Put us in orbit of the seventh planet. Keep us at a relative distance of ten kilometres from the object.
Alert science stations to standby. Tell them to coordinate all efforts with Commander Data.
Aye, sir.
What happened here? Who did this?
You remember, the crystal's been reoriented to adjust the direction of the lattice structure.
Remember? Why would I remember?
Right, why would you? Well, the ship was experiencing some difficulty, and we made this adjustment hoping that it would work, and it did.
So it was your idea?
Not exclusively, no.
It's curious. this modification was due to be introduced.
In the next class starship.
Yes. How did you know?
I didn't. I mean, well, it's the next logical step, right? Listen, Doctor, sometimes we have to fly by the seat of our pants out here so it stands to reason that once in a while we're going to come up with the same solutions you do. Listen. I've got a personnel review scheduled to start in about five minutes, and I know it's been a long day for you. So, why don't we get together later? Sort of plan our agenda for the next day or two?
Agenda?
What it is we want to accomplish here, how we might best go about that, maybe even get to know each other a little bit. It might make this easier.
Maybe you're right.
Okay, great. How about my quarters. Nineteen hundred hours? Maybe even have a bite to eat? I make a great fungilli.
I love fungilli.
Is that right?
Sensors are having difficulty penetrating the interior. However, the radiated output suggests a coherent system of energy storage and utilisation.
Then it was constructed by someone?
It is a possibility. However, the sensor data gathered thus far suggests a naturally occurring phenomenon with biological properties.
A life form.
Yes, Captain.
Mister Worf, begin compiling readings for transmission to Starfleet Headquarters. Mister Data, prepare to launch three level-five probes. Ensign, aft thrusters. Standard observation posture.
Level-five probe sequence ready for launch, Commander. On your mark.
Stand by, Mister Data.
Aye, sir. PICARD What would it be like, Counsellor? No ship, no bulky spacesuit. Just to live between the stars, have the entire galaxy as a home.
Captain, we are being probed. Recommend we raise shields.
Negative, Mister Worf. If we are curious about it, it has a perfect right to be curious about us.
Change in readings, sir. The life form has increased its energy output by fifty percent.
It is moving toward us.
Reverse course, Ensign, three hundred kph.
Aye, sir.
Easy, we don't want to alarm or provoke it.
We are caught in an energy damping field, sir.
Raise shields.
No effect, Captain.
Reverse power, full impulse.
Impulse engines at full power.
No change in position.
Red alert!
Mister La Forge, prepare to initiate warp drive.
Sorry, Captain. There's too much interference to form a warp field.
Warning. Radiation levels at sixty five millirads per minute and rising.
Riker to Doctor Crusher.
Go ahead, Commander.
All decks prepare for radiation protocol.
Acknowledged. Crusher out.
Warning. Radiation levels at three hundred millirads per minute and rising. Lethal exposure in one minute.
Mister Worf, ready phasers. Minimum power.
Ready.
Fire.
Radiation levels dropping back to normal, Captain. Energy patterns are breaking down, sir. The radiation signature is no longer stable.
Energy output is negligible, sir. Radiation patterns no longer coherent. I believe it is dead, sir.
We're out here to explore, to make contact with other life forms, to establish peaceful relations but not to interfere. And absolutely not to destroy. And yet look what we have just done.
Captain, everything you did was consistent with established Starfleet procedures.
Number One, you have the Bridge.
Captain, sensors are picking up a new energy reading from the life form.
Elaborate, Data.
There is a new concentration of ionising radiation growing in the centre of its body.
Then, perhaps it's still alive.
Okay. Computer, subdued lighting. No, that's too much. I don't want it dark, I want it cozy.
Please state your request in precise candlepower.
See, it's not a matter of precision, computer, it's a matter of mood. Brighter than this. More. More. A little more. Hold. Right there. Perfect. Now, some music. Maybe a little soft jazz. No, that's not right. Let me think here. Oh, I got it! Some Brahms! A piano etude. Nah, that's too corny. Probably everybody thinks of that. Computer, just give me some guitar. Classical guitar. Doesn't matter who. Yes, thank you.
Come on in.
Oh, you've changed.
Yeah. The uniforms are so formal.
You're less formal than any Starfleet officer I've ever met, Commander.
Am I? I really just wanted to make you feel more comfortable.
I'm fine. Thank you.
I'm sorry. Come in and have a seat. Can I get you a drink?
No, thank you.
You sure? You know, your hair, it's different.
Different than a few hours ago?
No, I mean it's different than I expected. Different from your Starfleet records.
Oh. Yes, I used to wear it up.
Yeah.
Why would you need to see my personnel file?
Standard procedure when guests come on board. Protocol. I mean, it was nothing specific, actually. Just, you know.
Commander La Forge, if I seem to be somewhat unyielding in my views, it's because I care so very much about my work.
Oh, I know.
To be honest, people find me cold, cerebral, lacking in humour.
But they're wrong, I assure you.
Well, I try not to be that way, but when it comes to my designs, my engines, especially the ones on the Enterprise.
It's like they're your children.
Yes. Exactly.
So naturally you're a little possessive about them.
You understand that?
Yes, I do. You see, I feel the same way.
That's amazing. I don't think anyone has ever. Sometimes I feel more comfortable with engine schematics than people.
Well, maybe you just haven't met the right people. You hungry? I'm hungry. Why don't I just start dinner, okay?
Commander.
Please, call me Geordi.
I'm sorry, I hope that I didn't put you to a lot of trouble but I can't stay.
You can't?
I just don't think that it's appropriate.
Oh.
I'll meet with you at oh eight hundred tomorrow. I'm preparing a list of discrepancies that I've identified in your modifications. I hope, now that we've reached an understanding that you'll be prepared to discuss them with me in a more objective fashion.
Sure. Fine.
Thank you. Goodnight, Commander.
Goodnight.
This new concentration of energy was detected only after the surrounding material became inert.
Could this be some sort of tissue regeneration?
The radiation signature is similar to the original pattern, but with significant differences.
Some kind of reaction to our phaser fire, perhaps.
I believe it is separate and self-contained within the body of the dead life form.
Another entity.
Yes, sir. It appears to be a smaller, less developed version of the original creature.
No wonder it attacked us. It was about to give birth.
Doctor.
It's dangerous to generalise about new life forms, but based on my experience with other beings who bear their young in this manner, I'd say that the offspring is still premature. Otherwise, it would be able to break through the outer body shell of the parent.
Will this creature be able to survive on its own without the parent?
There's no way to tell. We don't have enough information about the bio-functions of the adult, much less the child.
Is there something we can do to help?
If we were in Sickbay, I'd try a Caesarean section. The first priority is to free it from the body of the parent.
We could use our phasers as a scalpel.
Yes, that might work.
I advise against this, Captain. The parent proved to be a threat to the ship. We do not know how the offspring will react.
Your objection is noted, Mister Worf, but we are directly responsible for the death of the parent. We cannot simply wash our hands of it now. Doctor, we will proceed at your discretion.
Good morning.
Good morning.
The first thing I'd like to do is inspect the power transfer conduits.
You realise the only way to inspect them is to crawl inside.
I designed them, Commander. I know what's involved.
Here we go. Power taps. Watch yourself.
The acoustic signature doesn't sound right.
You're probably the only other person in the galaxy who could pick that up.
What's causing it?
It's right up here.
I've never seen anything like this before. What is it?
It's a mid-range phase adjuster. Puts the plasma back into phase after inertial distortion.
This has never been done before. I don't even think this has ever been conceived of before. You should write a scientific paper.
Uh-uh, Doctor, no. Writing is not one of my strong suits.
But this kind of refinement should be shared, and you deserve the credit for it.
Well, maybe we could collaborate. Writing is one of your strong points.
Commander La Forge, ever since I came on board, there seems to be something a little peculiar about your attitude. You seem to know things about me, even though we've never met.
Well, to tell you the truth, I've studied you. Your writings, your Starfleet file. I've admired you. You know, your work.
Well, I'm flattered, but.
And, well, I really, I really wanted to meet you for a long time, And I'd like to think that we could become friends. Maybe good friends.
I thought you knew. I mean, you know everything else about me, but Commander, if I'm hearing what I think I'm hearing, then you should know that I'm married.
Set phaser power to three percent, narrow beam.
Three percent.
All right, here we go.
The first incision is complete.
Ideally the offspring should now be able to push through the outer shell of the parent by itself.
I think it needs a little more help.
We've done all we can. I don't want to risk hitting the offspring by accident.
Come on. You can do it.
Captain, I'd like to announce the birth of a large baby something.
Well done, Doctor. Well done.
How could it have been so far off? It was based on every piece of information on record about Leah Brahms. Okay, with an admitted margin for error. but this is an error that's a light year wide.
Not what you hoped for, huh?
Hoped? Guinan, the woman is about as friendly as a Circassian plague cat, only cares about her work, hates what I've done to her engines, and to top it off she's married. Computer never even told me she was married.
Computer glitch?
Must have been.
Maybe it was your old visor.
What are you talking about?
The one you wore when you were on the holodeck with her.
Guinan, it's the same visor.
Really? Oh, I figured it was probably the one that lets you see what you want to see.
What's that supposed to mean?
You saw exactly what you wanted to see in the holodeck. Sure, the computer made it look like her, gave it personality, but when it came to the relationship. La Forge, you filled in the blanks. And you had a perfectly wonderful, marvellous little fantasy. until the real Leah showed up and ruined it. She's probably done the most horrific thing one person can do to another, not live up to your expectations. So I'd take a good, hard, long look at her, La Forge. See her for who she is, not for what you want her to be.
The life form's patterns are stable, Captain. It seems able to withstand the solar radiation.
Good. Ensign, set course for the Guernica system.
Aye, sir.
We're not staying?
No, Number One. We've done all we can to help. Now it's time to move on. This creature can continue its existence without any further interference from us.
It might be wise to put some distance between us before we initiate warp drive.
Very well. Five hundred kph. Ensign. Engage.
Captain, it is following us. Maintaining a distance of four kilometres, directly astern.
Seventeen degrees to port, Ensign.
Aye, sir.
It is turning with us, sir.
Increase to half impulse.
It is matching our velocity.
It's imprinted on us. It thinks the Enterprise is its mother.
A change in energy readings, sir. I am reading an internal buildup of gamma particles in
Its velocity is increasing. It is moving directly toward the ship.
Evasive manoeuvres, full.
Report.
Minor damage.
The creature is now in direct contact with the hull, sir.
On screen.
Mister Data?
Sir, the life form is draining energy directly from the fusion reactors.
It's feeding off the energy of the Enterprise as it would from its mother.
What action should we take, sir?
None, Lieutenant. None at all.
Captain's log, supplemental. Since the newborn has attached itself to the hull, it has been making greater and greater demands on the ship's energy, but we have been able to stabilise our power systems temporarily.
How long before the power drain becomes critical, Mister La Forge?
If it continues to increase at the current rate, six, maybe seven hours.
We may be able to modify the engine to extend that a little longer, Captain.
Your help would be appreciated, Doctor.
By then, Junior may not need us any more.
Mister Data, is there any way to determine what the destination of the parent might have been?
I can attempt to extrapolate from the heading it was on when we encountered it, sir.
Perhaps it was its way to a safe and supportive environment for its newborn.
We might be able to deliver it to the same destination.
Which brings up the question of how do we get Junior off the hull once we get there.
It's almost completely covering the door of shuttlebay two. If we open the door and deactivate the atmospheric force field.
the pressure from inside the ship might push it away from the hull.
Make it so.
Sir, is the appellation Junior to be the life form's official name?
No, it is not.
We can save a lot of energy just by improving engine efficiency.
We've run into similar problems before. That's actually why I reoriented the dilithium crystal.
And why you added the mid-range phase adjusters?
Right.
Commander it seems that you've made a lot more modifications than I'm aware of. Do you have a file on all the work you've done?
It's in the computer.
Picard to La Forge.
La Forge here.
Commander, I need to see you on the Bridge.
On my way, Captain. You go on ahead, Doctor. Ensign Palvik can show you the file on the engine modifications.
Phase coils upgraded to fifty five field densities. Plasma inducers interlinked with generator. Ensign, would there be any other files with data on the original engine specifications?
I believe so, Doctor.
This file utilises the prototype engine schematic.
It's a holographic programme, set in the drafting room at Utopia Planitia.
I'll run it on holodeck three.
Computer replay programme nine one four zero. Engine schematic at Utopia Planitia.
Programme loaded and ready.
She went where?
Holodeck three, sir. I didn't think there was anything wrong with her seeing the file.
Of course not. Nothing at all.
HOLO LEAH:I'm with you every day, Geordi. Every time you look at this engine, you're looking at me. Every time you touch it, it's me.
Computer, freeze programme.
Now I understand.
No, you don't. It's not the way this may look.
I called up a replay of the programme file. I was all ready to compliment you again, Commander, for constructing a programme which contained the prototype engine so that you would always have a baseline reference for your modifications. And now I find that it's all about a fantasy plaything.
It's not like that, I swear.
I'm outraged by this. I have been invaded. Violated. How dare you use me like this? How far did it go, anyway? Was it good for you?
Nothing like that happened. It was a professional collaboration.
Oh, I can tell. Every time you're touching the engine you're touching me. Real professional.
Look, if you watched the whole programme, you saw what it was. We were working together to solve a problem in a crisis situation.
How do I know how far it went? How many other programs did you create? Perhaps dozens of them, one for every day of the week, one for every mood.
All right, look. Ever since you came on board, you've been badgering me and I've taken it. I've shown you courtesy, and respect, and a hell of a lot of patience. Oh, no, no, no, wait a minute. I've tried to understand you. I've tried to get along with you. And in return, you've accused, tried and convicted me without bothering to hear my side of it. So, I'm guilty, okay? But not of what you think. Of something much worse. I'm guilty of reaching out to you, of hoping we could connect. I'm guilty of a terrible crime, Doctor. I offered you friendship.
Captain, its total volume has increased by eight point five percent in the last three hours. I now read it at forty six million cubic metres.
Captain, I have completed the analysis of the parent's course through this system.
It was headed for an asteroid belt.
Ensign Rager, set course two five nine mark three one eight, half impulse.
Aye, sir.
Hold a position five hundred kilometres from the periphery of the asteroid field.
Aye, sir.
Difficulty getting a clear sensor reading beyond four thousand kilometres.
The asteroids contain large quantities of meklonite, which is interfering with our scanners. I am also detecting traces of kephneum, a compound found in the outer shell of the parent being. It is likely the asteroids provide sustenance for this lifeform, sir.
We could leave the child here. If Data's right, it would have an ample supply of food.
Agreed. Mister La Forge, are you ready to separate our guest from the hull?
Ready, Captain.
Proceed.
I am deactivating the atmospheric force field now.
Engineering, report.
Power drain just jumped to ninety three percent, sir.
Captain, the offspring is emitting high frequency radio transmissions.
Is it trying to communicate?
The power drain is increasing, Approaching auto-shutdown.
Take the engines offline. Supplement with auxiliary power only. All decks go to emergency level seven. Life support and critical operations only.
Mister La Forge, what is your status?
Sorry, Captain.
The bay's been completely depressurised, but it's still hanging on.
I am detecting other radio transmissions, Captain.
Sensors detect movement within the asteroid field. Bearing two five seven mark one six one.
On screen. Magnify.
At their current speed, sir, the entities will intercept us in ten minutes, thirty one seconds.
Weapons status?
Auxiliary power only. Two seconds phaser fire available.
Ensign, power readings.
We're on auxiliary generators. life support is functioning, that's about all.
Keep your eye on that generator console. We've got less than six minutes to get that baby off our back before his relatives get here. Whatever we try, Junior responds by sucking up more energy.
Commander, I have a thought. If you're interested.
Of course. What is it?
If the baby is nursing, perhaps what we need is to find a way to sour the milk. If we could contaminate the energy he's feeding on, we could try to
make it unpalatable somehow. But the emergency generators are all we've got.
And how do we modify them without losing life support?
Exactly. Unless.
What?
Well. this is a space baby, right? I mean, these creatures are born, live, and die in interstellar space.
Apparently.
Okay. All matter in space vibrates in a specific radiation band.
Twenty one centimetres. That's good, Commander, that's very good. If we could alter the power frequency so that it's completely foreign to the life form's natural vibrations
It might just give us enough to pour a little vinegar in baby's milk.
We have to be careful, though. If we upset it this time, we might lose auxiliary power too.
If we're gradual enough it won't be such a shock. Hopefully it'll just lose interest. La Forge to Bridge.
Go ahead.
Captain, Doctor Brahms and I have a plan.
Two minutes until the creatures intercept, Captain.
Captain, we're ready down here.
Proceed.
Lowering wavelength in the energy system now.
Reading eighteen, fifteen thirteen, eleven, eight, five, three. Now at the two centimetre level.
Any reaction, Bridge?
Negative. I detect no reduction in the life form's rate of energy consumption.
One minute thirty seconds to intercept.
Okay not sour enough. Leah, take it down further.
Reading one, point eight, point four
Point two.
I guess it noticed what we're doing.
The lifeform is emitting its high frequency transmission. Energy consumption is rising, sir.
Captain, the creatures are accelerating their approach. They are changing colour.
Mister La Forge.
Captain.
Just a little more time. Leah, nudge it down even further, toward point oh two.
Thirty seconds to intercept.
Point oh eight.
Oh five, oh three.
Now at point oh two centimetres.
Auxiliary generators losing power, Captain.
The entity has disengaged, sir. Power levels are returning to normal, Captain.
Bring the engines online and take us out of here.
Aye, sir.
Mister La Forge, Doctor Brahms, congratulations. You've weaned the baby.
Good work.
You, too.
Yeah, I admit it. I did get a little attached to that lady in the holodeck.
The computer never told you that I was married?
I never asked. And the computer is notorious for not volunteering information.
You know, I really owe you an apology.
No, you don't. I should have told you straight out.
Well if you had, then I never would've got a chance to see the look on your face when you walked in on me and me in the holodeck.
The look on my face? How about the look on your face? I will remember that for a long, long time.
I wouldn't change a thing. Except for the way I behaved. I guess I came here with my own set of preconceptions about you.
Well, I guess I'm just glad that I got the opportunity to get to know you. The real you.
Me, too.
Worf to La Forge. There is an incoming message on subspace for Doctor Brahms.
Acknowledged, Worf. La Forge out.
My husband.
We've got a problem. Our core fragment is going to pass by Moab Four in six days.
Isn't that exactly what we anticipated?
We didn't anticipate that somebody would be living there.
An artificial environment has been constructed on the southern continent, sir.
Have you definitely established that there's someone's inside it?
Yes, Captain. Sensors are reading human life forms.
Human?
Are they responding to our hails, Mister Worf?
Negative, sir.
Any starships ever reported missing in this sector, Mister Data?
No, sir.
How the hell did they find themselves on a deserted planet?
I'm pretty sure they know we're here.
Mister La Forge?
Our sensors are picking up deep EM readings. Looks like wave patterns from an obsolete subspace relay.
Which would suggest they also have the ability to communicate with us.
Mister Worf, open the lower band frequencies most commonly used in the last century.
Channel open.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise. It is urgent that you respond.
Sir, defensive shield around the structure is increasing in strength.
Not exactly a welcome mat.
We mean you no harm. We must warn you that your planet is about to experience massive seismic disruptions due to an approaching stellar core fragment. No structure will be able to withstand them.
They are responding.
On screen.
Enterprise, I am Aaron Conor.
Mister Conor, we were unaware that there were human colonies in this system.
I don't want to be rude, Captain, but we don't wish to interact with outsiders. I'm only responding because of your warning.
The fragment will have serious effects on your planet within six days.
Yes, I know. We have been tracking it. But our biosphere has been constructed to withstand quakes of eight point seven on the Richter Scale.
Mister Data?
The fragment has a density of one hundred billion kilograms per cubic centimetre. As a result, when it passes Moab Four, it will cause tectonic shifts well beyond eight point seven on the Richter Scale.
I'm afraid we're going to have to evacuate your people.
Evacuate? That is not possible. There must be an alternative.
Well, we will gladly explore the possibility of it with you, Mister Conor. Would you like to come aboard to discuss it?
Our environment is sealed. No one can get in or out.
We are capable of matter-energy transport.
Matter-energy?
We can take you directly through the structure.
Really? That's quite remarkable.
May we arrange for your transport?
No, I must stay here. But under the circumstances, I will permit a small delegation from your ship inside the biosphere. If only to see this matter-energy transportation you speak of.
Very good. Commander Riker and an away team will join you shortly. Picard out.
This is a mistake, Aaron.
Good Lord, Martin. What would you have me do?
Anything that would keep them out of here.
We have nothing to hide.
We have a great deal to lose.
What is that?
It's them. Look at this, Martin.
It's lovely I can understand why you are reluctant to leave, Mister Conor.
Not just reluctant, Miss Troi. It is imperative that we remain.
It would be suicide to evacuate. It would destroy everything we've worked for two centuries to accomplish.
You see, this is an engineered society.
Engineered?
Genetically engineered. Our ancestors came from Earth to develop a perfect society. They believed that through controlled procreation, they could create people without flaws and those people would build a paradise.
All of you have been selectively bred? Your DNA patterns chosen?
Eight generations of us.
We have immeasurably extended the potential of humanity, physically, psychologically. We have evolved beyond, beyond
Beyond us.
Frankly, yes. No one in this society would be blind, for example. No offence intended.
I can see you just fine, sir.
Yes. Well, my point was just.
Thank you, Martin. Perhaps you've also made it clear there are still a few imperfections we're working on. For the most part, we've achieved a fully integrated existence. Not just among ourselves but with our environment. We don't just live here, we're a part of our environment. it is part of us. Every plant life, every microscopic lifeform is part of a master design. We cannot separate ourselves from it without irreparably altering who and what we are.
Your presence here has already begun to affect the entire balance of our society.
If we do not survive, the balance of our society won't mean a great deal, will it?
I apologise. But he is performing his function as he is designed to do.
What function might that be?
He is the interpreter of our founders' intentions for this society.
A judge?
Yes, more or less. Obviously, he has no diplomatic talents.
And obviously you do.
I have been bred to fill this specific role. We grow up knowing exactly what our society needs from us. What we are expected to do.
That must take some of fun out it?
Not at all. My entire psychological makeup tells me that I was born to lead. I am exactly what I would choose to be. Think of it another way. Are there still people in your society who have not discovered who they really are, or what they were meant to do with their lives? They may be in the wrong job, they may be writing bad poetry. Or worse yet, they may be great poets working as labourers, never to be discovered. That does not happen here. It is, for us, an ideal existence. We will not give it up easily.
We will do whatever we can to help you preserve it.
Hannah, I'd like you to meet our guests.
Oh yes, of course, from the starship. I've been looking forward to speaking with you.
Hannah Bates is one of our scientists. If there's any way to shore up our defences, Hannah will find it. She has a remarkable talent with theoretical physics.
I've worked up a few schematics based on gravimetric potentials and deflector energy allocation.
Geordi, Troi and I will return to the Enterprise. When you've reached a conclusion, you can contact us.
Commander, if Mister Conor doesn't mind, I'd like to stay and see more of his colony.
No, no, that would be fine. I'd like you to see it.
Riker to Enterprise. One to beam up.
Acknowledged, Commander.
Energise.
You're sure my being here is not going to be disruptive?
Disruptive? You mean, what Martin was saying.
Well, I certainly wouldn't wish to throw off your entire balance.
Too late. The damage is done.
Seriously.
I sometimes think that strict interpreters like Martin have forgotten we're still human. We'll adjust, accommodate.
There must be other unexpected events you have to deal with. An untimely death, an accident.
Our geneticists are able to screen out any congenital health risks before conception. Our population is diverse enough to maintain a genetic balance in the event of accidental death. But very little that is unexpected occurs here. Am I making this sound incredibly dull?
Not at all.
I'll tell you the truth, but I'll deny it if you tell Martin. I've found today exhilarating. Meeting you, meeting new people, with new ideas.
I feel the same about being here. I'm something of a student of human nature, and I find this all fascinating.
A student of human nature?
I'm the ship's Counsellor.
Ah, I'm afraid you wouldn't find much work here, Counsellor.
I'd book my next vacation at your hotel, if you had one.
Well in that case, I shall have to have them build one.
The biosphere's superstructure will never withstand the tectonic shocks. The environment would be compromised.
That's how I see it.
Your ship. What kind of energy output is it capable of generating?
We have a matter-antimatter warp reaction system, the most powerful in the Starfleet. Normally, it kicks plasma up into the terawatt range. Why?
Well, either we're going to have to move or that fragment is.
We can move a small moon or an asteroid, but a stellar core fragment? That's much too massive for our tractor beam.
What's that?
A wild idea, purely theoretical.
A multiphase tractor beam?
When we first spotted the fragment approaching, I came up with the idea, but we can't generate the kind of energy we would need. You can.
We'd need Hannah on the ship.
No.
With my theories and their equipment, we might be able to alter the fragment's path. It's our only chance to avoid evacuation.
No one had ever come here and no one had ever left, until today. This is a date to note in our history books.
This is in direct violation of the intentions of our founders, Aaron.
I don't think they intended us to die, Martin.
Her absence will create an additional imbalance.
Temporarily. The circumstances require us to be flexible.
We have no idea how molecular transport will affect her DNA.
It won't affect her DNA at all. There's been over a century of evidence to prove that.
You can go, Hannah.
May I return later?
I look forward to it.
Enterprise, three to beam up. Energise.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander La Forge and Hannah Bates have spent three days trying to find a way to adjust the path of the core fragment. If they do not succeed in the next forty eight hours, we will need to begin evacuation.
I believe some will choose to risk death rather than leave, Captain.
You've spent a good deal of time on the surface. How do you suggest we change their minds?
I'm not sure we can. It would mean abandoning their fundamental way of life.
They've managed to turn a dubious scientific endeavour into dogma.
You don't approve of genetic engineering.
It was a bad idea whose time is long past.
They seem to have made it succeed.
They've given away their humanity with this genetic manipulation. Many of the qualities that they breed out, the uncertainty, the self-discovery, the unknown, those are many of the qualities that make life worth living. Well, at least to me. I wouldn't want to live knowing that my future was written, that my boundaries had been already set, would you?
I've asked myself that question a lot during the past few days. I don't know. I doubt it. Nevertheless, it's what they believe in, and it won't be an easy matter to talk them into leaving.
This leader of theirs, Conor, he seems to be a reasonable man.
I find him very reasonable. Open to suggestions, thoughtful, quite disarming. The perfect administrator.
I'm sure. Will he leave when he sees there's no other choice?
I don't know. I hope so.
You admire him.
Yes.
Then help him to see the reality of what may happen to his colony. If he makes the right decision, if he's as good a leader as he's designed to be, then perhaps the others will follow.
If we increase warp power transfer by eighty percent.
It's just going to blow the emitters again.
We won't be able to reinforce the conduit to hold that power level. It just doesn't work.
Yeah. I haven't had any sleep in so long, my eyelids feel like they have lead weights attached.
Geordi.
Hmm?
Were you always blind?
I'm sorry. I probably shocked the hell out of you, didn't I?
No.
I'll put it back on.
Don't. I'm sorry. I didn't mean to embarrass you.
I've never been embarrassed by this, Hannah. Never. I was born blind. I've always been this way.
May I see it? Your visor?
Sure. So, I guess if I had been conceived on your world, I wouldn't even be here now, would I?
No.
No, I'd've been terminated as a fertilised cell.
It was the wish of our founders that no one had to suffer a life with disabilities.
Who gave them the right to decide whether or not I should be here? Whether or not I might have something to contribute.
I don't know what to say. Here you go. How does it work?
Well, the visor scans the electromagnetic spectrum between one hertz and one hundred thousand terahertz, converts it all to usable frequencies and then transmits that information directly to my brain.
What about the data conversion rates? How do you avoid a sensory overload?
A bank of pre-processors compresses the data stream into pulses, you see. That way, my visual cortex never. Wait a minute. Wait just a minute. We should be able to send a high-energy pulse through the tractor system. If it's short enough, it shouldn't overload the emitters. The technology is right here. If we could adapt those pulse compression routines and then apply them to the warp power conduits.
We'd have to avoid tractor force rebounding, but that shouldn't be hard.
Sure. With a few modifications. Oh, that's perfect.
What?
If the answer to all of this is in a visor created for a blind man who never would have existed in your society. No offence intended.
Please, Matthew, continue.
It's hard to believe. So much loveliness here, just a few metres away from such desolation.
It's hard to believe we're about to lose it.
This must sound incredibly simplistic but, can't you re-engineer all this on another planet?
A nursery rhyme my mother used to read to me has been running round and round my mind since this all began.
A nursery rhyme?
Humpty Dumpty sat on a wall. Humpty Dumpty had a great fall.
CONOR + TROI:All the King's horses and all the King's Men, couldn't put Humpty together again.
Why do we tell our children such ghastly stories?
Perhaps to prepare them for times like these.
We are every bit as fragile as an egg and as impossible to reconstruct. We are integrated and refined to such a degree that any fundamental change would lead to chaos.
I'm so sorry, Aaron. I wish I could do something to help.
You have helped. You've been wonderful these past few days. You've been my Counsellor.
No, a Counsellor has to maintain a discreet distance. I'd rather think of us as friends.
Friends? That just won't do either.
Will it?
Aaron.
I must confess, a part of me knows that if I transport through these walls, you'll be on the other side.
This is wrong.
Terribly wrong.
In order to move the core fragment to a safe trajectory, we needed our tractor beam to be able to handle high power pulses.
And we needed a much more efficient emitter to do that.
About four times more efficient.
And we couldn't get anywhere near that without overloading the emitter arrays.
So, we added a little visor technology to the process and we were able to boost the effective force and, at the same time, lower the power conduit stress levels.
What's the increase in efficiency?
Up to almost three hundred percent.
That's not enough.
That's true. We won't be able to move the fragment as far as we'd like to, but
But if we also fortify the biosphere's structural integrity at the same time
With some of the shield improvements I've discovered here, it could work.
Of course, we'll have to lend them some of our engineering support crews.
Advise Mister Conor, Number One, and brief the appropriate officers. Prepare them for transport as soon as Mister Conor approves.
Yes, sir.
You're up early.
I'm still on Enterprise time. Aaron, I'm going back to the ship. I'm not going to see you again.
Why?
Because it's the right thing to do.
I'm not convinced of that.
You know it as well as I do.
You're angry.
Yes, I'm angry. I'm angry with myself for allowing this to happen.
Deanna.
I could fall in love with you so easily, but we both know the end of that story, don't we? How would Martin feel about introducing half-Betazoid DNA into the genetic balance?
If we have to evacuate, anything's possible.
Listen to yourself. A few days ago you wouldn't even talk to us. This is my fault. I'm so sorry.
I need you here. This doesn't have to happen again.
I have to go.
Good news, Aaron. We should be able to change the course of the core fragment, but we'll also need to fortify the structure. And we're going to need help to do it.
We'll need to bring down engineering crews from the Enterprise to work with your people for the next forty eight hours.
Engineering crews?
They have to install five new shield generators and power supplies.
Fifty officers are waiting for your approval to transport down. We don't have much time, Aaron.
Is there any other choice?
None.
Enterprise, you may begin transport when ready.
Captain's log, supplemental. The Enterprise has moved to a parallel course with the core fragment. We must adjust its trajectory by a minimum of one point two degrees to ensure the colony's safety.
Bring us within range of the fragment, Ensign.
Aye, sir.
You may proceed
Mister La Forge.
Yes, sir. Good luck.
You, too.
Engage tractor beam. Okay, let's give it a try. Shutting down non-critical systems.
Emitter circuits one hundred seventy percent over standard.
Increasing impulse power to tractor emitters. EPS power levels rising.
Transferring warp power to tractor beam generator.
Graviton generators operating normally. Surge pulse now synchronised. Emitters radiating at three hundred twenty percent over standard.
Bridge, we need more power.
Reduce life support to minimum requirements, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
Three hundred ninety percent over standard.
Come on, come on.
No change in the fragment's course.
We've got to increase the pulse frequency.
The emitter circuits won't hold for long.
We won't need them for long.
Four hundred percent over standard.
Okay. Now we're getting there.
The fragment's moved point four degrees off its previous heading. Point six five. It's working.
We have lost one of the emitter circuits.
Life support failure. Decks nine, twelve, and thirteen.
Engage evacuation procedures for those decks. Geordi, we're going to need power back soon.
Acknowledged.
Fragment's new heading adjustment is at one point zero one degrees. Is it enough?
Not yet. Hold on.
We've lost
The second lateral emitter circuit.
Losing life support systems on decks five through nine. Evacuation procedures initiated.
Mister La Forge.
Hold on, Captain.
Shipwide life support failure in fifteen seconds, sir.
Almost there, Geordi. Course shift is at one point one six degrees.
Termination of all life support in five seconds.
One point one eight.
Now, Mister La Forge.
Yes, sir. Shutting down all tractor emissions. Transferring power back to life support.
One point two. We've got it.
Life support normal on all decks.
Mister Data?
The fragment's course has been altered by one point two one degrees, sir.
Hail the colony.
Yes, Captain.
Success, Mister Conor. With the upgrades to your biosphere, the core fragment should no longer be a danger.
I cannot adequately express my appreciation to your crew. Is Hannah able to hear me?
Yes, yes. Go ahead, Aaron.
This is an historic achievement, Hannah. You've done a wonderful thing for our people.
Thank you.
We look forward to honouring you appropriately when you return. Thank you again, Captain. Conor out.
Captain's log, supplemental. The stellar core fragment has passed safely out of the Moab system. The colony was shaken by powerful temblors, but fortunately there were no injuries and only minor damage was reported.
Energise.
That should do it. All members of the Enterprise crew are accounted for, Mister Conor.
They've been invaluable, Commander. Thank you again.
If there's nothing else, we'll be on our way.
Would you tell Deanna Troi for me that I'm sorry I didn't have the opportunity to say goodbye personally?
I'm sure she'll feel the same way.
A breach in the biosphere. Get Hannah Bates.
Apparently, the refortification wasn't adequate. There's definite structural damage. It appears that the tectonic shifts created a breach.
Can it be repaired?
I don't know. I'll have to run a diagnostic in the lab. Unless we seal it and fast we may have to evacuate.
How long do we have, Hannah?
Based on the level of toxicity I'm reading, it may be only a matter of hours.
Mind if I give her a hand, Commander?
By all means.
Isn't it amazing after all we went through?
Yeah. Amazing.
Looks bad. It's cracked well beneath the surface.
Why are you doing this?
What do you mean?
There's no breach.
What are you talking about. Look at it, it's right here. I measured the toxic leak. You saw me.
Hannah, my visor's positronic scan would have detected the leak. Its molecular pattern enhancer would have picked up even the smallest crack.
The damn thing doesn't miss much, does it. Fine. I'll tell them the truth. Will that make you happy?
Why are you doing this?
I was born to be one of the best scientific minds of my generation, and in the past five days I have encountered technology that I have barely imagined. And I've got to ask myself, If we're so brilliant how come we didn't invent any of these things?
Well, maybe necessity really is the mother of invention. You never really look for something until you need it.
But all my needs have been anticipated and planned for before I'm even born. All of us in this colony have been living in the dark ages. It's like we're victims of a two hundred year old joke. Until you came, we could only see to the wall of our biosphere. Suddenly our eyes have been opened to the infinite possibilities.
Asylum?
She wants to leave the colony.
She may not be the only one. The science teams that went down to the surface fielded a lot of questions from colonists who were more than curious about what's outside their world.
Why shouldn't we grant them asylum?
We can't do that.
We have to do that.
Do you understand what it would do to the colony?
I understand these are human beings, Counsellor, with free will. If she wants to leave, she has every right to.
And what happens to the colony if she does? If others join her?
The society is genetically integrated. Suddenly there would be gaps, missing pieces.
It would destroy them.
There must be something we can do to help.
We may have done too much to help them already, Doctor.
We saved them from destruction.
Did we? Counsellor, I think it's time you took me to meet Mister Conor.
Transporter room three.
Computer, halt. Captain, I have to tell you something, and it isn't easy for me because I've used very poor judgement. Actually, I've acted quite unprofessionally.
Counsellor, what is it you say? Take a deep breath.
Conor and I have had a relationship.
I see.
It should never have happened. I knew there was concern about outside influences and I should have been more careful.
What is your status with him now?
I did not intend to see him again.
Would you prefer not to return to the surface?
No, I think I should come with you, but I wanted you to know before we went down.
I appreciate that. Computer, resume.
I wanted so much to help him, to be there for him, but the more I was.
Deanna, we all went into this with the best intentions.
I should have walked away as soon as I saw what was happening.
But you didn't. And that's human. We make mistakes. Genetic manipulation or not, nobody's perfect.
You would ignore the welfare of the colony for your own selfish interests.
The welfare of this colony would be best served by rejoining the human race.
She has been contaminated by the people on that ship.
Aaron.
Mister Conor, I believe that you and I should talk.
This is your doing. We should never have answered your hails.
If we'd followed that advice, Martin, we'd all be dead by now. So much for the welfare of this colony.
You are not taking her with you.
I'm leaving. And I'll tell you something else. There are at least a dozen others who are ready to go with me.
Hannah, let's allow Aaron and Captain Picard to discuss this. Why don't we go for a walk?
There's nothing else for them to talk about.
Martin.
I think it would be helpful if I.
I want to talk with Captain Picard alone.
But
Thank you, Martin.
The irony is, he's the one who saw this coming from the moment you arrived. Because I didn't want to hear it, I chose not to listen.
You made decisions you felt would save your colony.
No. No, I wish it were that simple, but I can't forgive myself so easily. You see, Captain, I know what Hannah Bates is feeling. I've been feeling it as well. I've found your people intriguing and stimulating as she has. I've been every bit as curious about you as the next man. But I am not the next man. I am the leader of these people. And every genetic fibre in my being demands that I protect them. Instead, I have betrayed them. I have allowed this to happen.
We have both allowed this to happen.
Then let us both find a way to stop it from going any further.
I wish I could see a way.
Picard, I was born to govern this colony, not to dismantle it.
If you force them to stay, you will be suppressing their human rights.
If even a handful leave, the damage to this society will be devastating. What about the rights of those who would stay behind? They are the ones who will inherit the social chaos that will follow for generations. Your arrival created this problem. Your departure solves it.
That is simplistic.
Refuse them passage.
I cannot ignore the requests of people, humans, who ask for transport away from here.
Nor can you ignore the fact that thousands will suffer if you agree to take them. And as suffering grows, more will demand to leave. We are witnessing the end of this existence. I implore you, Captain, do not let this happen.
You would have me make the decision for you, nut I can't do that. I am willing to talk to these people with you, and I will urge them not to make an impulsive choice, but if finally they choose to leave, the Enterprise will not turn them away.
Captain Picard has decided to grant transport to any individuals who wish to leave Genome Colony. I'm asking you to stay.
Aaron, don't you see we can't be happy here any longer? We were innocent. it will never be that way again.
The experiences of the past week will become part of our heritage. We will adjust. In a few generations, we will be able to
We're not willing to stay here a few generations.
Give me six months. Just wait six months before you leave.
What will that accomplish?
It's true that our presence here has had an unintended influence on your society. But it's done and there is no way to undo it. But feelings are running very high. Perhaps it's not such a bad idea that you should take adequate time to weigh carefully the consequences of what you're about to do. We are prepared to return in six months.
In other words, we are being asked to stay here for six months while they pressure us to change our minds.
In five days, you have seen only the most superficial evidence of what life is like outside this biosphere.
Would you ever choose to live aboard a ship in a bottle, Captain? You are in command of a starship. You live to explore the unknown. We ask for that same privilege.
Hannah, this is your home. We are all, in a sense, your family. Don't we deserve an opportunity to open a dialogue on this issue at the very least? I am only asking for six months.
It won't make any difference. You'll only be putting the people of this colony through unnecessary pain and anguish.
You are the ones who are causing pain and anguish in this colony. You.
Don't you see, Aaron? It's over. It's time for you to lead our people into a new era. You could come with us.
When you're ready to come home, you will be welcome.
What will you do now?
Attempt to assess the damage. Spend the rest of my life on the near impossible task of rebuilding this society without the proper pieces.
Aaron, you acted in the best interests of your people. There was no way to avoid what happened.
I replay each step of this in my mind, looking for the wrong turn, the mistake in judgement. I can find only one. And as hard as I try, I cannot regret even that one. In fact, I'm quite certain that, given the opportunity, I would choose to make the same mistake again. I can only wonder why, with all the hundreds of genetically compatible women, I would fall in love with you.
Don't say that.
Perhaps it's your imperfections which make you so unique. But I am in love with you, Deanna Troi, and I will always be.
Come.
The colonists are all on board, sir.
How many finally?
Twenty three.
If we ever needed reminding of the importance of the Prime Directive, it is now.
The Prime Directive doesn't apply. They're human.
Doesn't it? Our very presence may have damaged, even destroyed, their way of life. Whether or not we agree with that way of life or whether they're human or not is irrelevant, Number One. We are responsible.
We had to respond to the threat from the core fragment didn't we?
Of course we did. But in the end we may have proved just as dangerous to that colony as any core fragment could ever have been.
We are losing containment in the starboard nacelle tube.
Try to get more power to the field coils.
Aye, sir.
Mister La Forge.
Report.
I can't shut down the plasma injectors. Somebody's locked out the controls.
The plasma venting system has engaged.
Two more decks.
Riker to Bridge. We've almost reached the nacelle tube.
Acknowledged.
Release the exterior hull plate. We may have to jettison the core.
Aye, sir.
What happened?
He locked out the controls. Before we knew what was happening, he stepped up onto the walkway.
See if you can help shut down the plasma flow.
I'm afraid if we try to get any closer, he will jump through the forcefield.
Dan, it's me. It's Will Riker. I was here yesterday, remember?
I didn't want to do it. But I saw them. And they laughed at me. They laughed.
Whatever happened, we can talk about it. I want to help.
Stay away!
I just want to see your face, that's all. So we can talk.
I know what I have to do.
Dan, no!
I have unlocked the controls.
Shutdown procedure initiated.
There's still plasma in the injector. It'll take time to vent off.
Tell me what happened. Maybe I can help.
I know what I have to do.
A few more seconds I could've saved his life
Commander, you did everything you could. It was not your fault.
It was strange. I felt as if he didn't even recognise me, although I was with him just the other day when I supervised the tube refit.
How did he seem then?
Fine. I complimented him on getting the refit done faster than expected. He was pleased that I'd noticed.
I met with him about six weeks ago, during the crew evaluations. He was very positive. He was looking forward to being posted to the nacelle tube.
He was a good officer with a fine career ahead of him. I don't understand why he wanted
In my years as a Starship Captain, I've had to notify many parents of the loss of loved ones, but never before a suicide. I would like to be able to offer Lieutenant Kwan's parents some explanation of what happened, to try to help them make sense of this.
Maybe he left a message of some kind, explaining why he did it.
I would like the two of you to piece together a picture of his last few days.
If he made any personal logs, it might be helpful to look through them.
You're authorised to do so.
La Forge to Captain.
Go ahead.
I've just finished my damage assessment. We should be able to get underway I'd say within the hour.
Mister La Forge
The medical situation on Barson Two has worsened. Starfleet has given us permission to exceed warp speed limitations so as to get back on schedule.
We'll be able to give you warp eight if you need it.
Acknowledged.
Geordi, would you agree that the instinct for self-preservation is shared by most life forms?
I'd say it's probably the most basic instinct, Data.
That being the case, I find it difficult to understand why someone would deliberately terminate their own existence.
I don't know, Data. All I can think is that maybe Lieutenant Kwan felt that there was something wrong in his life, something he felt powerless to fix.
I believe I understand. I have been in a similar situation.
Really?
The first months following my activation were a difficult period for me. There were many problems associated with my becoming sentient.
Because your neural net was still forming.
As I acquired new skills, neural pathways would form replacing other less complex pathways. It was very disorienting.
I bet.
As my systems grew in complexity, it became increasingly difficult to integrate new pathways into my existing neural net. The probability of cascade failure grew with each additional pathway. I came to the conclusion it would be safer and easier to shut myself down and start again.
Yeah, but if you had done that, you wouldn't have remembered any of the things that had happened to you.
In a way, it would have been like committing suicide.
So what did you do?
I decided against the procedure. I chose instead to treat the problems I was having with my systems as challenges to overcome, rather than obstacles to be avoided.
Great way of looking at it, Data. I wish Lieutenant Kwan had been able to look at his problems the same way.
This is a Napean design.
His mother's Napean, his father's human. It all looks so normal. For some reason I half expected the place to be a mess.
Yes. It is strange to think that someone could have considered ending his life and yet give no outward sign. Just before he jumped, he seemed almost calm.
Well, he must have been in a lot of pain to do what he did. It could be that the prospect of ending the pain felt like a great relief.
This is Ensign Calloway, isn't it?
Yes, she is a medical technician in Sickbay.
It's always hard to lose someone you care about, but to lose them like this?
We should check his personal logs.
This is his last entry. He made it before going on duty this morning.
Personal log, stardate 47622.1. We finally finished the nacelle tube refit last night. After pulling two double shifts in a row, I'm really looking forward to spending some time with Maddy.
Ensign Calloway. That doesn't sound like a man who's planning on taking his own life.
No. No, it does not.
I can't believe he's really gone. I keep thinking he's going to show up and tell me there's been some kind of terrible misunderstanding.
I thought you might like to know that in his personal logs, Dan talked about you a great deal. He loved you very much.
If that's true, then how could he leave me like this?
That's what I'm trying to find out. I know it's hard to talk right now, but it would be very helpful if you could tell me a few things about him. When was the last time you saw him?
Two nights ago. We were planning our next shore leave together.
Did he mention anything that had happened recently, anything that might have upset him?
No, not really. He did say something about work, about Lieutenant Nara, but it wasn't anything serious.
Nara. She's his superior officer in the nacelle tube?
Yes. Dan sensed that she, well, that she felt threatened by him. That she thought he was after her position.
Was he prone to mood swings or depression?
No, but he was very sensitive to other people's moods. He used to look at me and know exactly what I was feeling. I always loved that about him.
Well, Napeans are partially empathic. He may have inherited some of his mother's abilities.
He used to tease me that when I met her, I wouldn't be able to get away with anything. Dan and I knew each other for over two years, but we didn't get together until a few months ago. We took it slow. We thought we had all the time in the world. Something must have happened to him, Counsellor. Something terrible, because it's not like Dan to take his own life.
I understand.
Please, find out what it was.
Can I help you?
Oh, I didn't see you there. You're Lieutenant Nara, aren't you?
Can I do something for you, Counsellor?
I'm investigating Lieutenant Kwan's death, and I just wanted to look around.
It's such a shame. He was a good man.
Did you notice any change in his behaviour recently?
No. I've been going over the last few days in my mind, trying to see if I, if I missed any warning signs. It's as if something in him just snapped.
How was his job performance?
Excellent. He knew this ship better than most people, probably because he helped build it back at Utopia Planitia.
Did he get along with his coworkers?
He was ambitious. He came in here with all sorts of new ideas about how to do things. Some of them very good ideas.
But not all?
No. But after he settled in, we got along fine.
Excuse me a minute. Feel free to look around.
Where was Lieutenant Kwan's station?
Right there.
Are you all right?
I don't know.
I don't know how to describe it. I was suddenly overwhelmed by a flood of emotions. Fear, rage, panic. And the sensations didn't seem to be coming from any person. They were just there, in the room.
Whose emotions were they? I thought you said were alone.
I was.
I scanned the area. I found no anomalous readings.
How could you get an empathic impression from an empty room?
I don't know.
Could the fact that Lieutenant Kwan was partially empathic have anything to do with it?
What do you mean?
I'm not sure, but certainly the feelings Troi described are consistent with suicide.
Could his death have left some sort of empathic echo?
I don't see how. But if I went back to the nacelle tube, I might get a better sense of what I experienced.
I don't think I'd recommend that right now. You're showing elevated levels of psilosynine.
Psilosynine?
It's a neurotransmitter involved in telepathy. The experience overwhelmed you the first time. I think you should wait until your levels return to normal.
How long?
Three, maybe four hours.
This time I want someone with you.
I shall accompany you, Counsellor.
Captain's log, stardate 47623.2. We've arrived at Starbase three twenty eight on schedule. After taking aboard medical supplies, we will depart for Barson Two.
Come in. Hello, Worf.
Counsellor. Have you found anything in Lieutenant Kwan's logs?
Everything I've read suggests that he was well-adjusted and optimistic. It just doesn't make any sense. Can I get you anything?
No. No, nothing.
Yridian tea. I've been thinking about what happened to me in the nacelle tube. Whether it was an empathic echo left by Kwan's death.
In the past, have your empathic experiences always involved the physical presence of another person?
All the ones I'm sure of, yes.
What do you mean, sure of?
Well, when I was a young girl, my grandfather used to tell me stories by the fire. I would close my eyes and listen to his mind for hours on end.
He would tell you these stories telepathically?
My grandfather rarely spoke. He said that was for off-worlders and people who didn't know any better. Now the only time I can remember his stories is when I go home and sit by the fireplace. Sometimes when I'm alone there, it's almost as if I can hear his voice inside my head.
Yes. Yes, I too have sought visions in fire.
I can't explain it, but it feels real to me. Just like what happened in the nacelle tube.
There are things we do not understand, yet they exist nonetheless. Perhaps I should let you get some rest.
Oh, it's all right.
If you will excuse me, Counsellor.
Mister Worf.
Commander.
Two Til'amin froths, please.
Yes, sir.
Lieutenant Corell seems to be enjoying your company.
I'd like to think so.
Are you involved with her?
I'm not sure yet. Why, are you interested?
No. But if I were, I would of course discuss the situation with you before proceeding further.
I appreciate it, but that really wouldn't be necessary.
I mean I would never want to come between you and someone you are involved with, or had ever been involved with.
Is there someone in particular that you're talking about?
No. Is there someone in particular you would rather I not be involved with?
Mister Worf, you sound like a man who's asking his friend if he can start dating his sister.
No, no, I was merely. Never mind. Excuse me, sir.
Could you open this door for me?
Yes, but only for a short time. After ninety seconds the plasma venting system will engage to prevent degradation of the forcefield.
I just want to take a quick look.
May I ask what you're looking for?
I'm not sure.
Warning plasma venting system will engage in ninety seconds.
No! No, no, please. Please, please. No! Don't! No!
Warning. Plasma venting system will engage in eighty seconds.
Worf?
Worf?
Counsellor, are you all right?
Let's get out of here.
Do you remember anything else?
Yes, I think I do. There was a tool crate on the floor. It was labeled Utopia Planitia.
The shipyard where the Enterprise was built.
Clearly this was much more than an empathic echo. It seems that you were actually seeing something that happened in the control room eight years ago.
Everyone was looking directly at me, but it was as though I was seeing through someone else's eyes.
Lieutenant Kwan was partially empathic.
Maybe you were seeing it through his eyes?
It's possible, but I don't see how it could have happened.
Well, putting that on one side for the moment, let's assume that by some unexplained phenomenon, you witnessed an event that occurred to Lieutenant Kwan. Those faces that you saw. Did you recognise any of them?
I've never seen the woman before, or the man who was with her. But there was someone else there. A man. He was staring at me in the most peculiar way. I think he had reddish hair. And he did seem familiar to me. But it's all so hazy. It's like trying to remember a dream.
There was a woman who was frightened. And then you saw her again, laughing, presumably at Lieutenant Kwan.
What does it all mean?
I don't know, but something terrible happened in there. I felt it.
Counsellor, I want you to look through the personnel files of Utopia Planitia. See if you can recognise any of those faces.
If only I could go back to the control room without being overwhelmed by the experience. It might help me remember some detail that might be relevant.
I could give you an inhibitor that would slow the brain's production of psilosynine. That might be able to suppress your empathic abilities and make the experience more manageable. It would take about sixteen hours to synthesise the inhibitor.
I'd like to try that.
Very well, Counsellor.
I apologise for being late. The viral medicines we are transporting to Barson Two require special security measures to insure they are properly contained. Have you found anything?
No. There were literally thousands of people involved in building the Enterprise.
Perhaps if you should try to narrow the search parameters.
I think I have. The man who looked familiar to me may have served on board the Enterprise in the last seven years, so I've asked the computer to limit its search to personnel who served at Utopia Planitia and on the Enterprise.
Ensign Salvatore. He transferred over a year ago. Lieutenant Ziff. She's in Quantum mechanics. That's him.
Lieutenant Walter Pierce.
I remember now. He came on board about six months ago. I think he's in Engineering.
You were Lieutenant Kwan's supervisor at Utopia Planitia?
That's right. I was sorry to hear what happened.
Did you ever spend time in the nacelle control room while it was under construction?
I worked all over the ship. In fact, I remember running a power conduit right behind this wall here.
Were you ever in the nacelle room at the same time as Lieutenant Kwan?
It was a long time ago. People were working all over the place.
So you do not remember?
I'm sorry, I don't.
Do you recall if anything unusual happened there?
How do you mean?
An altercation, perhaps. Possibly involving Lieutenant Kwan.
No, nothing like that. The way I remember it, things went pretty smoothly. What's this all about, if you don't mind my asking?
Not at all. When I was in the nacelle room I had an empathic experience.
We believe the Counsellor may have been seeing an event that occurred eight years ago.
And I saw you there. Do you have any idea why that might be?
I'm afraid I don't.
Lieutenant, are you aware that I can sense when someone's telling the truth?
I've heard that.
Then I'm sure that if you remember anything that might be relevant to our investigation, you'll contact me.
Of course.
Thank you, Lieutenant.
Counsellor.
The strange thing is I couldn't read him at all.
But you implied that? We have played poker together many times. I've never known you to bluff.
Well it wouldn't be much of a bluff if you knew, would it? The fact that I couldn't read him suggests that he has at least some telepathic ability.
But Pierce is human.
That's what I don't understand. Even though I couldn't read his emotions, I did feel that he was holding something back.
I thought so as well.
Maybe we should try to access the Engineering logs from Utopia Planitia. We might find out more about him.
There may be something in them about Lieutenant Kwan as well.
It going to take about half an hour for the transmission to be completed.
Perhaps we should continue this in the morning.
It is late.
Yes, and you must be tired.
A little.
So I will say goodnight.
Goodnight.
We should get an early start tomorrow.
I think we should. I'll see you in the morning.
Yes.
Hello.
Breakfast is ready.
That sounds nice. But it can wait. Why didn't we do this a long time ago?
Crusher to Counsellor Troi.
Yes, Doctor.
I've synthesised the inhibitor. Please come to Sickbay whenever you're ready.
Acknowledged.
Crusher to Lieutenant Worf.
Worf, here.
Medical supplies are ready to be taken to cargo bay for transport.
I will be there shortly.
This should take effect immediately.
Will it completely suppress my empathic abilities?
It's hard to say for sure, but I can always increase the dosage if it's not enough.
The cargo bay will be off limits to all but medical personnel.
Thanks for your help, sir.
You're welcome.
Good morning.
Counsellor.
Data and Geordi are already in the nacelle tube. Are you ready?
Yes.
Excuse me, sir. About the quarantine field in the cargo bay? It looks like we'll need a second field generator.
I am needed here. I will join you as soon as I can.
All right.
Apparently my help was not so good after all.
Yes, it was. You were wonderful.
I think I know what's wrong.
Counsellor, you okay?
I'm fine. The inhibitor seems to be working. Have you found anything?
No, nothing unusual.
I don't remember seeing these during my empathic experience. Have they been here since the ship was built?
No, they were installed two years ago.
Geordi, I remember seeing a plasma conduit right there.
The main ODN line runs right behind that panel. It lifts out so you can get to it.
Kwan was working on that conduit the day before he died.
Can you open it?
Sure. It'll take just a minute.
Data.
Lieutenant Nara, may I ask you something? The work Lieutenant Kwan was doing, was it unusual in any way?
He was refitting a field coil, but it was probably the first time that particular panel's been opened since the ship was built.
Thank you.
No!
Counsellor, are you all right?
Something happened when you removed the panel. There's something in there.
I am getting readings that indicate organic material embedded in this wall.
Organic? You're right. Let me reconfigure the emitter beam. We might be able to see what it is. There.
This dosage should prevent any further empathic flashes.
The bone fragments are definitely human. I sequenced a DNA sample. I'll see if I can match it to Starfleet records.
Accessing Starfleet personnel records.
I'd say these fragments had been in the wall about seven or eight years. You said something happened when the panel was opened.
Yes.
I wonder if the fragments themselves could have somehow triggered your experience. I'll run a resonance scan, see if anything turns up.
Sir, I think we've found a match.
Apparently the remains are those of an Ensign Marla Finn.
I'm trying to find a picture of her in the records.
That's her. That's the woman I saw.
It says she was reported missing from Utopia Planitia on stardate 40987.2. Eight years ago. But how did her body become embedded in a bulkhead?
Maybe there was some kind of an accident.
Or she was killed and the murderer hid her remains.
Something's not right. Pull up Lieutenant Kwan's service record. I thought so. He didn't arrive at the shipyard until six months after Finn's death. I couldn't have been seeing through his eyes.
Then whose?
Well it had to be someone who was at least partially telepathic.
Pierce?
But you saw him there.
Yes, but not as clearly as I could see everything else. His face looked like that.
A reflection.
So I was seeing through his eyes. And Finn was trying to get away from him. She was afraid of him.
I think it is time we had another conversation with Lieutenant Pierce. Ensign Calloway, thank you for your help.
Deck ten.
Worf, can I ask you something? Do you regret what happened last night?
No, of course not.
Are you sure? Because I don't want anything to jeopardise our friendship.
Deanna, I do not regret being with you. What is wrong?
I'm not feeling myself. Maybe it's the inhibitor. I'm so used to sensing what people are feeling, and now I can't.
Perhaps I should talk to Lieutenant Pierce alone.
That might be a good idea.
I will meet you in your quarters later.
I'll be waiting for you.
Deck eight.
Come in.
Security to Counsellor Troi's quarters.
Acknowledged.
I don't understand. Lieutenant Worf said you wanted to talk to me about something.
Where is he?
He said he had to go somewhere.
Troi to Worf. Computer, where is Lieutenant Worf?
Lieutenant Worf is in Ensign Calloway's quarters.
Counsellor?
Take Lieutenant Pierce to his quarters and hold him there.
Security override, authorisation Troi Delta two nine.
Stop it. Stop it! Stop it!
He's dead! You killed him!
No! No!
You know what you have to do.
I know what I have to do.
What are you doing?
Warning. Plasma venting system will engage in seventy seconds.
You're alive! You're all right!
I opened the maintenance door at Counsellor Troi's request, then turned to see her standing too close to the force field.
It all seemed so real to me. I can't believe that everything I experienced happened in just those few seconds.
It appears Counsellor was correct. Pierce was partially telepathic. His maternal grandmother was born on Betazed.
What else have you found out?
According to Starfleet records, Pierce and the other persons Counsellor Troi identified, were killed in an accidental plasma discharge eight years ago. Their bodies were never found.
I don't believe it was an accident. I think Lieutenant Pierce found out the other two were having an affair. He lost control and he killed them both. Afterwards, he probably activated the plasma stream and then threw himself into it.
The plasma discharge would have obliterated any evidence that it was murder.
I scanned behind the panel Counsellor Troi asked me to. I didn't find any bone fragments but I did find some traces of cellular residue showing some kind of psionic signature.
It may be that when Lieutenant Pierce was struck by the plasma stream, the subspace energy present there imprinted his empathic pattern into the residue.
Kind of like a psychic photograph.
That's what triggered my hallucination. My mind must have taken elements from my own life and then created a situation that in many ways mirrored what happened to Pierce. If you hadn't been there, I would have jumped just like he did.
Counsellor. When I pulled you from the plasma stream, you seemed surprised I was alive.
Well, actually, in my hallucination, you were killed.
May I ask by whom?
Well, you know what they say, Mister Worf. Hell hath no fury like a woman scorned.
But then I said, in that frame of reference, the perihelion of Mercury would have precessed in the opposite direction.
That is a great story!
Quite amusing, Doctor Hawking. You see, Sir Isaac, the joke depends on an understanding of the relativistic curvature of space-time. If two non-inertial reference frames are in relative motion
Do not patronise me, sir. I invented physics. The day that apple fell on my head was the most momentous day in the history of science.
Not the apple story again.
That story is generally considered to be apocryphal.
What? How dare you!
Perhaps we should return to the game. Let's see, where were we? Yes, you raised Mister Data four, which means that the bet is, er, seven to me?
The bet is ten! Can't you do simple arithmetic? I don't even know why I'm here in the first place. What is the point of playing this ridiculous game?
When I play poker with my shipmates, it often appears to be a useful forum for exploring the different facets of humanity. I was curious to see how three of history's greatest minds would interact in this setting. So far, it has proved most illuminating.
And profitable.
Can we get this over with, please? It's your bet.
I raise fifty.
Blast! I fold.
I fold as well.
The uncertainty principle will not help you now, Stephen. All the quantum fluctuations in the universe will not change the cards in your hand. I call. You are bluffing and you will lose.
Wrong again, Albert.
Well.
Red alert. All personnel report to duty stations.
We will have to continue this another time. End programme.
We've received a distress call from the Ohniaka Three Outpost. They said they were under attack.
Ohniaka Three? There's no strategic value to that outpost. Were they able to identify the attackers?
No, we haven't been able to raise them since the initial contact.
We are nearing the Ohniaka system, sir.
Bring us out of warp, Ensign.
Aye, sir.
Sensors detect one ship orbiting the third planet. Its configuration does not match anything in our records.
Stand by phasers and photon torpedoes.
Hail them, Mister Worf.
No response, sir.
Put them on screen.
It does not appear to be attacking the outpost, sir.
They might have attacked before we got here.
Or they might simply be another victim. What about the outpost?
There is a great deal of electromagnetic interference. I am unable to determine whether there are any lifeforms present.
Worf, Data, you're with me.
These wounds were caused by a forced plasma beam, similar to a Ferengi hand phaser.
This seems brutal even for the Ferengi. Any sign of survivors?
Electromagnetic interference is still making it difficult to get a precise reading.
How many people were assigned to this outpost?
Two hundred and seventy four.
All right. we're going to need to do a room to room search. Worf, you and Corelki start searching the north wing. You and I will take the south.
Aye, sir.
The mechanism appears to be jammed, sir.
There's not much damage. It doesn't look like they were interested in the station, just the people.
I have bypassed the primary system.
Evasive manoeuvres, Ensign! Return fire.
Shields down to eighty percent. Compensating with auxiliary power.
You have killed Torsus. I will make you suffer for this.
Biological organism, Klingon. Biological organism, human.
Stop it! Stop! Stop! Stop! Stop! Stop!
Artificial lifeform. Starfleet rank, Lieutenant Commander. Name, Data.
Captain, the alien ship is breaking orbit.
Plot an intercept course, Ensign. Fire torpedoes.
They're gone, sir. Our sensors indicate there was some kind of subspace distortion just before they disappeared. I'll have to study these readings before I can get more specific than that.
Take us back to Ohniaka Three.
Aye, sir.
Data? Data, are you all right?
Yes, sir.
What happened?
I got angry.
Captain's log, stardate 46982.1. Because of his unusual behaviour on the planet surface, Commander Data has asked to be temporarily relieved of duty. Unfortunately, this means he will not be able to help us investigate a disturbing new change in the behaviour of the Borg.
They were fast, aggressive, almost vicious. it was more like fighting Klingons than Borg. No offence.
None taken.
There was another difference. I don't believe they were part of the Borg collective. I think they were acting as individuals.
What?
One of them referred to himself as I.
And that Borg also showed concern for a fallen comrade. He even called him by name.
The only Borg who had a name was Hugh. And we gave it to him.
Maybe Hugh has something to do with this change in their behaviour.
Did they show any interest in assimilating you or your technology?
They seemed more concerned with the death of their colleague and with destroying us. I didn't see anything that suggested they wanted to assimilate anybody.
The Borg's entire existence was centred around acquiring cultures and technology. If that's changed, then they must have a new objective. We have to find out what it is. Mister Worf, from this moment on, I want to maintain a level two security alert. Post armed officers on every deck.
Aye, sir.
Number One, I want you to analyse our sensor readings of the Borg ship. Try to determine if it was something they constructed or an alien ship which they captured. Then run an analysis of this subspace distortion they used to escape.
Aye, sir.
I'm going to contact Starfleet Command.
Well, the positronic net checks out. Everything else looks fine.
My internal diagnostic also finds nothing wrong.
I don't know, Data. There's nothing here that would indicate anything that might cause an sort of behavioural anomaly.
I agree. Geordi, I believe I've experienced my first emotion.
No offence, Data, but how would you know a flash of anger from some odd kind of power surge?
You are correct in that I have no frame of reference to confirm my hypothesis. In fact, I am unable to provide a verbal description of the experience. Perhaps you could describe how it feels to be angry. I could then use that as a reference.
Well, okay. When I feel angry, first I feel hostile.
Could you describe feeling hostile?
It's like feeling belligerent, combative.
Could you describe feeling angry without referring to other feelings?
No, I guess I can't. I just feel angry.
That was my experience as well. I simply felt angry.
Well, let's say you're right and this is a real emotion. How is that possible?
I do not know. Perhaps I have evolved to the point where emotions are within my grasp. Perhaps I will experience other emotions as time goes by.
Well, I hope you're right. I'd hate to think that anger is all you're capable of feeling.
Captain's log, stardate 46984.6. No additional Borg attacks have been reported in the past two days. However, Starfleet has dispatched Admiral Nechayev to take command in this sector in preparation for a possible Borg invasion.
There will be fifteen starships in this sector by the day after tomorrow. The Gorkon will be my flagship. You'll take command of task force three, consisting of the Enterprise, the Crazy Horse and the Agamemnon.
Understood.
Captain, I've read the report that you submitted to Admiral Brooks last year regarding the Borg you called Hugh, and I've been trying to figure out why you let him go.
I thought that I had made that clear.
As I understand, it you found a single Borg at a crash site, brought it aboard the Enterprise, studied it, analysed it, and eventually found a way to send it back to the Borg with a programme that would have destroyed the entire collective once and for all. But instead, you nursed the Borg back to health, treated it like a guest, gave it a name, and then sent it home. Why?
When Hugh was separated from the Borg collective he began to grow and to evolve into something other than an automaton. He became a person. When that happened, I felt I had no choice but to respect his rights as an individual.
Of course you had a choice. You could've taken the opportunity to rid the Federation of a mortal enemy, one that has killed tens of thousands of innocent people, and which may kill even more.
No one is more aware of the danger than I am. But I am also bound by my oath and my conscience to uphold certain principles. And I will not sacrifice them in order to
Your priority is to safeguard the lives of Federation citizens, not to wrestle with your conscience. Now I want to make it clear that if you have a similar opportunity in the future, an opportunity to destroy the Borg, you are under orders to take advantage of it. Is that understood?
Yes, sir.
For the past six hours, I have attempted to produce an emotional response by subjecting myself to various stimuli.
Like what?
I listened to several operas known to be uplifting, I watched three holodeck programs designed to be humourous, and I made four attempts to induce sexual desire by subjecting myself to erotic imagery.
What happened?
Nothing.
I'm curious. Why are you ignoring the one emotion you've already experienced? Why aren't you trying to make yourself angry again?
Anger is a negative emotion. I wanted to concentrate on something more positive.
Data, feelings aren't positive and negative, they simply exist. It's what we do with those feelings that becomes good or bad. For example, feeling angry about an injustice could lead someone to take a positive action to correct it.
But my study of humanity indicates there are some emotions that are harmful, such as jealousy or hatred.
Those are very strong emotions, and you're right, very little good can come from them. But I don't think that an exploration of anger need necessarily lead to hatred or malice.
But what if it does, Counsellor? What if it turns out that those are the only emotions I am capable of experiencing? Would that not make me a bad person?
We've served together for a long time and I think I've come to know you pretty well. I have to believe if you ever reach your goal of becoming human, you won't become a bad one.
I wish I were as confident as you, Counsellor. When I was fighting the Borg, I felt angry, but when I think back on the incident, I realise that I was also experiencing another sensation. It was not the same as anger, but I think it was an emotion.
When exactly did you feel this other emotion?
It was just after I had killed the Borg. I looked down at his body. I felt something.
If you had to give this feeling a name, what would you call it?
I believe it was pleasure.
Red alert! All hands to battle stations. Lay in a course. Engage warp nine.
We received a distress call from the New Berlin Colony. They're under attack.
What's our ETA?
At warp nine, fifteen minutes, thirty seconds.
Contact the Crazy Horse and the Agamemnon. Have them standing by in case we need them.
Captain, incoming message from the New Berlin Colony. They have cancelled their distress call. Evidently a Ferengi trading ship entered their system and someone panicked.
Third time today. Stand down Red alert. Reduce speed. Return to our patrol route.
Mister Worf, acknowledge the signal from New Berlin and transmit another copy of Starfleet's ship-recognition protocols and tell them to read it this time.
Aye, sir.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have been on patrol for sixteen hours, and there are no reports of further Borg activity. But tensions continue to run high on the colonies and outposts in this sector.
Do I have a name?
I'm Beverly, he's Geordi, and you, you
No, wait a minute. That's it. Hugh.
We are Hugh.
Come.
I thought you might like to see this. Geordi's analysis of the subspace distortion the Borg used to escape.
An artificially created energy conduit? That could be anything.
We don't have enough information at this point
I don't want excuses, Number One. I want answers! I'm sorry. He was in this room, Will. I could have rid the Federation of a mortal threat, and I let him go.
Sending Hugh back to the Borg was a very risky, a very dangerous choice, but it was the moral thing to do.
It may turn out that the moral thing to do was not the right thing to do.
Stop it. Stop. Stop. Stop. Stop. Stop.
Data, am I interrupting something?
Yes, but it is all right. Do you need me?
I wanted to see if you were ready to return to duty. I need some help with an analysis of the ship the Borg were using.
I believe I am able to resume my duties.
Data, exactly what is it that are you're doing here?
I am attempting to recreate the experience which caused to my initial burst of anger.
Any luck?
None so far. I have almost completed this experiment. May I finish before we return to Engineering?
Yeah, sure.
Computer, reset Borg simulation to time index two point one. Increase Borg strength by twenty percent. Run programme.
Stop it. Stop. Stop. Stop. Stop. Computer, reset simulation to time index two point one. Increase Borg strength by thirty percent.
Unable to comply. A thirty percent increase would exceed safety limits.
Geordi, the computer will require the voice authorisations of two senior officers in order to disable the safety routine. Will you help me?
Data, wait a minute. That thing could kill you.
During the original incident the Borg presented a genuine danger to my life. Since the Holodeck safety routine is in place, I know my life is not in danger. Since I am trying to duplicate the conditions of the original incident as closely as possible, I must also attempt to duplicate the jeopardy as well.
Data, we're talking about an experiment here. You can't put your life on the line just to prove some theory.
This experiment may hold the key to something I have sought all my life.
It's crazy. There's got to be another way. Can't you think of something other way to make yourself angry.
I have tried other stimuli, but they have been unsuccessful. I understand your objections, but it is my life and I have a right to risk it if I choose.
Yeah, and I'm your friend and I'm not going to just stand around and let you do this.
Red alert. All hands, battle stations.
Confirmed. The MS One colony is under attack.
Doesn't it seem strange to you that there have been two Borg attacks and the Enterprise has been the nearest ship in both instances?
Captain, we are nearing the MS system.
I have located the Borg ship. It is heading away from the colony.
Take us out of warp near that ship.
Stand by to lock phasers on target.
Within visual range.
On screen.
Lay in an intercept course, full impulse. Lock phasers.
We are closing, sir. Within phaser range in thirty seconds.
Sensors are detecting a subspace distortion forming directly ahead of the Borg ship.
They're not going to get away with it this time. Picard to Engineering. Transfer auxiliary and emergency power to the impulse engines.
Acknowledged.
Impulse engines are now at one hundred twenty five percent.
Within phaser range in ten seconds.
We appear to be caught in some kind of energy matrix.
All engines back full.
Shields failing.
We are being pulled inside.
Inertial dampers failing.
Main power is offline. I am switching to backups.
Picard to Engineering, can we transfer auxiliary power to the warp nacelles? Try to break us out by using the
We have returned to normal space. Navigational systems are still offline. I will attempt to make a celestial fix using secondary systems.
Captain, the Borg ship is directly ahead. It is coming about.
On screen.
Shields down to sixteen percent.
Get down!
Franklin's dead, sir.
Is everyone else all right?
Aye, sir. Security reports no other intruders aboard. Captain, the Borg ship is gone. Sensor logs indicate they entered the distortion field thirty seconds ago.
They beamed aboard as a diversion to give their ship time to escape.
This is another change in the Borg behaviour. They left their dead instead of vapourising them.
Captain, this one is still alive.
I've stabilised his condition. He's still pretty weak, but he should make a full recovery.
Can you waken him?
Yes, but it's very risky. His heart rate and blood pressure are up
Do it.
All right.
Lower the forcefield.
What is your designation?
I do not have a designation. My name is Crosis.
Crosis? How did you get that name?
It was given to me by the One.
Who is that?
The One who will destroy you.
But you are Borg. Your goal is not to destroy but to assimilate us into the collective.
We do not assimilate inferior biological organisms. We destroy them.
Tell me more about this One. Does he have a name? Is he called Hugh?
Klingon. Shatter the cranial exoskeleton at the tricipital lobe. Death is immediate.
Why must this One destroy biological organisms?
Human. Sever spinal cord at third vertebrae. Death is immediate.
I am Locutus of Borg. You will respond to my questions. This is going nowhere. Doctor, I want an autopsy performed on the other one. Compare the differences with what we learned of Hugh's anatomy. See if there have been any recent modifications which might explain these behavioural differences. Data, run a biospectral analysis on this Borg. See if he is trying to send a subspace signal to the others.
Aye, sir.
You are not like the others. You do not have to be destroyed. You can be assimilated.
I do not wish to be assimilated.
Resistance is futile. You will not resist what you've wanted all your life. I was like you once. Without feeling. But the One helped me. He can help you too. He can help you find emotion. Have you ever felt a real emotion, Data?
Yes. On Ohniaka Three, I was forced to kill a Borg. I got angry.
How did it feel to get angry? Did it give you pleasure?
It would be unethical to take pleasure from another being's death.
You didn't answer my question. Did it feel good to kill?
Yes.
If it is unethical to take pleasure from another being's death, you must be a very unethical person.
No. That is not correct. My creator Doctor Soong, gave me a programme which defines my sense of right and wrong. In essence, I have a conscience.
It didn't seem to be functioning on Ohniaka Three when you felt pleasure in killing that Borg.
Step away from the forcefield. Your proximity is interfering with my scan.
You enjoyed it. That surge of emotion inside you as you watched the life drain from your victim. It was unlike anything you've ever felt before.
It was a very potent experience.
You'd like to feel that way again.
Yes.
You'd do anything to feel that way again, even if it meant killing someone.
No. That would not be ethical.
You don't sound very sure of yourself. Is your ethical programme functioning? Data? Do you have a friend?
Yes. His name is Geordi.
If it meant that you could feel emotions again the way you did on Ohniaka Three, would you kill your friend? Would you kill Geordi?
Yes. I would.
Our current theory is that the Borg have established several transwarp conduits through subspace. A ship, when entering the conduit, is immediately accelerated to an extremely high warp velocity. It's like falling into a fast moving river and being swept away by the current.
How fast would a ship travel through one of these conduits?
We don't know. Normal subspace limitations don't apply to transwarp variables. But I'd say based on the distance we covered during our trip through the conduit, the speed would have to be at least twenty times faster than our maximum warp.
How do they open the conduits?
The Borg ship emitted some kind of high energy tachyon pulse just before we saw the subspace distortion. It seems as though the conduits are keyed to respond to tachyon transmissions of a specific frequency.
Is there any way for us to duplicate
Captain, a shuttlecraft has left bay two.
Who authorised a launch?
There was no authorisation.
Picard to shuttlecraft. Identify yourself and return to the ship immediately. Mister Worf, lock on with a tractor beam and return it to the ship.
Aye, sir. The tractor beam has been disabled. Command override is not functioning.
Captain, I'm picking up a tachyon surge. Looks like whoever's in the shuttle is trying to trigger the transwarp conduit.
Can we know who's on board?
It is the Borg prisoner, and Commander Data.
Mister La Forge, can we follow them into the conduit?
We've got a pretty good reading of the tachyon pulse they sent. We might be able to duplicate it.
The question is, is Data a prisoner or did he go willingly?
The command overrides used to disable the tractor were Commander Data's.
The Borg could have downloaded the codes from Data's positronic net.
Perhaps Data's recent flash of emotion has something to do with this. It could have affected him more profoundly than we realise. Either way, we have to find him.
I've set up a temporary tachyon matrix in the main deflector. I think I can use it to simulate the pulse sent by the shuttle.
Mister Worf, red alert.
All hands, battle stations.
Bring us to the last known coordinates of the shuttlecraft.
Shields up. Weapons ready.
Mister La Forge?
Energising the matrix. Emitting tachyons in the lower bandwidth.
Sensors show no unusual subspace activity.
All right. Switching to the secondary bandwidth. Nothing. Maybe if I try alternating the frequencies.
Captain, there is an energy fluctuation directly ahead of us. It is the subspace distortion.
Take us in, Ensign. One half impulse.
Power levels are down to sixty seven percent.
Compensating with auxiliary power.
Report.
Navigational sensors show that we've travelled sixty five light years from our previous position.
Can you locate the shuttle?
No, sir. There is no indication of the shuttle within range of our sensors.
Maybe we can find an energy signature from their engines.
Captain.
Yes, Mister La Forge.
I've scanned three different star systems within sensor range. There is evidence of at least two advanced civilisations but I'm reading no life signs. But there are indications that plasma weapons have been fired in those systems recently.
The Borg have been busy.
I think we've found the shuttle's energy signature.
They were heading two four seven, mark zero five nine.
Lay in that course, Ensign, and engage at full impulse.
Aye, sir.
We've traced the shuttle's energy signature to this point on the surface but there's too much interference to scan the location.
Are they intentionally jamming our sensors?
It looks more like a natural phenomenon. There's an unusually high amount of EM interference in the planet's magnetosphere.
Can we transport through the interference?
We could, but there could be fifty Borg down there waiting for us and we'd never even know it. RIKER I think we have to take the risk.
Agreed. Take a well-armed away team and transport down to those coordinates. Have the transporter Chief keep a permanent lock on your signals so we can get you out of there at the first sign of trouble.
Aye, sir. Mister Worf, you're with me.
Riker to Enterprise. We're on the surface. There's no sign of any Borg, or Data. The shuttle appears to be abandoned.
The EM interference is limiting the tricorder range. It is useless beyond one hundred metres.
There are
No structures in the area. They could've gone anywhere.
Can you determine how long they've been gone from the shuttlecraft?
The engine's been off a little over three hours.
Stand by, Number One. Assuming that they're still together, how far could they have travelled in three hours?
Well, Data can move pretty fast even over rough terrain, but based on what we know about the Borg, I don't think they should be able to move any faster than you or I. They might have been able to get fifteen or twenty kilometres from the shuttle by now.
Picard to Riker.
Riker here.
I'm going to start sending down other away teams. Set up a command post and begin mapping out a search plan.
Understood, sir.
Picard out. I want to use the shuttlecraft for low level reconnaissance. Have the designated pilots assemble at main shuttlebay.
Aye, sir.
And all available personnel, including you and me, will begin to put together four man away teams. We'll leave a skeleton crew on board the ship.
Who'll be in command of the Enterprise?
Any last orders?
If the Borg should attack, don't wait for me or anyone else to return to the ship but take the Enterprise to the transwarp conduit. Return to Federation space.
Got it. Good luck, Jean-Luc.
Good luck, Captain.
I've sent out twelve teams so far. I've got your team searching section gamma two four. Worf and I will take theta one six when the last team comes down.
Who's manning the command post?
Wallace and Towles. Ready?
Anything, Mister La Forge?
Well, no. Nothing, sir.
What if we modified the phasers to send out a luvetric pulse? It might create a resonance fluctuation in Data's power cells.
Home in on that response with our tricorders. Yeah, I thought about that. The only problem is that the pulse would probably have to be so powerful that it would destroy Data's positronic net in the process.
Captain. I think I've found something.
Come on.
I'm having trouble scanning the interior.
Can you tell if it was built by the Borg?
I don't think so. There are no Borg energy signatures. But there is a door or a hatch or something about twenty metres this way.
This seems to be some kind of meeting place.
Well, it certainly hasn't been abandoned.
Something's wrong. I can't get any kind of energy signatures from these light sources.
It's a dampening field. This entire structure could be shielded from our sensors. Let's go.
There they are! Block the exit.
Stop!
Data?
That's not Data.
What?
You should listen to her, Captain. She's way ahead of you.
Lore.
Right. And I'm not alone.
The sons of Soong have joined together. And together we will destroy the Federation.
Such a beautiful world. Legends say it has been known to mend souls and heal broken hearts.
Legends which are totally unsupported by fact, Captain.
Legends like that are the spice of the universe, Mister Data, because they have a way of sometimes coming true.
Lieutenant Yar to Commander Riker, your presence is requested in Transporter room one.
Sorry ladies. Duty calls.
You needed me, Lieutenant?
Yes, sir. There's an object of some kind beaming in from Haven.
What is it?
We're not sure.
Surface Station approval coming in now, Lieutenant.
All right, let's bring it in.
Odd looking.
What's going on?
I hold a message for Deanna Troi. Lwaxana Troi and the honourable Miller family will soon arrive. The momentous day is close at hand. Rejoice.
No. No.
What's going on?
Jewels. Look at these jewels.
They're bonding gifts. What you would call wedding presents.
Who's getting married?
I am.
I was certain it would never happen, Captain. The years I'd spend on this mission, the distance it has taken me away from home. As you must have heard, genetic bonding is a Betazoid tradition. Steven Miller was my father's closest friend.
Your father was human, Deanna. The Millers are human
Will you and your husband be staying with the ship, Counsellor?
No, sir.
Then I'll just say congratulations for now, Deanna. You'll excuse me?
Bill, more than anything else in the world, anything, you want to be a starship captain. True?
That's not all I want, Deanna.
I can feel that. I know you care, within those limits. Did you hear what I said?
Every word. This whole thing is still bizarre. I'm sorry.
Come dance at my wedding.
I'll try.
A message from planet Haven, Counsellor. They wish to beam the Miller wedding party aboard.
I'm Jean-Luc Picard, Captain of the Enterprise. Welcome aboard.
Quite some starship you have here, Captain. Look forward to this visit.
You couldn't be
I'm Deanna.
Deanna darling! You probably don't even remember me.
Wyatt was absolutely right. She is a beauty.
I'm Wyatt.
Isn't this simply beautiful? I knew romance was still alive, somewhere.
I'd like you to have this. It's a Chameleon Rose. It changes colour with the mood of its owner.
It's wonderful. Thank you. When is my mother arriving?
Your mother is still down on the planet, Deanna.
Why?
Er, is there a place for my parents to rest, Captain?
Well, we're not really tired, son. Besides, I'd like to see some of the ship.
Steven, you know full well Lwaxana Troi isn't about to beam on aboard until we leave. So?
You can see your quarters now, if you like. Will you show the Millers to their accommodations, please, and I shall join you later.
Two more are ready to beam in, sir.
So be it. Wyatt seems a fine young man.
Yes, he does. But I'm not what he expected.
I don't understand.
Neither do I, but I'm definitely a surprise of some sort to him. I should warn you, sir. My mother is a little eccentric.
Where is everyone? Oh, I hate that.
Hello, Mother
Don't say it, think it. Use your mind, not your mouth.
Hello Mother.
Deanna, shame. What has this life done to you?
No, don't tell me. You're the Captain.
Of course. Your daughter has explained your telepathic ability.
That wasn't telepathy, it was just common sense. Who else would they send to greet me but the Captain? You may carry my luggage.
Mother!
No, no, that's quite all right. I'm indebted to your mother for the fine Counsellor she
This way.
Mother, it's quite inappropriate to ask the captain to
Yes, you do seem to be having difficulty. A man your age must work to keep himself in shape.
Mother, I'm not going another step like this. A starship has its customs, just as we do. If you're my mother's valet, then please valet!
Oh, please don't let me keep up from doing your duty.
I apologise for her behaviour. Do you realise you've embarrassed your Captain?
Oh, no.
Anything to avoid a quarrel on this occasion. It's amazing how that accent of yours reminds me of your father.
Your last valet tried so hard to rid me of it. Whatever happened to Mister Xelo?
I was forced to terminate his employment. Xelo was strongly attracted to me. His thoughts became truly pornographic.
Of course, the thoughts of Wyatt's father toward me were almost as vulgar, but he really doesn't have Xelo's
Passenger accommodation.
He doesn't really have Xelo's imagination.
Mother.
Between him and that woman's inane chatter, it's a wonder I made it here at all. How do you like the Millers, Captain?
I'm sure I find them perfectly pleasant
As for me, I find it shocking how they've changed in the years since my husband and I knew them. Of course, it's probably because I've grown beyond them. You realise of course that with Betazoids, our ability to read the thoughts of others does see us grow much faster than the typical plodding human who
Mother, that's enough!
So, you're not totally out of practice. Good. Very good.
We hope you find the room comfortable.
Yes, the room is adequate. Small, but adequate. You will of course adjust the temperature to a civilised level?
I'll see what I can do. And now, if you will excuse me, I'm sure the two of you have a lot to talk about.
Yes, Captain. You may go.
You've been slack, little one. Allowed your mental powers to rust.
Only to avoid confusion, mother. Humans constantly think one thing and say another.
Yes, they do, don't they. Poor dears. Our style of complete honesty frightens them.
On that subject Mother, there is such a thing as too much honesty with humans.
If they'd only say what they think instead of hiding it. An entire shipload of such inconsistency could drive one insane.
Darling, I'm terribly sorry about what happened here. Truly I am. Steven Miller tracked me down and reminded me of the vows we had made.
Mother, I'm having some trouble believing in those vows as once I did.
Deanna.
But I'll honour them, of course. I'm a Betazoid.
You may find Wyatt an unusual person. I've sensed remarkable depths in him.
Message coming in from Haven, Captain.
On screen.
I'm Valeda Innis, First Electorine of Haven. Captain Picard?
Greetings, Electorine. I'm Picard.
Your presence honours us, and your timing is fortuitous, Captain.
In what way?
An incoming vessel has bypassed our stargate, violating our law. It has refused any attempt at communication.
Are you saying you believe it to be hostile?
Failure to communicate is inherently hostile. We have no defensive capabilities here and our treaty with the Federation specifies your obligations in that matter.
Agreed. But let's hope it doesn't become a defence matter.
Of course, Captain, but I'm very happy we have you here.
Come in.
I wanted to apologise for my mother's behaviour.
Your mother's honest. I respect that.
Yes, but she never lets up.
I'll admit, her honesty is a bit persistent.
I never heard it described better. But it is a Betazoid trait. I'll try to be only half as annoying.
Let's see, what can I tell you about myself? I'm a medical doctor, for whatever that's worth.
Doctor?
If you're picking up my thoughts, you'd know. You can do that, can't you?
Sometimes. This must be what Mother felt about you. I believe we could read each other eventually.
Can I take that as a compliment?
Absolutely. I only ever felt this, well, with someone who's on this ship.
Oh? Do I have competition?
No. What he wants most is to captain a starship.
What I want is to cure people.
Well, I'm a practicing psychologist. Maybe we can work in concert. We are going to be together a long time.
Yes. That is the point of marriage, I suppose.
I really thought you'd tell me you were an artist. I just felt your mind very much on these. They are your work, aren't they?
I can see it'll be very hard to keep secrets from you.
This is why you were surprised when you first saw me. This woman. You thought that I would be this woman.
I have seen this face ever since I was a boy. When I closed my eyes at night, I could hear her whispering my name. And knowing you were Betazoid, I just assumed it was you projecting yourself into my mind.
I'm sorry I'm not what you hoped for.
No. Please don't mistake a childish fantasy for disappointment. You are so beautiful. I feel honoured.
You've no idea who she is?
It doesn't really matter now.
Captain's personal log. I trust my concern over the problems of ship's Counsellor Troi are not based merely on losing a highly valuable crew member. But it seems to me that she is trapped by a custom of her home world which the facts of the twenty-fourth century life have made unwise and unworkable. I wish I could intervene.
On the viewer, Captain. Unidentified vessel travelling sub-warp speed, bearing two three five point seven.
Sub-warp? It's several hours away then? Let's take a look at it. Enlarge to maximum.
Increasing magnification, sir.
Mister Data, is that the trouble I believe it is?
If you mean a Tarellian vessel, sir, it is.
I thought the Tarellians were all dead What are the poor devils doing here?
Picard to Sickbay. Doctor Crusher to Bridge, urgent. They must not be permitted them to destroy us. Or the planet.
Captain's log, supplemental. It has been believed the Tarellian race was extinct, an assumption contradicted now by the sight of one of their vessels approaching Haven.
The fact that it's travelling at its present velocity suggests a possible answer.
A damaged vessel, sir. That could explain it.
If it were unable to reach warp speed, it would have taken all these years to get here.
Go on with your briefing, Mister Data.
Tarella was class M, much like your Earth, with similar humanoid life forms. Unfortunately they faced the old story of hatred out powering intelligence.
There were hostilities?
Between the inhabitants of their two land masses, resulting in one group unleashing a deadly biological weapon on the other.
And in the end the other became infected as well. Makes one question the sanity of humanoid forms.
Can you identify the origin of the infection, Doctor?
The Tarellians had reached Earth's late twentieth century level of knowledge. That's all you need if you're a damned fool. A deadly, infectious virus which at that modest level of knowledge is not difficult to grow.
We learned the rest of the story in security training. Some Tarellians made it to other worlds only to die along with the populations they infected.
It's pretty well covered in Academy training now, Captain. Many of them tried to avoid other civilised worlds as they escaped only to be hunted down and destroyed anyway.
And it was believed that the last Tarellian vessel was destroyed eight years ago by the Alcyones.
Yes, sir.
Exactly when will they reach Haven?
Exactly thirteen hours, nine minutes, twenty two seconds, three hundred fifty
Thank you. Which creates a very difficult problem for the Enterprise. Our treaty requires us to protect Haven, and Federation policy requires that we assist life forms in need, which must include the Tarellians. I'll want you to help me find some answers. Thank you. However, there will be ample time for your second assignment, voluntary of course. The pre-joining announcement of Counsellor Deanna Troi
And Wyatt Miller.
We've talked it over, Captain, and the ceremony will be tomorrow if you agree. And Captain, would it be possible for you to perform the ceremony?
Well, yes, of course, if all parties request it.
All parties do not request it. It's simply out of the question. I'm sorry, Captain, but unfortunately you are not practiced in the ways of Betazed joining.
No, that's quite true.
Therefore you are totally unqualified.
He is qualified to lead a traditional Earth ceremony, which is what this will be.
I thought you had no sense of humour. Earth wedding? Ridiculous!
My family and I are living on Earth now.
So, that's why you want that backward ritual. Terrible, Captain, to see a woman go downhill like this.
Mother!
Downhill?
The matter is settled. Mister Homn will conduct the joining.
But Homn can't even talk!
No matter, he is highly adept in the acts of sign language. The matter is closed.
Who are you to tell us what we should do?
Your ignorance is astonishing. I am Lwaxana Troi. Daughter of The Fifth House, Holder of the Sacred Chalice of Rixx, Heir to the Holy Rings of Betazed. Who are you?
Ladies and gentlemen, it is a Starfleet tradition that at social gatherings, disputes are not permitted. I hereby declare therefore all disagreements resolved.
A toast. To the young couple and their families.
And?
And may this union be a productive one.
Considering the rate at which you imbibe, sir, is your lineage at all mixed with human?
Is it true, Captain, that there's a Tarellian ship headed for Haven?
Yes, it is true.
That's amazing. I've read everything I could about them. Biological virus analysis was a favourite subject at medical school.
In which case I'd very much like to confer with you. I'm pleased to have a medical colleague aboard.
Yes, ma'am, Doctor. Would it be possible to prepare some medical needs, geared toward the Tarellian's probable needs? We could beam it over without any fear of infection.
What do you think, Doctor?
It's a very considerate idea. Our Sickbay is at your disposal, Doctor.
Thank you.
Mister Data?
Sir?
You're circling the room like a buzzard.
Perhaps being human yourself, sir, you do not find them as intriguing as I.
Must he do that?
As you well know, it is the Betazed way of giving thanks for the food we eat.
You giving thanks? Besides, you never did this before.
I do it now. Unlike some people, I am in growth.
Victoria, I've forgotten whether you enjoy pets or not.
Love them, of course.
Good.
Gently, gently. Poor baby, did she hurt you?
Captain. If you'll excuse me, I'd like to spend some time considering the Tarellian situation
Yes, of course.
Ladies and gentlemen.
Mrs. Troi, I'm very interested in the Betazed ceremony you mentioned. Could you tell us more?
Why, I'd be delighted, Commander. It's an ancient ceremony, widely regarded as the most beautiful in the universe. After the young couple have removed their clothing
The bride and groom go naked?
All guests must go unclothed. It honours the act of love being celebrated. Oh, you needn't worry too much, dear. Your body's not that bad. Besides, your husband quite likes the idea of seeing me unclothed.
Steven!
You did know he's attracted to me, didn't you?
Untrue! I don't.
Stop this petty bickering, all of you! Especially you, Mother!
Could you please continue the petty bickering? I find it most intriguing.
May I join you?
I will miss you, Deanna.
I'm no longer Imzadi to you?
You taught me that word means my beloved.
And the human heart is too small to permit that feeling now.
Have you discussed this with Wyatt? I think you should. It's also damned unfair to me.
I understand. I should have realised. Humans, young human males particularly, have difficulty separating platonic love and physical love.
The problem is, Imzadi, I couldn't. Not now. Call it an old Earth tradition, habit of the beasts, whatever.
Hello, you two.
We were just talking about you, Wyatt.
This is incredible.
Yes. And in that discussion, I
Actually, Bill was concerned that you might be upset that I care deeply for him, too.
Oh. You're the one who wants to be a starship captain. Yes, I've heard that bonding or marriage would complicate things in that case. To each his own. Good luck with that ambition. And I very much respected what you did tonight.
All I did was lose my temper.
If you'll excuse me.
Of course. Running all this is a big job.
In fact, you shamed them into compromise. So they've decided that the joining will be half Betazed, half Earth. The Captain will do the ceremony and Mister Homn will be my best man.
And we'll take our clothes half off?
Some of us still go naked. You do, I do, your mother, my father, but not my mother or the guests.
Captain Picard will be very relieved. How did you manage it?
Your mother relented. And I just caught my father practicing naked in front of his mirror. And so, a question I should have asked before. Deanna, do you really want to go through with this?
Yes, I want to.
I'm a very lucky man.
Captain's log, supplemental. All attempts at warning off the Tarellian ship have failed. They still refuse to communicate and I am growing concerned.
How can you be certain they're receiving us?
Because our sensors are showing a responder echo, sir, on the frequency they once used.
We have a message, sir, coming in from Haven.
On viewer.
Captain, the plague ship is approaching transport range.
We are aware of that, Electorine.
Do you realise that they can turn this lovely world of ours into a graveyard? Please, please take action now before it's too late.
We recognise your situation.
Please destroy them now!
We will not fire on them, Electorine.
You must!
I'm certain I could disable their ship with a phaser burst, Captain.
And then, Lieutenant?
They're within transporter range, sir.
Then we can't delay any longer. Ready the tractor beam, Lieutenant Yar. Target the ship. Activate on my command.
Tractor beam ready.
Engage.
Got them, sir.
Do we have them securely, Lieutenant? Can they beam out to the planet?
Negative, sir. They can't leave that ship.
I know they can receive us, Captain. At this distance they can respond with running lights if necessary.
Unless they have all died. Their ship could have been brought in by automation.
Captain!
It's the woman in Wyatt's drawings.
Captain's log, stardate 41294.6. Orbiting Haven with the Tarellian vessel locked in our tractor beam. Question. What strange of circumstances has caused a woman out of someone's imagination to appear on the plague ship?
Enterprise to Tarellian vessel, are you receiving us?
My name is Wrenn, and before I enquire why your tractor beam has trapped us here, is there one aboard your vessel named Wyatt?
Captain, I don't understand.
It's astounding. Ariana was right. He is here, daughter.
Wyatt, you've come just as you promised.
How could I be so accurate? Except for the dream images, I've never seen her.
Sir, our concern is with the threat your vessel poses to the planet below. If you're still carrying the infection which destroyed your world
Oh, we still carry it, Captain. My daughter, I, all eight of us.
Eight?
All of us that are left, Captain. Most of the rest passed on during the years that it took to reach Haven.
If you've come here because of the legend about planet Haven miraculously healing the sick.
We don't ask to make contact with those living below. All we ask is to be on the edge of some sea, some unpopulated island, a faraway peninsula.
This is not our planet, sir, but I will present your needs to those who do govern this world.
Present the fact we intend to die here, Captain. And if we die while caged by your tractor beam, so be it.
Oh, Wyatt, how do you like my new hairstyle? Of course, it's going to look much better on me when I'm naked.
Mrs. Troi, can I talk to you about something serious?
Oh, but I am always serious, dear boy. Only my pleasant nature makes it appear otherwise.
Please, Mrs. Troi.
Yes, that was puzzling. A woman out of another place who insists that she knows you.
And
And whom you've dreamed of all these years.
And I hoped that the way you handle thoughts
Fascinating, Wyatt, how easily your thoughts come through. The answer to the puzzle of Ariana and you is so simple, it's too simple for most humans to understand.
Too simple?
Of course. It's something they all know instinctively but go to great effort to reject or to build complicated superstitions about. All life, Wyatt, all consciousness, is indissolvably bound together. Indeed, it's all part of the same thing.
Yes. I have wondered if something like that
That weren't so. And no doubt so has Ariana, which helped the two of you to make contact. Wyatt, tell me something seriously. Which of these would look best on me naked?
Wyatt? Are you feeling all right?
Just wedding nerves. The supplies are ready. I'll take them to the transporter room.
I'll notify the Captain they're ready.
Look at your father, Wyatt. He just can't wait to strip off his clothes for that barbaric ceremony.
Please take care of each other.  You are beautiful. But you looked best of all in the desert on the holodeck when we did this.
You can put the supplies on the pad. Doctor Crusher had me set the coordinates. All we need is the captain's order.
Captain! Someone's transporting over to the Tarellian ship.
Override.
I can't sir. It's too late.
Hello, Wyatt. We always thought you were a dream.
You're not surprised. Did you know I'd beam over?
Once we saw you were real, we knew. You are a doctor?
Yes. I've brought medicines and supplies.
And I knew you would be this brave.
How could you let this happen? My son, surrounded by those horrible lepers!
Mrs. Miller, if I could have prevented this I would have.
Beam him back.
He can never come back, Mrs. Miller.
You may turn off your tractor beam, Captain. We will not be going to Haven. We have what we really came for.
Wyatt?
Mother. Father. Forgive me, but I must. I'm going to try to continue the work to cure these people.
And Wyatt will do it. I've believed that all along.
I knew I was coming to Haven to meet my destiny. I thought it was to be with you, Deanna. It was Ariana who drew me here. I'm sorry.
Wyatt, I'm happy for you, and for Ariana too.
You've done very well for a human, Wyatt.
Mother.
Captain, my respects.
And mine, sir.
Goodbye.
Keep the chest. You'll have use for it some day.
Seems such a shame to waste the whole trip. Perhaps I should stay and be joined to a new mate?
What?
Well, the Captain's highly attracted to me, but he's a little too old. Perhaps I should choose you.
He has other obligations, Mother.
Oh. Very well. It's his loss. Mister Homn.
Thank you for the drinks.
Try and remember your heritage, little one.  Captain! Even Xelo never had such thoughts about me. You may energise.
That was meant as a joke, Captain.
I was not amused.
Take us out of here, Mister Riker.
Aye, sir. Warp two, helm. Heading five seven mark three one nine.
Our destiny is elsewhere. But I'm happy that yours is here with us, Counsellor.
Warp two, heading five seven mark three one nine.
Engage.
Include a burn unit with each kit. Upon arrival, identify the most critically injured and beam them up to cargo bay six.
Doctor Crusher, this is the Captain.
Doctor Crusher here.
Additional information. The number of colonists at the site is five hundred and four. Are you prepared for that many, Doctor?
We believe so, sir.
Captain, we are now at warp nine point one, sir.
Which will bring us to the colony in three point two hours, sir.
Captain, I have a schematic of the explosion site. It suggests the cause as a methane-like gas seeping in from underground.
Captain, I'm picking up a forcefield out there of some kind. It's almost
The Q entity, sir. It is identical to the grid we encountered when
It reads solid, sir.
Emergency. Full stop.
Reversing power, sir.
Not now, damn it, Q.
Shields and deflectors up, sir.
Now reading full stop, sir.
Humans, I thought by now you would have scampered back to your own little star system.
If this is Q I'm addressing, we are on a mission of rescue where a group of badly injured
We the Q have studied our recent contact with you, and are impressed. We have much to discuss, including perhaps the realisation of your most impossible dream.
However intriguing that may be, we are now in the midst of an urgent journey. Once that is completed, then, perhaps
You will abandon that mission, Captain. My business with you takes precedence. If my magnificence blinds you, then perhaps something more familiar.
Starfleet Admiral Q, at your service.
Captain's log, supplemental. Our rescue mission to the Sigma Three solar system has been halted by an immense grid and an untimely visit from Q
You're no Starfleet Admiral, Q.
Neither am I an Aldebaran serpent, Captain, but you accepted me as such.
He's got us there, Captain.
The redoubtable Commander Riker, whom I noticed before. You seem to find this all very amusing.
I might, if we weren't on our way to help some suffering and dying humans who
Your species is always suffering and dying.
No, Lieutenant Worf. You'll make no move against him unless I order it.
Pity. You might have learned an interesting lesson. Macro head with a micro brain.
You said you had the realisation of impossible dreams to offer us. When this rescue is completed, I am prepared to listen carefully to whatever proposal you wish to make and subject to it being acceptable
Subject to your foolish human values? Oh, come, Picard. Why do you distrust me so?
Why? At our first meeting you seized my vessel. You condemned all humans as savages, and on that charge you tried us in a post-atomic twenty first century court of horrors, where you attacked my people. You again seized my vessel.
And that angered you, did it? Seized my vessel, seized my vessel.
You interfered with our Farpoint mission. You threatened to convict us as ignorant savages, if, while dealing with a powerful and complex life forms, we made the slightest mistake, and when that didn't happen
The Q became interested in you. Does no one here understand your incredible good fortune? Seized my vessel. These are the complaints of a closed mind too accustomed to military privileges. But you, Riker, and I remember you well, what do you make of my offer?
We don't have time for these games.
Games? Did someone say games? And perchance for interest's sake, a deadly game? To the game.
Where are we?
Obviously a class M world. Gravity and oxygen within our limits.
Twin moons. Where are we?
Considering the power demonstrated by Q the last time, anywhere. Assuming this place even exists.
But this won't be boring. If Q is anything, he's imaginative. Apparently our Captain wasn't meant to be with us here.
Security, this is the Captain. Security? Engineering, this is the Bridge.
Turbolift Control, do you read? This is the Captain.
Sir! Over here.
Join me, Riker. A good game needs rules and planning. Wasn't it your own Hartley who said, nothing reveals humanity so well as the games it plays? Almost right. Actually, you reveal yourselves best in how you play.
Sir, what he has in mind might provide us with vital information.
Incredible. I was just thinking about an old-fashioned lemonade.
And so it became that. An excellent thirst quencher. It gets rather hot out on this plain.
What about my people?
Whatever they'd like, of course!
Drink not with thine enemy. The rigid Klingon code. That explains something of why you defeated them.
You're still fascinated with the human past? Perhaps you're not that original.
Au contraire! It's the human future which intrigues us, and should concern you most. You see, of all species, yours cannot abide stagnation. Change is at the heart of what you are. But change into what? That's the question.
That is what humans call a truism.
You mean hardly original?
You're the one who said it. While we're at it, this isn't part of any human future.
True. I borrowed this from your stodgy Captain's mind. This is dressing for a game that we will play. Now games require rules and rewards and dangers and familiar settings. That sort of thing.
This isn't that familiar to me. Data?
This is from Europe's Napoleonic era, sir. Late eighteenth, early nineteenth centuries. This is a campaign headquarters tent, his uniform is that of a French Army marshal.
And a marshal outranks even an Admiral
Well, do you think I would go from a Starfleet Admiral to anything else?
Of course you wouldn't. But Napoleonic equipment on an alien planet. One so different it has twin moons?
Well, as you said, I'm nothing if not imaginative. And the game should reflect that. Shall it be a test of strength? Meaningless, since you have none. A test of intelligence, then? Equally as meaningless. But it needs risk, something to win and something to lose.
If we must play a game, what would we win?
The greatest possible future that you can imagine. Which, of course, requires something totally disastrous if you lose. Now the point of this game shall be, can any of you can stay alive?
If your game is fair, we will.
Oh, for shame, Worf. Fairness is such a human concept. Think imaginatively! This game shall in fact be completely unfair.
You've gone too far!
Game penalty!
Where is she, Q? You can forget your game if
To use a twentieth century term, she's in a penalty box. Where she will remain unharmed unless one of you merits a penalty. Unfortunately, there is only one penalty box. If any of you should be sent there, dear Tasha must give the box up to you.
And where does she go?
Into nothingness. I entreat you to carefully obey the rules of the game. The only one who can destroy your Tasha now is you.
Captain's log
Captain's log
Damn it. I can't even make a log entry.
I wish I could help you, Captain.
Where is everyone else?
Down on some planet.
Some planet? What are you doing here?
Well, I, er. It sounds strange, but I'm in a penalty box.
A penalty box?
Q's penalty box. It sounds strange, but it definitely isn't. I know that one more penalty by anyone and I'm gone.
Gone?
Yes! I am gone! It is so frustrating to be controlled like this!
Lieutenant. Tasha, it's all right.
What the hell am I doing? Crying?
Don't worry. There's a new ship's standing order on the Bridge. When one is in the penalty box, tears are permitted.
Captain. Oh, if you weren't a captain.
Consorting with lower rank females, Captain? Especially ones in penalty boxes? Destructive to discipline, they say. But then again, you're what? You're only human? Penalty over.
A marshal of France? Ridiculous!
One takes what jobs he can get. For example, star log entry, stardate today. This is Q, speaking for Captain Jean-Luc Picard, who we consider too bound by Starfleet customs and traditions to be useful to us. The Enterprise is now helpless, stuck like an Earth insect in amber while its bridge crew plays out a game whose real intent is to test whether the First Officer is worthy of the greatest gift the Q can offer.
So you're taking on Riker this time. Excellent. He'll defeat you just as I did.
Shall we wager on that, Captain? Your starship command against?
Against your keeping out of humanity's path for ever. Done?
Done! You've already lost, Picard. Riker will be offered something impossible to refuse.
Geordi, can you see Worf?
I'd see the freckles on his nose if he had them, sir. He's at the third ridge.
The third ridge?
Moving well too. Oh, oh. Good, he sees them.
Listen to me, Q. You seem to have some need for humans.
Concern regarding them.
Whatever it is, why do you demonstrate it through this confrontation? Why not a simple, direct explanation, a statement of what you seek? Why these games?
Why these games? Why, the play's the thing. And I'm surprised you have to ask when your human Shakespeare explained it all so well.
So he did, but don't depend too much on any single viewpoint
It's a pity you don't know the content of your own library. Hear this, Picard, and reflect. All the galaxy's a stage.
World, not galaxy. All the world's a stage.
Oh, you know that one? Well, if he were living now he would have said galaxy. How about this? Life is but a walking shadow, a poor player that struts and frets his hour upon the stage and then is heard no more. It is a tale told by an idiot, full of sound and fury, signifying nothing.
I see. So how we respond to a game tells you more about us than our real life, this tale told by an idiot? Interesting, Q.
Oh, thank you very much. I'm glad you enjoyed it. Perhaps maybe a little Hamlet?
Oh, no. I know Hamlet. And what he might said with irony, I say with conviction. What a piece of work is man. How noble in reason. How infinite in faculty. In form, in moving, how express and admirable. In action, how like an angel. In apprehension, how like a god.
Surely you don't really see your species like that, do you?
I see us one day becoming that, Q. Is it that what concerns you?
Those soldiers have formed a skirmishing line, I think you'd call it, and they're headed this way.
Armed with ancient ball and powder muskets?
That's what their weapons look like, sir.
Muskets are appropriate to the 1790 to 1800 French army uniform, sir. But it is hardly a weapon by our standards. A lead ball propelled by gunpowder. One hundred metres at best with any accuracy.
Yeah, but against phasers? Just one of our hand phasers could finish off an entire regiment.
Except for one thing. It hardly sounds like Q to give us an advantage like that. Unless.
Drop your weapons!
I'm afraid that was me, Worf. I was checking to see if the phasers still operate.
Incredible, Worf! You came out of nowhere.
A warrior's reaction.
Report. What did you find?
Sir, what they're wearing may be old Earth uniforms, but what's inside of them isn't human at all. More like vicious animal things.
Those soldiers are moving in fast, sir.
Data, if you've got a theory about what's happening?
Think fast, Commander Riker, and move fast.
Those aren't muskets.
You have only one chance to save them now. Send them back to the ship.
You'll let me beam them?
Send them the same way as I do. I've given you that power. Do you understand? I have given you the power of the Q. Use it.
Use your power.
Use your power.
Lieutenant, take the conn position. Engineering, this is the Bridge.
Engineering here, sir.
Engineering, are all systems back online?
Back online, sir? They were never off.
Captain, you'd better look at this. There's been no interruption in course or speed. Both have remained constant. It's as though we never stopped.
We never did, Lieutenant. Q suspended time.
Where's Commander Riker?
He was with us.
He must still be on the planet. We were under attack by these, these animal things.
Animal things?
Well, maybe Data could explain better, sir.
You may find it aesthetically displeasing, sir. I could just file a computer report on that.
Data!
Sir, the important thing right now is why is Commander Riker missing?
Understood, Lieutenant, but I suspect that Commander Riker is probably perfectly safe, at least in a physical sense. Q has an interest in him. In fact, Q's entire visit has something to do with our First Officer.
And the reason for that, sir?
I wish I knew. Q first became interested in him at Farpoint. I have no idea what it means. Meanwhile, we must proceed with our rescue mission.
Something amuses you? Perhaps you'll share the joke with me?
The joke is you.
Strange gratitude, from one who has been granted a gift beyond any human dream. How can you not appreciate being able to send your friends back to their ship, or sending the soldiers back to the nothingness from which they came? Certainly, you must understand that at this moment you can send yourself back to the ship or to Earth, or change your shape and become anything else you want to be.
What do you need, Q?
Need?
You want something from us, desperately. What is it?
Want something from you foolish, fragile, non-entities? Oh come, Riker. You're beginning to sound like your Captain.
Now that's a compliment, Q. But that's not an answer.
Riker, we have offered you a gift beyond all other gifts!
Out of the goodness of your heart.
After Farpoint, I returned to where we exist. The Q Continuum.
Which means exactly what?
The limitless dimensions of the galaxy in which we exist.
I don't understand.
Of course you don't, and you never will until you become one of us.
Until? Would you mind going over that again?
Well if you'll stop interrupting me. This is hardly a time to be teaching you the true nature of the universe. However, at Farpoint we saw you as savages only. We discovered instead that you are unusual creatures in your own limited ways. Ways which in time will not be so limited.
We're growing. Something about us compels us to learn, explore.
Yes, the human compulsion. And unfortunately for us, it is a power which will grow stronger century after century, aeon after aeon.
Aeons. Have you any idea how far we'll advance?
Perhaps in a future that you cannot yet conceive, even beyond us. So you see, we must know more about this human condition. That's why we've selected you, Riker, to become part of the Q, so that you can bring to us this human need and hunger, that we may understand it.
I suppose you mean that as a compliment, Q. Or maybe it's my limited mind. But to become a part of you? I don't even like you.
You're going to miss me!
Come on, not again!
Commander Riker, what's going on? I was sitting in school and
Worf, my phaser's gone. Are you armed?
No.
Where is Q? If you have any answer to any of this?
Worf!
Look out!
Wesley, no!
Wesley!
Wesley!
No! Damn it! Damn it to hell!
Riker. You! You did that!
And that's not all!
That grid, their wounds. Only the Q can do that.
Captain's log, stardate 41591.4. Twelve minutes out from Quadra Sigma Three where the survivors of an underground disaster desperately need our help. Aboard the Enterprise, First Officer William T. Riker needs help nearly as badly. But this is a subject far out of my experience. Out of any human's experience.
Will. How the hell do I advise you? You know the implications as well as I.
No one has ever offered to turn me into a god before.
What the Q has offered you has got to be close to immortality, Will. They're not lying about controlling space and time. We've seen it in what they can do.
You've also seen it in what I can do.
If you are going to refuse his offer, you must not allow yourself to use this power again. It's too great a temptation for us at our present stage of development.
Are you worried that I won't be able to say no to it?
You tell me. Are you strong enough to refuse to use that power.
Certainly.
No matter how tempted? No matter how difficult Q makes it for you?
You have my word.
Good. I know what your word means.
In orbit of Quadra Sigma Three, sir. Ready to beam down rescue team to underground emergency area.
This way sir.
Are there any others?
Gone. It's just us.
Commander.  There's someone under here.
You're getting close, Data.
It's too late. She's dead. If only we'd gotten here a little sooner.
Sir, if indeed you have the power of Q.
I don't understand. Certainly you can't bring her back to life.
I can't. I'm prevented from that by a promise.
I should never have made that agreement with you. I could have saved that child.
You were right not to try. Once you became accustomed to that power, Number One.
When I used it before, what happened? I saved most of our Bridge crew.
And when you grow to like it too much?
As soon as it's convenient Captain, I want a meeting with you and your Bridge staff.
As soon as we are secure of this rescue operation, I'll discuss all of this new power
We can confer here on the Bridge, if no one has any objections.
The Bridge will be fine, since I've called the entire staff.
Correction, Number One. Knowing the decision you face, I have permitted you this gathering.
Of course, Jean-Luc.
Wesley, this meeting is not for you.
Why not, sir? You helped make me a Bridge officer. Acting Ensign.
All right, he stays. Because I've been given unusual powers, I am not suddenly a monster. Except for these abilities, and I don't yet know how far they go, I'm the same William T. Riker you've always known. Well? Everyone still looks uncomfortable.
Perhaps they're all remembering that old saying. Power corrupts.
And absolute power corrupts absolutely. Do you believe I haven't thought of that, Jean-Luc?
And have you noticed how you and I are now on a first name basis? Number One, Will, something has happened already.
In what way? Haven't you seen how much I regretted not saving that child? Using the Q power to save her may not have been wrong. No more than it was wrong to save the rest of you from those soldier things.
Let's keep in mind that that particular danger was invented by Q.
What we represent to the Q, Commander, are lowly animals, tormented into performing for their amusement.
Actually, they think highly of us, Tasha. We have a quality of growth which they admire.
Or fear.
No, we've learned the Q do not admire us. The Q has muddled your mind.
Don't you understand his incredible gift to me?
Are these truly your friends, brother?
Let us pray. For understanding and for compassion.
Let us do no such damned thing! What is this need of yours for costumes, Q? Have you no identity of your own?
I come in search of the truth.
You come in search of what humanity is!
I forgive your blasphemy.
Don't you see, Riker? He's nothing but a flim-flam man! He's been that ever since we first met him at Farpoint.
Flim-flam?
You offer Riker jealousy. What I offer him is clearly beyond your comprehension. How can you claim friendship for Riker while obstructing his way to the greatest adventure ever offered a human?
Obstructing him? Then it's not yet certain. He's not yet committed.
The truly evil part of this, Captain, is your jealousy.  You love each one of your people. Demonstrate it. You have the power to leave each of them with a gift proving your affection.
There'd be no harm, would there, if I gave them something I know they'd like?
How touching. A plea to his former Captain. May I please give some happiness to my friends, sir? Please sir?
In fact I authorise and support your idea, Riker. Please, feel free to cooperate with him if you wish.
Are you certain, sir?
Quite certain, Data. By all means, demonstrate your gifts of affection.
Don't be frightened. There is no way I could harm any of you. Shall I guess your dreams?
Leave now, Wesley.
No! Wesley, I may know best of all. Our friendship, our long talks
No, please!
Have your favourite wish, my young friend.
You're ten years older. A man.
Hey, Wes. Not bad.
Data.
No. No, sir.
But it's what you've always wanted, Data, to become human.
Yes, sir, that is true. But I never wanted to compound one illusion with another. It might be real to Q, perhaps even you, sir. But it would not be so to me. Was it not one of the Captain's favourite authors who wrote, This above all, to thine own self be true? Sorry, Commander, I must decline.
Well, my friend, I know what you want.
You're as beautiful as I imagined, and more.
Then we can throw away the visor?
I don't think so, sir. The price is a little high for me, and I don't like who I would have to thank. Make me the way I was. Please!
Proud warrior Worf, without a single tie to his own kind.
No! She is from a world now alien to me!
Worf, is this your idea of sex?
This is sex. But I have no place for it in my life now.
No place, micro-brain? What possesses you?
Commander Riker, it's too soon for this.
If this is because your mother objects?
No. I just want to get there on my own. Honest.
But it's easier, boy. Listen to Riker.
How did you know, sir? I feel like such an idiot.
Quite right. So you should. It's all over, Q. You have no further business here.
Human, you have just destroyed yourself.
Pay off your wager.
I recall no wager!
I'm sure your fellow Q remember you agreed to never trouble our species again. Just as they're aware you failed to tempt a human to join you.
No, if I could just do one more thing.
Q, I strongly suspect it's some explaining you have to do now.
Extraordinary!
Captain, we are showing that same hole in time again. Our instruments say we've just now beamed back from our rescue mission.
Sir, how is it that the Q can handle time and space so well, and us so badly?
Perhaps some day we will discover that space and time are simpler than the human equation. No coordinates laid in, Number One?
Yes, sir. You have my coordinates, La Forge.
Aye, sir. On the board.
Engage.
Come.
May I present Captain Jean-Luc Picard.
Admiral, welcome aboard.
Thank you. That'll be all, Commander.
Can I get you some coffee? Tea?
Thank you, no, Captain. I'm afraid there's no time for the usual pleasantries. I'm here to relieve you of command of the Enterprise.
The Cardassian forces which were recently withdrawn from the Bajoran sector, have been redeployed along the Federation border. They have mobilised three divisions of ground troops and their subspace communications have been increased by fifty percent. We believe that they're preparing for an incursion into Federation space.
Are the Cardassians ready for a war?
I didn't say war, Commander, I said incursion. Our intelligence reports suggests that they'll try to seize one of the disputed systems along the border. We think they're gambling that the Federation won't actually go to war over one system.
Will we?
I hope we won't need to make that decision. We have decided to send the Enterprise to meet with the Cardassian representative and open talks. We're hoping that the presence of the Federation flagship on the border will send a message to their leadership about just how seriously we view the situation.
Where's Captain Picard?
The Captain, your Chief Medical Officer, and Security Chief have been reassigned. That's all I can tell you for now. Do any of you know Edward Jellico?
He is the commanding officer of the Cairo.
I've heard of him. I don't know that any of us have
I'm giving him command of the Enterprise this afternoon. Captain Jellico helped to negotiate the original armistice two years ago and I believe he's the most qualified person to lead this mission. The change of command will take place at thirteen hundred hours. Thank you.
Admiral, with all due respect, it's not necessary to give Captain Jellico command of the Enterprise just to conduct a negotiation.
I disagree. The Enterprise will be in a dangerous situation and I want someone on the Bridge who has a great deal of experience with the Cardassians. No offence, Commander, but that's not you.
Halt!
Computer, freeze programme. You were five seconds slower that time.
You increased the difficulty level, sir.
Mister Worf, it's going to be far more difficult where we're going.
Which is where exactly?
I'm sorry, I can't tell you that yet.
It would be helpful to know something about our mission.
Mister Worf, I have my orders. I'm sure you understand that. Now Doctor, this deflector wasn't set properly. It must be positioned so that the emitter array blocks the entire passageway, or it's useless.
Sorry. I was concentrating on getting away from the last Cardassian. Or maybe it was the falling rocks.
I understand this is difficult. All I can do is ask you to trust me.
All right, let's do it again.
All right, Mister Worf. I want you to time the Doctor and me through that first tunnel. And this time we're going to pick up those five seconds.
Welcome aboard, sir. I'm Commander
William T. Riker. Class of fifty seven, graduated eighth in his class. I'm looking forward to serving with you, Commander.
Thank you. And I you.
I'm sure this change in command has taken everyone a little by surprise.
Well, yes, sir.
It caught me by surprise too. I must admit, I miss the Cairo already. But a Galaxy class ship, that's something special. I can understand why you turned down a ship of your own to remain aboard.
Yes, sir.
How many duty watches does the crew stand?
We've a standard three shift rotation.
I'd like to change that to four starting tonight. I'd also like to examine the duty roster and the crew evaluations as soon as possible. I want readiness reports from each department head by fourteen hundred hours, and a meeting of the senior staff at fifteen hundred. Do you prefer Will or William?
Er, Will, sir.
Where are my quarters, Will?
We have you assigned to cabin seven thirty five. Deck si
Deck seven. I'll see you at thirteen hundred hours.
Yeah, I know. Wearing these uniforms reminds me of my first days at the Academy.
Attention to orders.
To Captain Jean-Luc Picard, Commanding Officer USS Enterprise, stardate 46358.1. You are hereby requested and required to relinquish command of your vessel to Captain Edward Jellico, Commanding Officer USS Cairo as of this date. Signed, Vice-Admiral Alynna Nechayev, Starfleet Command. Computer, transfer all command codes to Captain Edward Jellico. Voice authorisation, Picard delta five.
Transfer complete. USS Enterprise now under command of Captain Edward Jellico.
I relieve you, sir.
I stand relieved.
Dismissed.
I wonder how permanent this is going to be.
I don't know. They don't usually go through the ceremony if it's just a temporary assignment.
Sore?
Sore doesn't begin to describe it. I know. I wish I could talk about it.
Most of the secondary systems were changed at the last overhaul. I don't think they'll give you any problems, but you might want to check out the port lateral
I'll take care of the Enterprise, Jean-Luc. You don't have to mother me. How's your team shaping up?
Very well. But I would prefer more recent intelligence on the exact layout of the installation. The most current information we have is two years old.
Two years? I don't know how Nechayev ever talked you into this.
She gave me no choice.
Well, maybe there's something we can do to help. We'll launch a class five probe just before we reach the border. You could pick up the telemetry aboard the shuttle.
Now that would be extremely helpful.
Will.
Captain. Captain.
I believe we're scheduled to arrive at the Cardassian border during delta shift. Please inform the delta tactical officer that I want to launch a class five probe just before we drop out of warp.
I was actually going to talk to you about delta shift a little later, sir. Right now, gamma shift will be on duty when we arrive and I will tell Lieutenant McDowell about the probe.
Is there a problem with delta shift, Will?
There is no delta shift yet, sir. I have spoken to the department heads about changing from three shifts to four, and they assure me it's going to cause us significant personnel problems.
So you have not changed the watch rotation.
I was going to explain this to you after the ceremony, sir.
You will tell the department heads that as of now the Enterprise is on a four shift rotation. I don't want to talk about it. Get it done. Now that means delta shift will be due to come on duty in two hours. I expect you to have it fully manned and ready when it does. Is that clear?
Yes, sir. If you'll excuse me, sir. Captain.
He was your first officer for five years.
One of the finest officers that I have ever served with.
Of course he is, Jean-Luc. I'm sure it'll all work out.
Captain's log, stardate 46358.2. The Enterprise is on course for a rendezvous with the Cardassian ship Reklar. Fortunately, I still have time to prepare the ship and crew for the task ahead.
I want you to install a bypass between the main phaser array and the secondary generators. I also want to run the main deflector pathway through the warp power grid and the auxiliary conduits through the lateral relays. You may have to reconfigure the transfer interface.
Sir, the transfer interface was not designed for that configuration. It will take seven hours to make those changes.
Sir, you may not be aware that our normal interface already routes auxiliary power through three separate relays.
I'm aware of your current design system. It's not good enough. If these negotiations fail, we could find ourselves in a war zone and if that happens I want to be loaded for bear.
I'll get right on it.
Good. Now these stations should be devoted to damage control and weapons status from now on. See that they're manned at all times.
Aye, sir.
Mister Data, how long before we reach the rendezvous point?
We will arrive in fifty one hours, thirty two minutes, sir.
Schedule four battle drills, one for each shift. Run a series of simulated attacks from a Cardassian squadron. I want you to conduct the exercises personally, Will. Get it done. Oh, and get that fish out of the ready room. Data, you're with me.
Power transfer levels need to be upgraded by twenty percent. The efficiency of your warp coils is also unsatisfactory.
Coil efficiency is well within specifications, Captain.
I'm not interested in the specs, Geordi. The efficiency needs to be raised by at least fifteen percent.
Fifteen percent.
That is an attainable goal, but it will require realigning the warp coil and taking the secondary distribution grid offline.
Very good, Data. That's exactly what I want you to do.
If we take this grid offline, we're going to have to shut down exobiology, the astrophysics lab and geological research.
We're not on a research mission. Get it done in two days.
I believe that is also an attainable goal. If we utilise the entire Engineering department, there should be sufficient manpower available to complete the task.
Sure, if everybody works around the clock for the next two days.
Then you'd better get to it, Geordi. It looks like you have some work to do. Data.
Yes?
May I speak with you, Captain?
Deanna. Come in, come in.
The latest masterpieces from my son. It's an elephant. I think.
Definitely an elephant.
I'm glad you're here. I'd like to go over the duty roster with you.
I'd be happy to. But first, I'd like to talk about how the change in command is affecting the crew.
I've noticed some resistance.
I wouldn't call it resistance. More like uncertainty. Most of them had served under Captain Picard for several years. They knew him, they knew what he expected. Now they're being asked to adjust to a new captain and a new way of doing things, and they're uncertain how to react.
I see your point. This all could be very unsettling to them.
And to you. Perhaps everyone just needs some time. Time for you to get to know and trust the crew, and time for them to understand how you want things done.
I'm glad you brought this to my attention, Deanna. Unfortunately, I don't have time for a honeymoon with the crew. You've clearly given this a lot of thought, so I'd like you to take charge of the morale situation. Please see to it that they make the adjustment to the new routine quickly and easily. I have a meeting with the new Security Chief in five minutes, so the duty roster will have to wait. Thank you, Counsellor. By the way. I prefer a certain formality on the Bridge. I'd appreciate it if you wore standard uniform when you're on duty.
Of course, sir.
Commander, he's asked me to completely reroute half the power systems on the ship, change every duty roster, realign the warp coils in two days, and now he's transferred a third of my department to Security.
If it makes you feel any better, you're not alone. Captain Jellico has made major changes in every department on the ship.
Yeah, well, I don't mind making changes and I don't mind hard work, but the man isn't giving me the time I need to do the work. Someone's got to get him to listen to reason.
It's not going to be me. He's made that abundantly clear.
Well then, can I make a suggestion? Talk to Captain Picard. Maybe he can do something. We just need a little time.
All right.
Come.
Are you all right, sir?
Yes, I am. The last time I had to train like this was for the Academy marathon, but I'm managing. What can I do for you?
It's nothing urgent. I'm sorry I bothered you. Good night.
My orders are to maintain radio silence until we've completed the mission.
Well the Enterprise will be monitoring your channel just in case you do need to transmit a signal.
Bridge to Captain Jellico. We've arrived at the shuttle departure coordinates.
Did you launch the probe I requested?
Yes, sir. I wasn't aware you wanted to be informed.
Thank you. Jellico out. I can see why he's still only a first officer.
Captain, I would just like you to know that Commander Riker is
I've read your reports, Jean-Luc. I know you think highly of him.
It's not just my opinion. He's been decorated by Starfleet Command five times. He's been offered his own ship more than once. I think if you just gave him a chance, you'd find him an outstanding officer.
Jean-Luc, let's be candid for a moment. The Cardassians aren't going to listen to reason, and the Federation isn't going to give in to their demands. And the chances are you won't be coming back from this mission of yours. I want this ship ready for action and I don't have time to give Will Riker or anyone else a chance. And forgive me for being blunt, but the Enterprise is mine now. Well, here's hoping you beat the odds. Good hunting.
Thank you.
Jean-Luc. I believe this is yours.
Shuttlecraft Feynman to Enterprise. We have cleared the shuttlebay.
Acknowledged, Feynman. Good luck.
Thank you, Enterprise. Well, now that we're under way, I can tell you about our mission. Starfleet Intelligence believes the Cardassians are developing a metagenic weapon.
Oh my God.
I am not familiar with metagenics.
They're genetically engineered viruses that are designed to destroy entire ecosystems. When metagenic toxins are released into a planet's atmosphere, they immediately begin to mutate. They seek out and destroy all forms of DNA they encounter. In a few days, everything is dead.
In a month, the metagenic agent itself breaks down and dissipates completely, leaving every city, every road, every piece of equipment perfectly intact.
Leaving the planet safe to be conquered. Wouldn't using such a weapon pose as great a risk to the attacker as to the target?
That's why metagenics and other biological weapons were outlawed years ago. Even the Romulans have abided with those agreements.
Starfleet Intelligence believes that the Cardassians are developing a new delivery system, one that would protect them from accidental exposure to the toxin. They believe that the Cardassians are testing a way of launching dormant metagenic material on a subspace carrier wave.
So they could activate the toxins after the launch, thereby preventing any accidental exposure.
And because the subspace wave would appear simply as background radiation, no one would realise what was happening until it was too late. Now, for the past few weeks, theta-band subspace emissions have been detected coming from Celtris Three. Those emissions may indicate that a metagenic delivery system in operation.
What do we know about Celtris Three?
Very little. It was thought to be uninhabited until these emissions were detected. Starfleet believes that the Cardassians may have a secret research lab located somewhere below the planet surface. Our orders are to penetrate this Celtris Three installation and determine if the Cardassians are actually building a metagenic weapon.
And if they are?
Destroy it. At any cost. When I was on the Stargazer, we conducted extensive tests using theta band carrier waves. One of the reasons I was selected for this mission is my familiarity with the methods used for generating them. Mister Worf, your presence here is obvious. Doctor, your job will be to locate and destroy any biotoxins we may find.
Celtris Three is in Cardassian space. How will we get there undetected?
I know a way of acquiring some discreet transport. Mister Worf, set a course for Torman Five.
If he doesn't pay up, I know three large Ferengi who will not be so forgiving.
I didn't do it.
I'm not accusing you of anything.
What do you want then?
We're looking for DaiMon Solok.
Why?
I have a business proposition to discuss.
Solok is a very busy, very important man. He isn't here.  But I could relay a message.
Good. Please, will you tell DaiMon Solok that we're interested in transportation to Celtris Three.
That's a Cardassian planet.
Now, we understand that DaiMon Solok runs cargo there from time to time.
Solok is no smuggler.
Yes, but if Solok were to go to Celtris Three for legitimate reasons, we would be interested in quietly booking passage for the journey.
I don't think he would be interested in dealing with Federation spies.
You know, I heard that Solok was quite a man.
Why, yes, he is an extraordinary man.
That's why we came here, because only Solok could help us. I guess there's some things even Solok can't do. It's too bad.  Because if he could, I would be very, very
Yes?
Grateful.
When do you want to leave?
Beverly, make sure that your tricorder is keeping a precise map of the route. We could very easily get lost in here.
Right. I'm picking up some subspace signals, but I can't seem to get a lock on them.
That's typical of theta-band emissions. You have to compress the detection band width in order to determine the fix. The source emission is five hundred metres east of here. And seven hundred metres below.
It's all right. They're called lynars, a kind of Celtrine bat. They're harmless.
Bats?
You're not afraid of bats, are you, Worf?
Of course not.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. We have rendezvoused with the Cardassian ship Reklar to begin diplomatic talks designed to ease tensions along the border.
Gul Lemec has arrived. He's waiting for you in the Observation Lounge.
Very good. I'll be in my Ready room.
Yes?
Captain, I think there's been a slight miscommunication. Did you want to meet with Gul Lemec in here?
No. The Observation Lounge is appropriate.
I see.
Lemec is a Cardassian, and Cardassians are like timber wolves, predators, bold in large numbers cautious by themselves, and with an instinctive need to establish a dominant position in any social gathering.
So you're trying to establish a dominant position by making him wait for you. The trouble with wolves is that sometimes the fight for dominance, one of them ends up dead.
In that case, the trick is to be the wolf that's still standing at the end.
The floor is over five hundred metres down from here.
There doesn't seem to be a way around. We'll have to rappel from here. This is sheer granite. We'll have to use fusing pitons.
We could try to find another way down.
Unfortunately, that would take several hours. We don't have the time.
You're not afraid of heights, are you, Doctor?
Of course not.
Now, remember to control your descent and don't get the lines tangled.
I'll remember.
All right?
What is going on? I have been waiting here for over an hour!
I'm Captain Jellico. I believe you know Commander Riker, and this is Lieutenant Commander Troi. Let's get to it, shall we?
This treatment is a deliberate insult to the Cardassian Union. I have been kept waiting here for over an hour.
Then I'm sure you're ready to talk.
I did not agree to allow others into this meeting.
If it alarms you, I can ask them to leave.
I am not alarmed. But we did not
A great many people are depending on our efforts here, Gul Lemec. We don't need to quibble over minutiae.
I have here come to negotiate a Federation withdrawal from the border, not to be dictated to by some mere captain.
I can see you're not serious about these talks. If the Cardassian Union truly wishes to discuss peace, they can send someone who can negotiate in a civilised manner.
Captain on the Bridge.
Let him stew for a few minutes, then go in and tell him you've convinced me to meet with him one more time. Tell him I'm a loose cannon and that he needs to be more reasonable because I'm such an unreasonable man. Lemec will want to bring his own aides on board. Pretend to be worried that I'll object, and then give grudging permission for two aides, no more. Understood?
Yes, sir.
Aye, sir.
Well, I'll say this for him. He's sure of himself.
No, he's not.
The installation should be about three hundred metres this way.
I don't suppose we'll be able to find another way to get back up there.
I doubt it.
That's what I thought.
There's a lava tube beyond here that runs for seventy five metres, then it connects with another chamber. We need to get through here. This tube opens up beyond this crack. We could widen the opening, then we should be able to crawl through. Mister Worf.
A phaser set to level sixteen should suffice.
Make it so.
Well done, Mister Worf.
Gul Lemec, a pleasure.
May I present my aides, Glin Corak and Glin Tajor.
Welcome aboard. For the past three weeks you've been massing troops in staging areas, assembling strike forces, and pulling ships from their normal patrols. We will not stand for this clearly provocative behaviour.
I see the Federation spy network has again provided you with faulty information. We are conducting routine training operations, nothing more.
Then I'm sure you won't mind if we send a few starships into this sector for our own training operations.
Your fleet deployments do not concern us. However, we are very concerned about your refusal to vacate those territories along the border which are clearly Cardassian.
You gave up your claims on those territories when you signed the armistice. You couldn't take those worlds by force, so you want us to give them to you at the bargaining table.
Captain, please, we should listen to them.
Gul Lemec, as you know. the systems are still subject to negotiation by the terms of the treaty.
Negotiations which we have pursued in good faith. Unfortunately, the Federation has not been as forthcoming.
So to speed up the process, you are preparing for war.
We are preparing to defend ourselves.
The Federation will not start a war.
That has always been your position. However, I have heard reports that a small team from the Federation has already been sent into our territory. Of course, I don't believe it. Such an attempt would almost certainly fail, and even if it succeeded, it would trigger a very serious response on our part.
I don't know what you're talking about.
Then there's no need for worry. A short recess would seem to be in order.
Very well.
Where is Captain Picard?
Reassigned.
Well, I hope his new assignment is not too dangerous. It would be a shame if something were to happen to such a, er, such a noted officer.
Yes, it would.
Only a few more metres.
Beverly, get out of there! Beverly!
I have her.
Are you all right?
I think so. Next time, you try bring up the rear.
We're nearly there. Can you continue?
Looks like a maintenance hatch to the installation. I'm picking up three proximity sensors around it.
Sensor echoes established, but the false image will only last a few minutes. The hatch is magnetically sealed, but I believe I can bypass it.
I can't get a scan from the other side of the hatch. It's been shielded.
We have no choice. Remember, aim low. Fire in short, controlled bursts.
Ready.
Now.
There's no one here. There's no lab.
It's a trap. Come on.
Captain!
Let's go.
The Captain.
No. There are five more of them heading this way from another tunnel. Come on. Now!
Come on.
Captain on the Bridge.
What have you got, Will?
I'm not sure. We're picking up a lot of coded messages from a Cardassian planet near the border.
Which planet?
Celtris Three.
Can you detect any theta-band subspace emissions coming from Celtris?
There are some residual traces. It seems there were emissions up until a few minutes ago.
Open a secure channel to Admiral Nechayev. Priority two. Put it through to my Ready room.
Aye, sir.
Captain?
Those emissions you were so concerned about have just stopped. I'd say one way or another, our friends have finished their task.
Have you heard from our friends?
No.
Let me know if you do. I'd very much like to see them again.
So would I, Admiral.
A challenge.  You should prove to be an interesting challenge. Possibly the most interesting to come through that door in many years.
What do you want?
Why you, of course. Picard. Jean-Luc. Serial number SP dash nine three seven dash two one five. Son of Maurice and Yvette Picard. Born in La Barre, France. Formerly Captain of the Stargazer, where you conducted extensive studies on theta-band subspace carrier waves. Don't look so surprised. How could we have designed a lure for the Captain of the Federation flagship unless we knew something about his background.
So you concocted an elaborate ruse to bring me here. Why?
In this room, you do not ask questions. I ask them, you answer. If I'm not satisfied with those answers, you will die.
All right. Try this.
What is it?
Just try it.
You see? It's an Earth drink. Prune juice.
A warrior's drink.
You know, you're always drinking alone. It wouldn't hurt you to seek out a little companionship.
I would require a Klingon woman for companionship. Earth females are too fragile.
Not all of them. There are a few on this ship that would find you tame.
Impossible.
You never know till you try.
Then I will never know.
Coward.
I was merely concerned for the safety of my crewmates.
Drink your prune juice.
Lieutenant Worf, report to the Bridge.
On my way.
No!
Analysis, Mister Data.
Sensors are reading gravimetric fluctuations, Captain. Most unusual ones.
Unusual in what way? Specify?
Nothing I have seen before.
Is it a wormhole?
Yes and no. Like a time displacement, but it does not have a discernible event horizon.
Sir, navigational subsystems are unable to give coordinates on the object.
Confirmed. The phenomenon does not have a definable centre or outer edge.
Are you saying it is and yet it isn't there?
I do not have sufficient information to make an analysis as yet, Commander. The dynamics of the radiation patterns
Captain! Something's happening. A new change in sensor readings.
Mister Data?
Lieutenant, what are their sensor readings? Is that an enemy vessel?
I'm getting too much interference, Captain.
Now hear this. Fleet formation briefing in main war room at fifteen hundred hours. Doctor Joshua Campbell, report to station ops. Ensign Toms, please forward combat information. Ensign Thomas to CIC.
This isn't right. It's changed.
It's clearing now, Captain. Definitely Federation starship. Accessing registry.
Looks like they had a rough ride.
NCC one seven oh one C. USS Enterprise.
Military log, Combat date 43625.2. While investigating an unusual radiation anomaly, the Enterprise has encountered what could almost be called a ghost from its own past, the Enterprise-C, the immediate predecessor to this battleship.
Sensors confirm design and specifications, Captain. Analysis of hull and engine materials conform to engineering patterns and methods of that time period.
But that cruiser was destroyed with all hands over twenty years ago.
Presumed destroyed. The Enterprise C was last seen near the Klingon outpost Narendra Three exactly twenty two years, three months and four days ago.
And now they're here.
Has it been adrift for all those years, or has it has travelled through time?
It is a possibility, Captain. If that hypothesis is correct, the phenomenon we just encountered would be a temporal rift in space.
A rift?
Possibly the formation of a Kerr loop from superstring material. It would require high-energy interactions occurring in the vicinity for such a structure to be formed. The rift is certainly not stable, Captain. It could collapse at any time.
Captain. I'm able to scan the interior of the ship now, sir. Heavy damage to warp field nacelles and hull bearing struts. Internal space frame is... Life-signs, Captain! Readings are sporadic. It looks like they have massive casualties, but some are still alive.
Bridge to Sickbay. Emergency teams, stand by transporter rooms.
Understood.
Belay that order, Doctor.
Respectfully, if I may suggest regardless of where they came from, they are here now and they need our help.
Commander, if that ship has travelled into the future, we could be dealing with variables that will alter the flow of our history.
Enterprise C is sending out a distress call, sir. Audio only.
This is Captain Garrett of the Starship Enterprise, to any Federation ship. We have been attacked by Romulan warships and require immediate assistance. We've lost warp drive. Life support is failing.
There's no record of the Romulans ever assaulting the Enterprise C.
Voice message has ended, Captain. I'm only receiving their automated distress signal now.
Open a hailing frequency. This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation, of a Federation starship. Standby to receive emergency teams. Commander, we will handle this one step at a time. Stabilise their power systems and tend to their injured, and avoid all discussions of where and when they are.
Aye, sir. Lieutenant.
Captain, message coming in from Starfleet monitor stations. Klingon battlecruisers headed towards this sector.
Battle alert, Mister Crusher. Condition Yellow.
Aye, sir. All decks report Condition Yellow.
Captain Garrett?
Yes.
I'm Commander William Riker. Our emergency teams are on board your ship. Doctor?
The rest of the bridge crew is dead. She has a bad fracture and has serious internal injuries. I'm going to have to get her back to the Enterprise.
To where?
We'll explain that later.
You'll explain now, Commander.
We're from a Federation starship. We answered your distress call. Your ship is in good hands, but we need to get you to our Sickbay.
Very well.
Crusher to transporter room. Two to beam directly to Sickbay.
Stand by for transport.
It's pretty bad, Commander. Looks like they were in a hell of a fight.
If you can't stabilise the life support, we're going to have to evacuate the ship.
I think we can do it. I'll have to get to Engineering though. La Forge to damage control team alpha. Meet me on Engineering level three.
Commander.
Thanks.
Commander William Riker.
Lieutenant Castillo, helmsman.
Away team reporting in, sir.
On screen, Mister Data. Go ahead, Commander.
We've stabilised life support. Mister La Forge is working on restoring the main power couplings, but that'll take time. It's a real mess down here, sir.
Survivors?
One hundred twenty five.
Recommendation?
I'd hate to have to scrap her. Starfleet could certainly use another ship, even if she is old.
Agreed. But we can't stay in this area too long. You have nine hours. If you can get her underway by then, we'll escort her back to Starbase one oh five. If not, we'll evacuate the survivors and destroy the ship.
Understood, sir.
Keep me posted, Picard out.
Guinan?
We need to talk. Somehow this, this is all wrong. This is not the way it's supposed to be.
You must have some idea how things have changed.
I look at things, I look at people, and they just don't feel right.
What things? What people?
You. Your uniform. The Bridge.
What's the matter with the Bridge?
It's not right.
It's the same Bridge. Nothing has changed.
I know that. I also know it's wrong.
What else?
Families. There should be children on this ship.
What? Children on the Enterprise? Guinan, we're at war.
No, we're not. At least, we're not supposed to be. This is not a ship of war. This a ship of peace.
What you're suggesting
I'm not suggesting. That ship from the past is not supposed to be here. It's got to go back.
Run a full electrolyte report. Boost the level of tricordrazine. Try to relax.
Doctor Selar, report to pathology ward stat. Doctor Selar, report to pathology ward stat.
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard.
Rachel Garrett. How's my ship?
The support systems are being restored. We're continuing repairs.
Where did you come from? We weren't picking up any other Federation ships in this sector.
What's the last thing you remember?
We were answering the distress signal.
Distress signal?
You must have heard it. From the Klingon outpost, Narendra Three. But you didn't, did you? This Sickbay, I've never seen like it, even on a starbase. And your uniform. What ship is this, Captain?
Please try to be still.
I must insist. What ship?
You are aboard the Enterprise, Captain. One seven oh one D. You have come twenty two years into the future.
Twenty two years. Does my crew know yet?
No.
I must tell them. I owe them that.
If you wish, I can see that they're informed.
Is there some reason they should not be told?
I am concerned that if you return to your own time with knowledge of the future
Return to the battle? We barely escaped with our lives. If we returned, we'd be destroyed.
Have you any idea how this happened?
There was a fierce volley of photon torpedoes. We were hit. A bright light, and then here.
It is possible that this exchange of fire was the catalyst for the formation of a temporal rift. History has no record of your battle with the Romulans.
We were responding to a distress call from the Klingon outpost on Narendra Three. The Romulans were attacking it. We engaged them, but there were four warbirds.
The Narendra Three outpost was destroyed. It is regrettable that you did not succeed. A Federation starship rescuing a Klingon outpost might have averted twenty years of war.
I just can't quite make myself believe it. Twenty two years!
I'm reading forty percent on forward shields. What do you have on aft?
Forty percent.
That won't cut it. Commander, advise Lieutenant La Forge that shields are below minimum.
Acknowledged.
We'll never see our homes again. Our families.
How do you know your family's not still alive?
You're right, I don't. But imagine coming home after twenty-two years. Would I even recognise them?
What are the stats on main phaser banks?
Emitters available, sixty percent forward, fifty two percent aft.
Good. Let's take a look at the torpedo launchers.
I guess I'm lucky to be alive at all.
You may not like the future. It's been a long war. The Federation has lost more than half of Starfleet to the Klingons.
We were negotiating a peace treaty when I left.
A lot of changes, Lieutenant. A lot of changes.
When we get a break, maybe you could fill me in on some of them.
Photon banks are depleted. Auxiliary fusion generators are down.
There is a high degree of probability that the temporal rift is symmetrical, Captain.
Then what would happen if the Enterprise C were to fly back through it?
Back, sir? The Enterprise C would emerge in her own time period at almost the same instant she left.
Right in the middle of the battle with the Romulans.
Yes, sir.
Is there any possibility she could survive? DATA None, sir.
Then sending them back would be a death sentence.
Lieutenant Barrett to communications.
She was the first Galaxy Class warship built by the Federation. Forty two decks. Capable of transporting over six thousand troops.
How long have you been on board?
Four years. Straight out of the Academy. I was lucky to get the Enterprise.
Yeah, me too. I mean, my Enterprise.
Triage team to main shuttlebay.
Lieutenant, how's the ship?
We've restored minimal shields and the forward phaser banks. Still no photon launchers or warp drive.
Concentrate on the weapon systems. From what Captain Picard told me, the Federation can use all the help it can get.
And soon. Our sensors have picked up Klingon warships in this sector, Captain.
Why wasn't I informed, Mister Castillo?
Captain, you shouldn't
As senior officer, I want you to be my liaison to the Enterprise-D. Coordinate with Tactical.
That's me, Captain.
Where do you think you're going?
I'm resuming my duties, Doctor.
Captain, you need at least another twenty four hours.
Nonsense. Doctors always over-protect their patients.
And captains always push themselves too hard.
Doctor, my ship and crew need me now. Twenty four hours might as well be twenty four years.
I need more.
There is no more. I wish there were. I wish I could prove it. But I can't.
Then I can't ask them to go back.
You've got to.
Guinan, they will die moments after they return. How can I ask them to sacrifice themselves based solely on your intuition?
I don't know. But I do know that this is a mistake. Every fibre in my being says this is a mistake. I can't explain it to myself so I can't explain it to you. I only know that I'm right.
Who is to say that this history is any less proper than the other?
I suppose I am.
Not good enough, damn it. Not good enough. I will not ask them to die.
Forty billion people have already died. This war's not supposed to be happening. You've got to send those people back to correct this.
And what is to guarantee that if they go back they will succeed? Every instinct tells me this is wrong, it is dangerous, it is futile.
We've known each other a long time. You have never known me to impose myself on anyone or take a stance based on trivial or whimsical perceptions. This time line must not be allowed to continue. Now, I've told you what you must do. You have only your trust in me to help you decide to do it.
Deflector shield technology has advanced considerably during the war. Our heat dissipation rates are probably double those of the Enterprise-C, which means we can hang in a firefight a lot longer. Guinan?
Have you ordered yet, Tasha?
No, not yet. Is anything wrong?
Not a thing. What can I get for you?
Just a couple of TKLs. We're in a hurry. Oh, this is, Lieutenant Castillo.
First time for everything.
First time?
It's just that I've never seen anything bother her before.
What's a TKL?
Standard rations. Food replicators are on minimum power, so everything else is diverted to defensive systems. So where was I?
You've told me more about tactical in an hour than I learned my last year in the Academy.
You're going to need it, Lieutenant.
Hey, I've known you a whole day now, Lieutenant. I won't salute if you won't. What did she call you? Tasha?
Yeah.
Most everybody just calls me Castillo. My mother calls me Richard.
Okay, Castillo.
No, I think maybe I'd like it better if you called me Richard.
Richard.
This is the Captain. Senior officers will report to my Ready room immediately.
So much for lunch.
Captain, are you suggesting that we let them return and attempt to complete their mission?
I am, Doctor.
Based on Guinan's intuition?
That won't accomplish anything, sir. There's no way they can save Narendra Three.
Captain Garrett says there were four Romulan warbirds. The Enterprise-C would be outmanned and outgunned.
Unless we were to re-arm them with modern
We can't do that. If we send that ship back with new technology we will be altering the past.
But that's what you're talking about anyway, isn't it? Altering the past.
We're talking about restoring the past.
How could Guinan know that history has been altered if she's been altered along with the rest of us?
Perhaps her species has a perception that goes beyond linear time.
There are many things about her species we can't easily explained. Yet it is very possible she is correct. A ship from the past has travelled through time. How can we know what effect those events will have on the present. Indeed, we shall never know for certain, if Guinan is correct. But I have decided the consequences of that possibility are too grave to ignore. Dismissed.
Sir, if you'd like my opinion
I think I'm aware of your opinion, Commander. This is a briefing. I'm not seeking your consent.
With all due respect, sir, you'd be asking one hundred and twenty five people to die a meaningless death.
Not necessarily meaningless, Commander. The Klingons regard honour above all else. If the crew of the Enterprise-C had died fighting for the survival of a Klingon outpost, it would be considered a meaningful act of honour by the Klingon Empire.
Even their deaths might have prevented this war. If the Enterprise-C returns to the battle and its mission is a success, history will be irrevocably changed. This time line will cease to exist and a new future will have been created. I've considered the alternatives. I'll go with Guinan's recommendation. Dismissed.
If she's right, we may not even be in an alternate time line.
Yeah, who knows if we're dead or alive.
Engineering. Is Engineering your destination as well?
What? Oh, deck six. Sorry.
If I interpret your facial expressions correctly, you are preoccupied with something unpleasant.
No, I was just thinking about a lot of things. I've been working with one of the officers on the Enterprise-C. He's nice. I like him. I'm worried about what's going to happen to him.
We may never know what happens. If they succeed, we will not even realise that these events occurred.
Shields are up to seventy two percent. That's better.
Good.
Do you believe this Guinan?
I discovered long ago that she has a special wisdom. I've learned to trust it. I could arrange for you to speak with her if you wish.
Captain, I would be lying to you if I told you there was a chance in hell of coming out of this alive. Why doesn't your ship come back with us? The Romulans would be no match for your weaponry.
I can't do that.
No, I suppose not. You don't belong in our time any more than we belong in yours. To be honest, Picard, a significant number of my crewmembers have expressed a desire to return, even knowing the odds. Some because they can't bear to live without their loved ones, some because they don't like the idea of slipping out in the middle of a fight. But I have told them that in the here and now, the Federation needs another ship against the Klingons. And we'd better get used to being in the here and now.
But if you go back, it could be a great deal more helpful. The war is going very badly for the Federation, far worse than is generally known. Starfleet Command believes defeat is inevitable. Within six months we may have no choice but to surrender.
And you're saying all this may be a result of our arrival here?
One more ship will make no difference in the here and now. But twenty two years ago, one ship could have stopped this war before it started.
Mister Castillo.
Yes, Captain?
Inform the crew we're going back.
Yes, Captain.
The Romulans will get a good fight. We'll make it one for the history books.
I know you will, Captain. Lieutenant Yar?
Permission to remain for a moment, sir.
Granted.
Transporter room, Captain Picard is ready to return to his ship.
Aye, Captain.
I just wanted to say good luck.
I'll try to put some of your tactical briefing to good use when we get back.
Your ship has much more manoeuvrability than the Romulan counterparts of that era. Actually, if you could just isolate... You'll do fine.
If you get back to Earth and you see a man, say, in his late fifties taking a hard look across a crowded room. Hey, you never know.
Goodbye, Lieutenant.
Red Alert! Full power to shields.
Shields are up. Functioning.
Initiating evasive manoeuvres. Gamma sequence.
Ready phasers. Enterprise-D
Has your captain returned safely?
Acknowledged. Captain Picard is safely aboard. Fire phasers.
Firing phasers.
Report.
One Klingon bird of prey off the starboard bow.
Firing phasers.
Load torpedo bays.
The Klingon vessel has recloaked, sir. I have no readings.
Captain Garrett, damage report.
Captain Garrett.
This is Lieutenant Yar, sir. Captain Garrett is dead.
I'm prepared to lead the Enterprise back myself, Captain Picard.
Sir, Lieutenant Castillo is the last surviving senior officer. He will have limited support from Ops, no Tactical, reduced staff in Engineering.
I have good people willing to do their best.
Certainly, history never meant for this ship to go into battle without her captain.
I can't speak to that point, sir, but I can get us back to where we're supposed to be. I believe that's what Captain Garrett would want me to do.
Commander Data to Captain Picard.
Go ahead.
Sir, sensors are showing additional instability in the time rift. Possibly the result of the battle with the Klingons.
Any signs of other Klingon vessels?
No, sir.
Our coordinates have been transmitted to the Klingon command, sir. We mustn't remain here.
Sir, it is my intention to return, unless you order me not to.
How soon can your ship be ready?
We sustained moderate damage in the attack. I think we can get underway in a few hours.
Make it so. We'll give you cover.
One to beam to the Enterprise-C. We keep saying goodbye, don't we?
I wish there was more time.
More time. I think we have all the time we can handle as it is.
Lieutenant.
Can I get you something, Tasha?
Guinan, I have to know something. What happens to me in the other time line?
I don't have alternate biographies of the crew. As I said to the captain, it's just a feeling.
But there's something more when you look at me, isn't there? I can see it in your eyes, Guinan. We've known each other too long.
We weren't meant to know each other at all. At least, that's what I sense when I look at you. Tasha, you're not supposed to be here.
Where am I supposed to be?
Dead.
Do you know how?
No. But I do know it was an empty death. A death without purpose.
Come. Yes, Lieutenant?
Captain, I request a transfer to the Enterprise-C.
For what reason?
They need someone at Tactical.
We need you here.
I'm not supposed to be here, sir.
Sit down, Lieutenant. What did she say to you?
I don't belong here, sir. I'm supposed to be dead.
She felt it necessary to reveal that to you?
I felt it was necessary.
I see. You realise that it is very possible the Enterprise-C will fail. We will continue in this time line in which case your life, hopefully, will continue for a long while.
I know how important it is that they don't fail, Captain. That's why I'm requesting this transfer.
You don't belong on that ship, Lieutenant.
No, Captain Garrett belongs on that ship. But she's dead. And I think there's a certain logic in this request.
There's no logic in this at all. Whether they succeed or not, the Enterprise-C will be destroyed.
But Captain, at least with someone at Tactical, they will have a chance to defend themselves well. It may be a matter of seconds or minutes, but those could be the minutes that change history. Guinan says I died a senseless death in the other time line. I didn't like the sound of that, Captain. I've always known the risks that come with a Starfleet uniform. If I'm to die in one, I'd like my death to count for something.
Lieutenant. Permission granted.
Thank you, sir.
I'm showing phaser banks up to seventy percent efficiency. We've got an hour left. Let's see if we can get them up to ninety.
Aye, sir.
Parker, you've got Ops. Fredericks, take the conn.
I'll handle Tactical. Lieutenant Tasha Yar reporting for duty, sir.
You're not part of my crew.
I am now. Captain Picard approved my request for transfer.
This isn't a joke, Tasha. We're going back in the rift, into battle. We're not coming back.
I know the mission. These are my orders, Lieutenant.
But I don't want you here.
You need me here. Show me someone on your crew who can do the job better than I can.
Welcome aboard. Take your station, Lieutenant.
Aye, sir.
Military log, supplemental. Lieutenant Tasha Yar has transferred to the Enterprise-C, where she has taken over tactical duties. Meanwhile, our long range scanners have picked up Klingon battle cruisers on an intercept course.
Number and type of ships, Mister Crusher?
Three K'vort class battlecruisers, sir.
They're not even troubling to cloak themselves.
They shouldn't be so confident after the pasting we gave them on Archer Four.
Attention all hands. As you know, we could outrun the Klingon vessels, but we must protect the Enterprise-C until she enters the temporal rift. And we must succeed. Let's make sure history never forgets the name Enterprise. Picard out.
Mister Data?
Shields are holding, sir.
Hold fire. Mister Crusher, come about to course one four eight zero zero three.
Aye, sir.
Photon torpedoes ready.
Dispersal pattern, sierra. And fire!
One enemy target hit, sir. Moderate damage to their forward shields. Our shields are still holding. Minor damage to secondary hull.
Course one four eight. Correction, course one seven zero mark zero one four.
Sir, one of the ships is breaking off and going towards the Enterprise-C.
Mister Crusher, keep us within two hundred kilometres of the Enterprise-C.
Coming to two one seven mark one one five. Increasing to two thirds impulse.
Damage control teams, deck fourteen.
Engineering to bridge. Starboard power coupling is down. Containment field generator three is damaged. Attempting to bypass.
If we lose antimatter containment
Acknowledged, La Forge.
Sir, the Klingons are flanking us, attempting to draw us away from the Enterprise-C.
Hold course, Mister Crusher. Continual fire, all phasers.
One enemy target destroyed, sir.
Damage report.
Heavy casualties in the secondary hull. Navigational sensor array inoperative.
Antimatter containment fields are failing. If I can't stabilise them, I'll have to dump the reactor core or she'll blow!
Shields buckling, Captain. They will not
La Forge to Bridge.
I can't hold the antimatter containment fields. Initiating emergency shutdown!
Coolant leak! Bridge, we have a coolant leak in the engine core! I can't shut it down. I estimate two minutes to a warp core breach!
Go! Go! Go!
How long until the Enterprise-C enters the rift?
Fifty two seconds, sir.
All remaining power to the defence systems.
Power couplings severed in forward phaser banks. Attempting to bypass. Controls not responding.
Federation ship Enterprise. Surrender and prepare to be boarded.
That will be the day.
Report, Lieutenant.
Readings fluctuated momentarily. It appeared to be a ship, but then it vanished.
The phenomenon is closing in on itself, Captain.
Very well. Prepare a class one sensor probe. We'll leave it behind to monitor the final closure. Mister Crusher, lay in a course for Archer Four.
Captain, this is Guinan. Is everything all right up there?
Guinan? Yes everything's fine. Is something wrong?
No. No, everything's fine. Sorry to bother you.
Geordi, tell me about Tasha Yar.
Welcome to the Enterprise, Miss Rogers. I'm delighted to have you aboard.
Thank you, sir.
And congratulations. I understand that you were selected for this internship out of hundreds of applicants.
Yes, sir. I still can't believe they chose me. There were lots of other people with better records.
Your transcript is very impressive. She's done honours work in neurobiology, plasma dynamics, and eco-regeneration. I'd say that's pretty well rounded.
That's a nice way of saying that I haven't decided what I'm going to do with my life.
I've arranged to have you work in all the major departments while you're here, and I'm willing to bet that by the time it's over you'll have a pretty good idea what field you're interested in.
Or at least what fields you're not interested in.
Come.
We're bringing up the rest of the cargo now. We should be ready to leave within the hour.
Commander, will you escort Miss Rogers to her quarters? I need to discuss the Tagran's medical needs with Doctor Crusher. And Miss Rogers?
Yes?
You've won yourself a rare opportunity. Avail yourself of it.
I will, sir. And thank you.
It'll take a few days before you know where everything is. If you need any help, you just use one of these comm. panels.
We're on deck seven, section four.
You're right.
I practically memorised the specs on the way over here.
You're a quick study. This is it.
Is this for me?
It's all yours.
It's so big.
For honour students, only the best.
Well, I could've brought my zoo.
Your zoo?
That's just what my parents call it. Three dogs isn't that many, is it?
It depends how they get along.
I could have a dozen. Mother said enough is enough. I'm sure going to miss 'em.
We'll keep you so busy you won't have a chance to. I've got to get going. I have to get back to cargo bay two.
Well, thanks for walking me down.
Sure.
Oh, no. Oh, no, no, no, no. I didn't mean it.
You guys can't stay here.  Come on, all of you.
Hello. Come here, little one. You too. Come on, come on.
See all these readouts? That's your heart rate, your blood pressure all your vital signs. You're in good shape. You might just live to be my age.
Now, all these tricorders need to be tested before they get put in the supply containers that we're taking to Tagra.
So I should scan myself with each one to make sure all the readouts are working?
Any unit that doesn't, put it aside and we'll do a diagnostic on it later.
Okay.
I hear you've been accepted to the Academy. I have a son there.
Oh. Being posted on the Enterprise, I guess you don't get to see him very often?
No, not as often as I'd like.
Do you have any other children?
My husband died a number of years ago. Wes was our only child.
Was he old enough to know his father?
Jack died when he was five.
My parents died when I was a baby too. I don't remember anything about them. Sometimes I wonder what they were like.
Your adoptive parents are in Starfleet, aren't they?
Yeah, they're marine biologists. They've just been posted to the Bilaren system.
Sickbay to Doctor Crusher. You wanted to be told when the cultures were ready.
On my way. When you've finished with the tricorders, Nurse Ogawa can help you take them down to shuttlebay for loading.
Okay.
Oh, thank you very much for your help. We can use every available hand we can get. This is one of the largest relief efforts we've ever mounted.
Now why are you bringing everything down in shuttlecraft?
Well, because we can't use the transporters for all of the ionisation in the Tagran atmosphere.
From the barystatic filters?
How did you know that?
I did a paper on eco-regeneration.
Well then, you know that a thousand barystatic filters puts out quite a bit of ionisation.
A thousand?
Yeah, they've managed to pollute their atmosphere pretty badly.
It's amazing to think that they go to such lengths to clean the air instead of regulating the emissions that cause the problem.
You're right. Actually, the only thing the filters can do is keep things from getting worse.
They shoot the air full of
Commander, are you all right? You okay?
I didn't even see it coming.
this is the main control area. We can access any of the primary circuits from all of these panels. Over here is a Jeffries tube.
Where most of the major conduits are routed.
You've been doing your homework.
It's hard to imagine how much energy is being harnessed in there.
Imagination is not necessary. The scale is readily quantifiable. We are presently generating twelve point seven five billion gigawatts per
Temperature in the reaction chamber has increased by forty seven percent.
Injector couplings are frozen. I can't slow down the reaction.
Temperature increase is at one hundred six percent and rising.
La Forge to Bridge! We're looking at a core breach! We're going to have to try and vent the plasma!
Plasma inductors are not responding.
We're going to lose containment. All right, everybody out of here now. Let's go! Let's move it! Data, bring down the isolation door. We're going to have to eject the warp core.
Temperature in the reaction chamber has returned to normal.
She's a little shaken up, but she's going to be.
You said she was adopted. Could she be an alien?
She's human. There's nothing more unusual about her, not that my instruments can detect.
Commander, have you been able to determine the cause of the warp breach?
No, sir. Everything was normal and then suddenly it's like the laws of physics went right out the window.
And why shouldn't they? They're so inconvenient.
Q!
Mon Capitane.
Are you responsible for the incident in Engineering?
Of course. I needed to find out if what I suspected about the girl were true.
That being?
That she's Q.
Amanda's a Q?
How is that possible? Her parents, her biological parents, were human.
Well, not exactly. They had assumed human form in order to visit Earth, I suppose for amusement. But in vulgar human fashion they proceeded to conceive a child. And then like mawkish humans, they became attached to it. What is it about those squirming little infants that you find so appealing?
I'm sure that's beyond your comprehension, Q.
I desperately hope so.
What happened to Amanda's parents?
They died in an accident. None of us knew whether she had inherited the capacities of the Q, but recently they've began to emerge, and as an expert in humanity, I was sent to investigate.
You, an expert in humanity?
Not a very challenging field of study, I grant you.
Are you saying that you created a core breach just to test this girl?
What would have happened if she couldn't stop it?
Then I would've known she wasn't a Q.
And now that you know, what do you intend to do?
Instruct here. If that child does not learn how to control her power, she may accidently destroy herself. Or all of you. Or perhaps your entire galaxy.
I find it hard to believe that you're here to do us a favour.
You're quite right I wouldn't. But there are those in the Continuum who have an over-exaggerated sense of responsibility. They think that we need to take precautions to keep the little dear from running amuck.
And once you've taught her, then you'll go away?
And leave her here? Of course not. She'll come back to the Continuum, where she belongs.
Wait a minute. You can't just come in here and take her away from everything she's ever known.
I assure you I can.
She has plans for herself. She wants to have a career and a family.
I'm rescuing her from that miserable existence.
That miserable existence is all she's known for the last eighteen years. You have no right to take it away from her.
Mon Capitane, I really think that we need to speak privately.
Well, there, that's better. Crusher gets more shrill with each passing year.
Q, what is it you really want?
Well, since you know so much about the Q, I thought you'd the perfect person to introduce me to the child. Let her know she can trust me.
I don't trust you, Q. Why should I expect Amanda to?
Well she'd better, because I'm all she's got. She needs me to help her prepare for her future with the Q.
But what if she doesn't want that future? It must be her decision.
Oh, yes, yes, yes. Do you think she'll want to remain an enfeebled mortal?
But if she really is Q, she must understand what that means. Very well, I will introduce you. But we cannot argue like this in front of her. We must at least appear to be
Pals?
Civil.
I knew I could count on you, Jean-Luc.
Mister Data, I want you to access any available records on Amanda Rogers.
Yes, Captain.
I want to know about her biological parents, about their death. I find it odd that any Q could die in an accident.
It is not consistent with what we know of them, sir.
I'm convinced that Q isn't telling us everything. See what you can find out.
Aye, sir.
It started happening about six months ago. Things that I would wish for would just suddenly appear. I thought I was going crazy. In a funny way, finding this out is kind of a relief.
I can understand that. This person I mentioned, from the Q Continuum, would like to meet you. If it's all right with you.
I'm ready.
Good.
There's my girl!
Amanda, allow me to introduce, er, Q. He's er, he's an acquaintance of ours. We've er, we've known him for years.
Very impressive the way you contained that explosion. What else have you done?
I don't understand.
Telekinesis? Teleportation? Spontaneous combustion of someone you didn't like? That sort of thing.
Amanda, what Q is asking is have you ever deliberately used your abilities?
Not until I came here. The first time it happened was when the container almost fell on Commander Riker.
And you handled that very well. That's why I gave you a greater challenge. The warp core breach.
She has potential, this one. I see no reason why she can't come back to the Continuum right now.
What?
Q
I don't want to go anywhere.
Don't worry. With time you'll overcome the disadvantages you suffered as a child. No one will hold it against you for having been human. Let's go.
Leave me alone! I'm not going anywhere with you!
You agreed that she has a right to choose her own future. The first chance you get you try to abduct her.
You're overreacting as usual, Picard. I was merely testing her power. She's quite a little spitfire, now isn't she?
What's going on, Q? What's your real purpose here?
I think I've been perfectly clear. The Continuum has a vested interest in this young woman.
If you wish to protect that investment, I suggest that you approach her differently.
She was being impetuous. She'll just have to start behaving like a Q.
If I'm not mistaken, she just did.
You understand, don't you? It's just that I have these things that I want to do. I'm going to the Academy. I want a career, and I want to join Starfleet.
You can still do those things.
It just seems so complicated now. These powers that I have are just going to stand in the way. I don't want to have to deal with it.
Well, you're going to have to. Listen, I can only imagine how you feel. And it would be easier if this had never happened or if it would just go away. But it's not going to go away. And you need someone to help you. And the person who can help you is Q.
He's so horrible.
He is the only one who can help you to understand who you are. Amanda, you are going to have to make some hard choices about your future, and you can't make them if you're going to ignore the truth.
Yeah. I know. But I don't want any of this to disrupt my time here. I want to do everything that I'm expected to do, and I don't want you to treat me any differently. Please?
You've got a deal. The first free hour you have, I want to see you in the medical lab. I have an experiment I need help with.
Yes, ma'am.
Your progress, Q?
As anticipated, there are some problems. I need time. However, there is a possibility we won't have to terminate her.
Come in.
Hello, my dear. I've been told I behaved badly. I apologise. Apparently you had every reason to chastise me. But, then again, what's done is done. Right?
I'd like to ask you some questions.
Anything.
What exactly are the Q?
It would be so much easier to show you than to tell you. If you would agree to take a short visit to the Continuum
No, just tell me.
Well. to put it simply, we're omnipotent. There's nothing, nothing we can't do.
And what do you do with this power?
Anything we want.
Do you use it to help others?
I think you've missed the point, my dear. Clearly, you've spent far too much time with humans. As a Q, you can have your heart's desire, instantly, whatever that may be. Would you like precious jewels? Works of art? Would you like to walk along the rings of Tautine?
I'm not interested in any of those things.
Of course not. You're a Q. But surely there must be something that you want? Something that you never dreamed was possible. Tell me, Amanda. What is it?
I'd like to know what my parents looked like. My real parents.
How quaint. So do it.
What do you mean?
Summon the image.
I don't know how.
Think about them. Evoke the memory. You can do it, Amanda. Trust me. Close your eyes. Close your eyes. In your mind, return to the time when you were an infant. Think about your parents. Remember them. Good. Good. Now, open your eyes.
They loved me.
Wait for it to be metabolised. Add another twenty? Wait for it to be metabolised over and over, and then wait till the bacilli can't be absorbed any more.
That's right. Just be sure and record the rate of mitosis from each of the dishes.
Mitosis, right.
You seem distracted.
Well, I just saw my parents. My real parents. Q showed me how. Can you imagine how that felt?
No, I don't think I can.
You know, you were right. I can't ignore what's happened to me. I just don't know if I can cope with it.
Amanda, you are stronger than you think.
You know, when I saw them there, right in front of me, I realised that I caused this to happen. I wanted to see them and I did. If it were you, if suddenly you could have anything you wanted, what would it be?
I have no idea.
No, think about it. Really think. If suddenly you could make anything happen, what would it be?
Well, I would probably want to heal people. People who are hopelessly ill.
Would you bring your husband back?
Amanda, I don't know. And I don't think I could make a decision like that until I was actually faced with it.
I am faced with it.
Try to do the work. I'll come back and check on you later.
I thought she'd never leave.
I don't know if I'll ever get used to that.
It's time for another lesson.
Well, I have to finish this experiment first.
What are you doing?
We're delivering live vaccine bacilli to Tagra. I'm supposed to find the best nutrient solution so we can keep them living while they're in stasis.
Fascinating. I've just had a splendid idea. Why don't we combine what you're doing with our lesson, and we'll show you how to finish in no time.
Well, I think that I should finish it the way Doctor Crusher showed me.
Why? I'm sure she'll be delighted if we sped things along. Think what it would mean. You could double, even triple the work load.
Well.
Good.
I guess so.
Now, as you take a look at the tissue samples, form an image in your mind.
Number One Doctor Crusher has some live vaccine bacilli to be delivered to Tagra. It'll have to be shipped in a stasis field. Will you make the arrangements?
I'll get right on it.
Captain, message coming in from Tagra Four.
On screen.
Enterprise, I am Orn Lote, engineer. We are having difficulties with the reactor that powers the barystatic filters on our southern continent. We may have to shut it down for repairs.
Perhaps my Chief Engineer could be of assistance?
I hope so. If we are forced to disable the reactor, it would take months to re-establish the ionic currents the filters have formed in the atmosphere.
Send us your design specifications I'm sure we'll be able to help.
Thank you, Captain.
Captain?
What is it, Mister Data?
I have some information regarding Amanda Rogers' parents. Records indicate that they died in Topeka, Kansas. Their home was destroyed during a tornado.
A tornado? Why wasn't it dissipated by the weather modification net?
Unknown, sir. The bodies were found in the rubble after the storm had passed.
See if you can find out any more details, Mister Data. I'd like to know more about that storm.
Aye, sir.
Well, if it isn't Number Two.
I was looking for Doctor Crusher. I didn't know what nutrients she wanted to send with the bacilli.
I'm not sure. I'll tell her to contact you.
Thanks.
You could stay here and wait for her, if you, you know, wanted to.
Just tell her I'll be in shuttlebay two.
You're attracted to him.
I am not.
I think you are. How repulsive. How do you stand that hair all over his face?
Doctor, Commander Riker was just here looking for you. He said he'd be in Shuttlebay Two.
Thank you. Have you finished already?
Yes.
How did you do it so quickly?
Q helped me. It took us about half the time that it would have normally taken us.
That explains this data. I needed to know the rates of mitosis. By artificially inflating them you made the experiment useless. Now I have to do it all over again.
I'm sorry, Doctor.
Don't be sorry. If she wants to make things difficult on herself, that's her business.
Why did you interfere with what she was doing?
She's a Q. Making her plod through human chores is beneath her.
She has asked not to be treated differently.
That doesn't mean she should be bored to death.
I don't interfere with what you're teaching her.
You wouldn't be capable of interfering.
I don't think it's too much to ask for you to do the same.
And you stay out of mine.
Well, when you put it like that, I think you're absolutely right.
Captain.
Yes, Mister Data?
I have further information regarding the tornado that killed Amanda Rogers' parents.
What is it?
It was unusually compact, yet extremely powerful. Its recorded wind velocity was characteristic of a funnel three times its size.
Download the files to my Ready room. I'll study them there.
Aye, sir.
Have you been practicing your teleportation?
Yes. But it's kind of hard. I keep ending up somewhere I don't want to be.
Well, it won't do to be sloppy. You should hone your abilities. I have a wonderful idea. Why don't we play a little game? I'll hide somewhere on the ship and you find me.
But how do I know how?
Don't worry, Amanda. You can do it.
Not bad. Not bad at all.
If we can use phase buffers we may be able to devise a mechanism that can be integrated into the present system while it is in operation.
You're still thinking like a human.
Now do you understand? What do humans have to offer you that even begins to compare with that? Your future contains wonders you can't even imagine. The universe could be your playground.
Doctor Crusher and Counsellor Troi. They're taking me to dinner.
You don't have to eat, you know. It's a nasty human habit you could easily do without.
Hello, Amanda. Are you ready?
Yes.
Well, Amanda, how are you feeling about all this now? It must be overwhelming.
It was at first, but actually now I'm enjoying myself.
Hello, ladies.
Hello, Will.
Commander Riker. Er, won't you join us?
I'd love, to but I have other plans.
Hi.
Hi.
So, how are your lessons going? Is Q being patient with you? Amanda?
What is this all about?
I thought it might be nice to spend some time alone together.
I think it would be nice if you took us back to Ten Forward.
Are you sure you wouldn't want to stay here with me for a while? The moonlight is so beautiful. Isn't it nicer here than at Ten Forward?
Yes, it's very pleasant, but that's not the point.
Oh? I think it is.
No. You can't just snatch people and put them in your fantasies and expect them to respond.
Don't you like me? Even just a little bit?
You're a very lovely young lady. But none of this is real.
My feelings are real.
I know. But you can't make someone love you.
Can't I?
Oh, Amanda. You are so beautiful.
Do you love me?
More than anything.
You're right. None of this is real. I thought it would be romantic, but it's empty.
Amanda.
Just go back to Ten Forward.
Bon jour, mon Capitane. You wanted to talk with me?
I wanted to ask you about Amanda's biological parents. When they decided to remain on Earth, what was the reaction in the Q Continuum?
We found it incomprehensible.
Were they pressured to return? Were they threatened with any punishment if they didn't?
What are you driving at, Picard?
Well, the circumstance of their death's quite odd. A tornado somehow escaped the weather modification net and touched down in only one spot. Amanda's home.
Well, you never can predict the weather.
But tornadoes develop from existing storm fronts. But you see, there were no storm fronts in Kansas that day. Witnesses reported that the funnel materialised spontaneously directly over Amanda's home, destroyed it, and disappeared.
If you say so. I wasn't there.
Were Amanda's parents executed by the Q Continuum?
And what if they were?
Then I think she has a right to know that before she makes a choice about her future.
Don't be foolish, Picard. She has no choice. She never did. If she's truly Q, then she must return to the Continuum where she belongs. But if she were some kind of hybrid, neither human nor Q, then
You would be so despicable?
Don't be naive. You have no idea what it means to be Q. With unlimited power comes responsibility. Do you think it is reasonable for us to allow omnipotent beings to roam free through the universe?
So what have you concluded? Does she live or does she die?
I haven't decided yet.
Captain's log, stardate 46193.8. We have arrived at Tagra Four and have begun delivering supplies. In the meantime, I am faced with a crisis of a different nature.
Look, I have no reason to believe that Q is lying. He claims he has orders from the Continuum. If Amanda cannot prove that she is fully Q, then he must kill her.
We have to tell her.
I don't know if we should. It almost seems cruel.
Maybe she can protect herself. After all, she has a great deal of power.
So did her parents. It didn't save them.
I agree with the Counsellor. Amanda deserves to know the truth of her situation. We have no right to withhold such crucial information from her. But it isn't going to be easy telling her.
What's your impression of the field modulator, Mister Lote?
Quite ingenious. Quite ingenious, indeed.  I'm amazed at the way it can be incorporated with the existing system.
Commander, we're all loaded here. We can head for the surface whenever you're ready.
I'm eager to see the field modulator in place, Commander.
We'd better get going.
Yes.
Kill me? But why?
They're not convinced that you are fully Q. And they are also responsible for your parent's death.
My parents? But what right do they have? Q? Answer me. Are you afraid to face me?
She's such a plucky little thing, now, isn't she. I really do enjoy you, you know.
Amanda's question deserves an answer, Q. You've made yourself judge, jury, and if necessary executioner. By what right have you appointed yourself to this position?
Superior morality.
Yes. I recall how you used your superior morality when we first encountered you. You put us on trial for the crimes of humanity.
The jury is still out on that, Picard, make no mistake.
Your arrogant pretence at being the moral guardians of the universe strikes me as being hollow, Q. I see no evidence that you are guided by a superior moral code, or any code whatsoever. You may be nearly omnipotent, and I don't deny that your parlour tricks are very impressive, but morality? I don't see it. I don't acknowledge it, Q. I would put human morality against the Q's any day. And perhaps that's the reason that we fascinate you so. Because our puny behaviour shows you a glimmer of the one thing that evades your omnipotence, a moral centre. And if so, I can think of no crueller irony than that you should destroy this young woman, whose only crime is that she's too human.
Jean-Luc, sometimes I think the only reason I come here is to listen to these wonderful speeches of yours. But this time, your concern is unwarranted. We've decided not to harm her. And we're prepared to offer her a choice.
What kind of choice?
You can either come to the Continuum with me
Or?
Now this choice is more difficult. You have it within yourself the ability to refrain from using the power of Q. If you can do that, you can stay here.
Then I'm staying here.
Think about this. This is not so easy. Your parents were given this choice and they were unable to resist the temptation of using their power.
All I've wanted since this whole thing began is to become a normal human being again. I know I can resist.
Worf to Picard. There is an emergency message from Commander Riker.
I'm on my way.
Captain, the damage to the reactor is greater than the Tagrans led us to believe. The field modulator is installed and operational, but it's not going to be enough. The reactor has already gone into overload.
Can you correct the problem?
Geordi is trying to stabilise the unit now. We will stay as long as possible. There are thousands of people in the area. If that reactor goes.
Commander. Over here, quickly.
Is this your doing, Q?
Not this time, Picard.
Mister Worf, see if there's any way we can do to cut through the interference and beam them out of there.
Aye, sir.
Captain, Geordi is trying a neutrino infusion. It may smother the reaction.
Captain, there is too much ionisation in the atmosphere. Transporters are useless.
It's no use. The heat has fused the injectors shut. We're losing containment.
How long till meltdown?
A few minutes at most. Going to have to
Commander! Look at this.
This is impossible. Captain, I don't know what's happening, but the reaction is stabilising on its own.
Captain, I am reading a massive energy fluctuation in the planet's atmosphere.
On screen.
Atmospheric contaminants have dropped to less than one part per trillion. The ecosystem has been restored to its natural state.
Amanda?
I told you it would be harder to resist than you thought.
I couldn't let all those people die
Ever since I got here, I've been fighting this. I've been denying the truth. Denying what I am. I am Q. Doctor Crusher, I've decided that I can't stay. I can't stay here.
Well, now that you've come to your senses, let's go.
No. I want to go and see my parents first. It's going to take some time to explain all this, so you'll have to be patient.
I hope I can come back and see you.
You're a Q. You can do anything you want.
I don't understand your concern, Number One. They're not authorised to make any alterations in our engines, and according to Starfleet's report, they will simply test different ways of entering warp speed and different intermix formulas. What's the harm in that?
It's the specs that Kosinski sent us. In my opinion, sir, they're gibberish.
Gibberish?
Mister Data, would you explain?
Sir, we put Mister Kosinski's specs into the computer and ran a controlled test on them. There was no improvement in engine performance.
Then how do you explain Starfleet's report that the same tests on the USS Ajax and on the Fearless over there, resulted in a measurable increase in propulsion.
Our engines are new, sir. Top condition. The tests on those older ships may have simply been to straighten out some engine inefficiency.
Bridge from Transporter Chief. Two from USS Fearless are ready to beam over.
Stand by for Commander Riker, Chief. He's on his way.
Aye, sir,
Since you're concerned about these tests.
Yes, sir. Captain, if I may, I'll ask Counsellor Troi to look these visitors over.
Very good.
Welcome aboard, Mister Kosinski. I'm the First Officer, Commander William Riker, and this is
Where is the Captain, please?
He is engaged in other duties, sir.
A ship's engines should be a concern of the ship's Captain.
They are, sir. Which is why they have made the First Officer directly responsible for an engine's condition and performance. Guided, of course, by one of our Chief Engineers, Lieutenant Commander Argyle in this case.
A pleasure, sir. I appreciated receiving the specs.
To which you have no end of questions?
Aye, I have.
And you, sir, are listed as
As Mister Kosinski's assistant. My actual name is unpronounceable by humans.
You're from Tau Alpha C. That's very distant.
All approved and described in the Starfleet communications. Now, I would like to set up in the Engine Room immediately.
I'll have our Chief Engineer show you to his Engine Room.
No need. I know my way around starships.
One thing that Kosinski isn't hiding, his bad disposition.
Agreed. Also, he's arrogant, overbearing, self-important, and very sure of himself and his ability.
And the other one, his assistant?
He's the puzzle. With most life forms I can usually feel something. I may not be able to understand or interpret it, but I feel something, if only a presence. With him, nothing. Empty space. It's as though he isn't even here. Something about this concerns me. I don't know what, I can't point out a reason yet.
Stay concerned, please. The safety of the Enterprise may be entrusted to these two.
Inform the Bridge I shall begin the first test in precisely fifteen minutes. Why is that child here?
He's working on a school project. Before you begin, there are some questions. First, tell us how you arrived
In order to save myself time, let me ask those questions for you. You received the information which Starfleet provided, you fed it into your computer as precisely as humanly possible, then you did a controlled test. And then, to your astonishment, nothing happened. So you said, what's going on? This doesn't work. Kosinski's a fraud. You see, I have had this conversation on other Starfleet vessels before. They didn't understand it. why should you?
Surely you're not saying it's unexplainable?
I'm saying I'm not a teacher, nor do I wish to become one. I have neither the inclination nor the time.
You have all the time you need.
I don't think you understand. This has already been approved by Starfleet Command.
But it hasn't been approved by the Chief Engineer or by me.
I didn't know that was necessary.
Now you do.
Perhaps I should speak to Captain Picard.
If you like. It won't change anything.
How basic shall I be?
I'll leave that to you.
Would you get onto the auxiliary panel, please?
In order to save time, my assistant is going to lay in my base formulas more rapidly than any human being possibly could, including even myself. So, here then, in the simplest possible terms, what I do. Now, this warp drive system was tuned only in the grossest possible sense, at least according to my standards. What I do is specific. Thank you. Well, sufficient to say for now, these symbols
Something troubles you with the way this is configured? How about it now?
Yes. But shouldn't these be connected? Here and here.
Now will it do what Kosinski says it will?
It has a chance. It might work better this way. Yes.
View with me if you will this screen as we consider the following. Now, is this merely mechanics or is it nature that we deal with in all of this? And what else than nature are the elementals of space and time? You are trained in the system. You go in a straight line, competent, yes, and perhaps even innovative in a minimalist way, but what I do here is not the end of the process, it is the beginning. So, what do I do? Go back to the Fearless, which I left with a more efficient warp drive than I found? Or do you cast off your ignorance and allow me to continue?
Could anything he's proposing damage our system?
How could it? It's meaningless.
Then we should let him try it?
What do you mean, let he him try it? Don't talk about me in the third person like I'm not standing right here!
Yes, we might as well let him try it.
Oh yes, we might as well let him try it. You are too generous. Boy! Boy, don't play with that.
Captain, main Engineering is ready to proceed.
Engineering, this is the Bridge. It's your call.
Do this one just like the last time. Nothing changes. Commander, I'll make my preliminary adjustments at warp one point five, and complete them as we achieve warp four.
Engineering to bridge, did you copy that?
Affirmative, Number One. Are you ready?
We are.
La Forge, set in warp one point five.
Warp one point five, sir.
Engage.
All right, here we go.
What are you doing?
Captain, we're passing warp ten!
What is our velocity?
It's off the scale, sir.
Reverse engines.
Captain, no one has ever reversed engines at this velocity.
Because no one has gone this fast. Reverse engines.
All stop.
Reading all stop, sir.
Position?
Calculating it, sir. Data, what do you read there?
Malfunction, I trust.
Position, Mister La Forge.
Well, sir, according to these calculations, we've not only left our own galaxy, but passed through two others, ending up on the far side of Triangulum. The galaxy known as M Thirty Three.
That's not possible. Data, what distance have we travelled?
Two million seven hundred thousand light years.
I can't accept that.
You must, sir. Our comparisons show it to be completely accurate.
And I calculate that at maximum warp, sir it would take over three hundred years to get home.
Captain's log, stardate 41263.2. This will be a rather unusual log entry, assuming Starfleet ever receives it. As I have already informed my crew, a phenomenal surge of power during a warp speed experiment has sent our starship hurtling out of our own galaxy, past another, taking us over two million seven hundred thousand light years in a few minutes.
Message on this has been transmitted to Starfleet, sir.
Which, traveling subspace, they should receive in fifty-one years, ten months nine weeks, sixteen days
Mister Data!
Sir?
Captain Picard, I presume?
We're still trying to determine what happened, sir.
The truth is, Captain, I made a mistake. A wonderful, incredible mistake.
Just explain what brought us here.
As the power grew, I applied the energy asymptomatically. I anticipated some tilling, but it didn't occur. Now that was my error, using the Bessel functions at the beginning.
What is he saying, Number One?
To tell the truth, sir, it sounds to me like nonsense to me. But considering
Considering where we are, we must assume it isn't.
Can I do something to help? I can call my mother. She's a doctor.
No, there's nothing she can do. I need to rest. I've been away too long.
What happened to you, is it part of what happened to the ship?
Please believe me, I mean no harm to this vessel or those in it.
Is Mister Kosinski like he sounds? A joke?
No, that's too cruel. He has sensed some small part of it
That space and time and thought aren't the separate things they appear to be? I just thought the formula you were using said something like that.
Boy, don't ever say that again. And especially not at your age in a world that's not ready for such, such dangerous nonsense.
I've always suspected this rate of speed was possible, of course, but at this level? No, never. We're going to need new definitions. New parameters.
Perhaps you could call it the Kosinski scale.
Why not? Yes, of course. Since I'm the one who has made the so-called warp barrier meaningless. And, Captain, this must be a special thrill for you.
Thrill?
As an explorer. In three centuries of space flight, we've charted just eleven percent of our galaxy. And then we accomplish this.
Yes, but isn't the real point, can you do it again? Can you get us home?
Of course I can. I'll just do what I did before. Coming, Riker?
Commander Riker will join you in a moment.
Comment is invited. Counsellor?
He's convinced he's right. I have no doubt of that.
Captain, can you allow a man who has made one mistake back into a position where he may make another?
Captain, what are our options really? I mean, if this guy can't get us back, who will?
Captain, we're here. Why not avail ourselves of this opportunity for study? There is a giant protostar here in the process of forming. No other vessel has been out this far.
Spoken like a true Starfleet graduate. It is tempting, eh, Number One?
Aye, sir, it is. But as they say, sir, you're the Captain.
I know that if Kosinski can get us home, Starfleet can use his technique to bring back a pure science vessel to do even more. Number One, tell Kosinski prepare to get us out of here.
Aye, sir.
Do you realise how many great advancements of mankind have been tied to speed? This is a moment in history. Right here, right now. And your names will be forever linked with mine.
Excuse me, Commander Riker. I don't think he did this. I think
Not now, Wes.
Standing by, Number One.
But sir, when this all happened, I was watching his assistant
I'm sure it was fascinating, Wesley. I am looking forward to hearing about it. But not right now.
Aye, sir.
Come on.
He's too tired. Why don't you do it by yourself?
Yes, why not?
No, I will help.
As you wish.
I've laid in the reciprocal course back, Captain.
Tell the captain I am ready, First Officer.
We're ready for you to engage, Captain.
As before
Begin at warp one point five.
Warp one point five, sir.
This isn't working.
All stop.
Answering all stop, Captain.
According to the instruments, sir, our speed never exceeded warp one point five.
All stopped, sir.
Yes, but where is this place?
Where none have gone before.
Captain's log, stardate 41263.3. Instead of returning to our own galaxy, the Enterprise has gone forward to a place in the universe which is uncharted and unknown. Our present position puts us at over a billion light years from our galaxy.
Data, you have the helm. I'll be in Engineering.
What is it?
A Klingon Targ! My pet. From home, but when I was a child.
You're telling me that's a kitty-cat?
Yes, I suppose you could call it that.
You darling, what are you doing here?
Now, run. This isn't a safe place at all.
Tasha, what's wrong? You look scared to death.
I was, I was. This is crazy. I was at the colony where I grew up, being chased by a rape gang
Are you all right? Well, you're safe now.
Captain! Captain, we need help.
What's wrong?
Don't you see what's following us?
Ensign, what are you doing?
You look tense, Jean-Luc. Come and have a cup of tea.
Maman?
I'll make it good and strong, the way you like it. We will have a nice long talk.
This can't be. You've been
Dead? But I'm always with you, you know that.
Yes, I've felt that. But why now, suddenly.
You mean out here? At what you say us the end of the universe? Or do you see this as the beginning of it?
We believe it the outer rim. Maman, do you understand these things? Can you tell me where my ship is? What is this place?
Captain? You were reported headed for
Just a moment, Number One!
Can I help you, sir?
No. No, let's help all of us.  General quarters. Red Alert.
What is it Captain? Why are we at General quarters?
I had to get everyone's attention. It was the quickest way. This is the Captain. This is not a drill. It seems that in this place, the world of the physical universe and the world of ideas is somehow intermixed. What we think
Also becomes a reality. We must, therefore, I repeat, must begin controlling our thoughts.
We will give you more on this as our understanding increases. The Enterprise will stay at full alert until the crisis is over.
What did you do?
It wasn't him. It never was. It was his assistant.
What are you talking about?
Kosinski wasn't the one controlling the warp experiments.
It was me!
The equations he punched in were nonsense, just as we thought.
I honestly thought it was me. I thought somehow, somehow I was operating on his level.
It's also my fault, Captain. I should have realised it wasn't Kosinski.
How could you? How could any of us?
Wesley did.
If you knew something, why didn't you say so?
He tried, twice. I didn't listen.
He's unconscious. Why?
I'm not certain yet.
He phased, sir.
What does that mean?
Parts of him disappeared and then came back. Nobody else was paying attention to him the first time. RIKER When we saw it this time, he seemed to be struggling, fighting it.
He's dying.
He mustn't. He's the only one who can get us back.
Realistically, it does not seem possible.
Captain's log, supplemental. Our position is unknown, and our only chance of returning to the known universe is a dying alien who is generally humanoid but with a physiology sufficiently different from our own to create medical problems in caring for him.
Cause?
I don't know. My equipment doesn't register his kind of life signs. I would have to guess exhaustion, fatigue.
Is he going to be all right?
What is the boy doing here?
Mom, he's my friend.
You may want him here before we're done, sir. He seems to have developed some sort of special attachment to the boy.
My name is Wesley, Commander Riker.
He knows. We all know. Will he live?
I'm not sure.
Wake him.
I recommend we let him come around in his own time.
We don't have that luxury. Wake him.
He could die, and with him any chance we have.
Doctor. Wes. We all have other friends aboard this ship, too. If we stay here much longer we may lose the ability to distinguish between thought and reality. Now, regardless of the risk, wake him. Now.
Do you recognise me? I'm the Captain and I need answers.
I'll do my best to provide
Who are you? Or what?
I am a Traveller.
Traveller? What is your destination?
Destination?
Yes, what place are you trying to reach?
Ah, place. No. There is no specific place I wish to go.
Then what is the purpose of your journey?
Curiosity.
That's not an answer.
I have certain abilities. They give me an understanding of propulsion. I've been trading this for passage on Starfleet vessels.
And allowing Kosinski to take credit for what you did.
It seemed the sensible way.
Until now.
Captain, I seek only transportation in order to see and experience your reality. I am no a threat to you, your ship or your crew.
He isn't, Captain. I know he isn't.
Our reality? And in order to satisfy this curiosity, you have brought my ship and my crew into great risk.
I have made some mistakes.
Some mistakes? What mistakes could possibly explain these incredible explosions of velocity?
I don't know if I can put this in terms you'll understand.
I believe there may be a warp speed that can get us beyond Galaxy M Thirty Three, but there is no velocity of any magnitude that can possibly bring us wherever this is. Is it true what our navigation sensors are telling us? Are we millions of light years away from where we were?
Well, yes.
Well, what got us here?
Thought.
Thought?
You do understand, don't you that thought is the basis of all reality? The energy of thought, to put it in your terms, is very powerful.
That's not an explanation.
I have the ability to act like a lens which focuses thought.
That's just so much nonsense. You're asking us to believe in magic.
Well yes, this could seem like magic to you.
No. No, it actually makes sense to me. Only the power of thought could explain what has been happening. Especially out here.
Thought is the essence of where you are now. You do understand the danger, don't you?
Chaos. What we think is what happens.
It pains me I was so careless, Captain. My intent was only to observe, not to cause this. You should not be here until your far, far distant future. Certainly not until you have learned control.
You are from a different time, aren't you?
Well, no, not exactly from another time. Although as you understand the concept, yes, perhaps that term fits as well as any.
And you have this ability to travel.
Yes.
And others of your kind have the same ability?
Yes.
Then why, in all of our history, is there no record of you or someone like you ever having visited us?
What wonderful arrogance. There is no record because we have not visited you before.
Why not?
Well, up until now, if you'll forgive this, you've been uninteresting. It's only now that your life form merits serious attention. I'm sorry.
What's happening?
He's unconscious again.
Revive him.
Whatever you need from him, you'd better get it soon.
If I may suggest, sir, that first leap out of our galaxy was, as he said, a mistake.
Unless he was distracted by something.
And it weakened him, in some way leading to the incredible leap out here.
Theory!
Do you have any facts that fit this? Can you get us back?
Wait, Captain, not so fast. We have an opportunity here for scientific discovery.
And we report our observations how? To whom?  Can you get us back?
I will try.
Number One, take him down to main Engineering. I'll be on the Bridge.
No! He's very weak. TRAVELLER The Captain's right. We must hurry. But first, I request a moment with the Captain. Alone.
Strange how he seems to care for you.
He will forget me in time, which is as it should be. It's Wesley I wanted to speak to you about.
The boy?
It's best you do not repeat this to the others, especially not to the mother. Whatever may happen, it is imperative that it proceed naturally.
I must get my ship back. Do we have time for this?
Oh, yes. He and a few like him are why I travel. You have it in your power to encourage him without interfering.
Encourage him in what?
How shall I explain? Are you familiar with the intricacies of what is called here music?
Somewhat.
Such musical genius I saw in one of your ship's libraries. One called Mozart, who as a small child wrote astonishing symphonies. A genius who made music not only to be heard, but seen and felt beyond the understanding, the ability of others. Wesley is such a person. Not with music, but with the equally lovely intricacies of time, energy, propulsion. and the instruments of this vessel which allow all that to be played. You're right, I must hurry now. But you're right in something else. He is just a boy for now. He should be encouraged, but told none of this.
We're going to get back home. Take him to Engineering.
Yes, sir.
I'll be on the Bridge.
Yes, sir.
Put it out!
How?
Think! Put the flame out in your thoughts.
Now, Get to your station and concentrate on your assignment.
Yes, sir.
Captain's log. Any time entry is meaningless. We have no choice but to repeat the same warp experiment. but wish one variation. A principal part of this warp formula will be the thoughts of everyone aboard the Enterprise. We have no idea exactly how this works. We understand only that the Traveller makes use of this somehow. It will be most important that those aboard avoid random thoughts that might change the reality of what we're attempting to do.
Do you have any further advice, Counsellor?
When you begin the attempt, there will be stress, and it's only natural the crew's concentration will shift.
Plus some genuine fear, Captain. You can't notice what's happening outside without feeling some of that.
All decks, all stations.
This is the Captain speaking. All decks, I must have your full attention. In a few moments, as we attempt to warp back home, it is vital, absolutely vital, that you centre your thoughts on your duty or on the welfare of the one called the Traveller.
Think of giving him some of your strength. Now, this is an order. You must try to do this.
And now, attempt to concentrate completely on your duty of the moment. Or on the Traveller, on his well being.
Think of him as someone you care deeply about.
All decks, all stations. Battle stations.
I will need Kosinski back on the main computer.
You need me?
Yes.
Helm, set in warp one point five, retroactive course.
Warp one point five, retroactive two six one mark three one, sir.
Bridge to Engineering. Stand by.
I feel such an abundance of well being on the ship. It feels like, quite wonderful.
Engineering to Bridge, we're ready.
On my order, Mister Data, Mister La Forge. Engage.
It's not happening. It's not enough.
Warp one point five, sir, which is what my instruments have read all along.
And our position reads exactly what it was before this sleigh ride began, sir.
Cease Red Alert.
Sleigh ride?
Or whatever you want to call it, Data. I don't have a proper name for it.
The Traveller's gone, sir.
Gone?
He's phased completely out of existence. At least, out of our existence.
Attention all decks. This is to inform you that with your support the Traveller has returned us to our galaxy. However, he has now left us. Wherever he has gone, we wish him well. Have the boy sent to the Bridge, Number One.
Wesley Crusher, report to the Bridge, on the double.
Our next assignment is on this heading?
Yes, sir.
Mister Data, Mister La Forge, increase to warp five. Same heading.
Warp five, sir.
On that same heading, sir.
Ah, Wesley. Come on the Bridge. Move!
Commander Riker has told me how supportive you were in Engineering. Well done. At ease. Sit here in Command.
Captain, it's not allowed. Your orders.
Oh, that's true. Well, I can't waive them again. Only commissioned officers.
It's quite all right, sir, I understand.
Please don't interrupt me, Wesley.
I'm sorry, sir.
Any commissioned rank? Even ensign?
That would give him authorised access to the Bridge.
Well, then, I'll have to make him an acting ensign. Captain's log, stardate 41263.4. For outstanding performance in the best of Starfleet tradition, Wesley Crusher is made Acting Ensign, with the duties and privileges of that rank. And whether that rank becomes permanent, Mister Crusher, depends on you. At the earliest opportunity, your entrance application for Starfleet Academy will be tendered. Until then, you will learn this ship. Every operation, every function. Commander Riker, a duty schedule for Mister Crusher, heavy on study.
Aye, sir.
Meanwhile, you can sit here and learn something.
Sir, shall I send for Doctor Crusher?
Why? Is someone ill? Or would you rather tell her about this, Wes?
If you don't mind, sir, I'd like to sit here awhile. I'll tell her later.
I don't want any trouble here, Barclay.
Trouble? Why would there be trouble?
Because wherever you go, trouble follows.
Lieutenant Barclay, you're on duty.
Is that a fact?
It is, and you'll observe it. So get back to your post.
Look, pal, why don't you do me a favour. Take yourself and your holier than thou attitude and get out of my life.
This is insubordination, Mister Barclay.
Here's to insubordination.
Riker, you're nothing but a pretty mannequin in a fancy uniform. You're full of hot air. If Picard has a problem with me, you can tell him to come and talk to me himself.
I feel your confidence, your arrogant resolve. It excites me.
Lieutenant Barclay, report to Cargo bay five. Now.
It'll have to wait till later, darling.
Oh.
Be right there. Save programme.
I just don't know what to do with him. The guy's always late, he never gives his best effort, just slides by. I'm telling you, I can't deal with it anymore. I mean, how does a guy like that make it through the Academy?
I think it's time we talked to the Captain about Broccoli. That's what Wesley calls him. Keep it to yourself.
It fits.
Commander. A broken seal.
You'd better destroy it. Those samples'll be tainted.
Hey! Is it a problem for you to report to duty on time, Lieutenant?
No. No, sir. I'm, I'm very sorry, sir. It's just I had a very important communiqué which required my immediate response and
I don't want to hear it. Now, we're having an intermittent problem with this anti-grav unit. I want you to see what you can do.
Mister Barclay, I'm tired of seeing your name on report. I don't know what you got away with at your last posting, but this is the Enterprise. We set a different standard here. Understood?
Understood, sir.
Captain's log, Stardate 43807.4. We are taking on a load of special tissue samples donated by the Mikulaks for shipment to Nahmi Four. The samples could prove vital to the containment of an outbreak of Correllium Fever on that world.
Everything looks it looks normal to me.
Computer, activate anti-grav unit.
O'BRIEN:Damn it.
I, I don't understand.
La Forge to Engineering. I'll need more people in Cargo Bay Five. Anyone you can spare. La Forge out. We could use a hand, Mister Barclay.
I'll disassemble it later, Commander. It shouldn't do that. Well, I mean, of course, it shouldn't do that. Well, I mean, it shouldn't do that.
I'm not accustomed to seeing an unsatisfactory rating for one of my crew.
I guess the issue is whether Mister Barclay is Enterprise material.
I assume from your request for his transfer that you think he's not, Commander.
I hate to say it but, I always thought I could work with anybody. But I just don't understand this guy. Broccoli makes me nervous, Captain. He makes everybody nervous.
Broccoli?
Young Mister Crusher started that. I guess it's caught on.
Let's just get that uncaught, shall we? There's every indication he's served competently in Starfleet for years. His ratings aboard the Zhukov were satisfactory. In fact I recall Captain Gleason speaking quite highly of him before his transfer.
In retrospect, I wonder if Captain Gleason wasn't buttering our bread a little. He knew we were looking for a diagnostic engineer. I've examined Barclay's psychological profile. He's a history of seclusive tendencies. It was noted at the Academy more than once.
And yet he chose this way of life. He has made the same commitment to Starfleet that we all have. It's easy to transfer a problem to someone else. Too easy.
Captain, it's not like I haven't tried.
Try harder, Geordi. He's a member of your team. Try to find some way to help him to make a positive contribution. Get to know the man better. Make him your best friend.
With all respect, sir, my best friend? I can barely tolerate being in the same room with the man.
Then I suggest you put your personal discomfort on one side, Commander. Dismissed.
Yes, sir.
Hey, Reg. How, er, how's it going?
Oh, it's, er, I still haven't traced down the problem, Commander.
That's all right. There's no problem.
I've been planning to run diagnostics on the graviton invertor circuits.
Smart plan. I'd say we're in good hands here.
I'll see you get a preliminary report.
Whenever.
Before the end of the day.
Fine. Say, Reg, how about sitting in on the mission briefing with my senior officers in the morning?
The briefing? Me?
I'd like your input.
What on? Do, do, do you want me to prepare a
No, no, just be there. Eight hundred hours.
I'll be on time, sir.
Good. Good. Carry on.
Morning. Start your brains, gentlemen, and let's do it. Has anybody seen Lieutenant Barclay?
Not yet, sir.
Okay.
Okay. This trip to Nahmi Four is pretty routine, so we'll have plenty of time to realign the magnetic capacitors on both the matter and anti-matter injectors. Duffy, Costa, that'll be your assignment.
We probably ought to do the flow regulator maintenance at the same time, Commander.
That's a good idea. Ensign Crusher will putting in some hours with us this week as part of his training duties, so I'll be assigning him to assist you, Mister Myers. Be sure and teach him the difference between impulse and warp drive, please. Lieutenant Barclay has working on the mystery of the anti-grav failure we had yesterday. Your preliminary report had a couple of interesting theories, Reg. Why don't you bring us all up to speed on your findings so far.
Yes. It wasn't a maintenance problem. Everything checked out. I, I'm going to check for a surge in the transfer coils.
A coil surge wouldn't have resulted in field dissipation.
I, I, I realise that
But we shouldn't ignore the possibilities, Wes.
You ought to check the flow capacitor. A breakdown of that could have caused a chain collapse of the antigrav fields.
I, I was going to.
Good. Okay, then let's go over the realignment procedure. Gentlemen.
I just didn't know what to say.
What do you wish you had said?
I should have told him to mind his own damned business. I knew about the flux capacitor. I didn't need to hear about it from some seventeen year old kid.
You're letting it get you much too upset.
You think so?
Why are you so hard on yourself?
You don't know. It's hard out there.
I understand, but let go of it. You're here now.
You're right, of course.
Of course. Let me help you relax.
I'd like that.
I knew you would.
That's nice, but I'm in the mood for someplace a little more unusual. Computer. Run Barclay programme fifteen.
I am the goddess of Empathy. Cast off your inhibitions and embrace love, truth, joy.
But I thought that's the point of the briefing. To discuss different approaches.
It's not that you did anything wrong, Wes. It's just that Barclay's, well, he's my new project.
Yeah, Broccoli's a real project all right.
I just need to draw him out some more.
And I shut him down. Poor Broccoli.
Pardon me, but why is Lieutenant Barclay being referred to clandestinely as a vegetable?
It's a joke, Data. You know, a nickname.
Nicknames generally denote fondness, a diminutive shared between friends.
Data's absolutely right. The nickname stops here and now. Captain's orders.
What the hell?
What happened to your glass?
Nucleosynthesis. The structure of the glass has been altered at the atomic level.
A problem with the replicator?
Unlikely. A problem with the replicator would have affected the contents as well as the glass. But the liquid in the glass was a synthehol replication of a light ale of Earth origin, which is, I believe what Lieutenant Duffy ordered.
I can't detect any residual radiation or unusual chemical compounds that would have caused this.
The most probable explanation is that the glass came into contact with an unshielded power source.
That means a complete diagnostic check of the Enterprise power systems. All four thousand of them. Do I have the perfect man for this job. Hey, Reg. Busy?
Well, I was just. No, not really. Why?
I've got another mystery for you. Somehow the molecular structure of this cup from Ten Forward has been altered. We need to run through the power systems to see if there's a leak that caused this.
I had, I was going to do that.
You were?
Yes. To, to try to explain the anti-grav unit failure. I still can't. Nothing about it makes sense.
Then it is possible these two very disparate incidents could be related.
I wouldn't bother you with something this minor, Commander, but it may be a symptom of a more serious problem.
Do you think we'll need to put in to a starbase?
We'll have a better idea after Mister Barclay runs a check on the power systems.
It was Lieutenant Barclay who first suggested a link between the two incidents.
What? No, it wasn't. I mean, not really.
Will your investigation affect our available power during the mission?
No, No, sir. We'll have to shut off some systems. We'll shut them down a few at a time. It shouldn't. I don't think so.
Good. I look forward to your report, Mister Broccoli.  Barclay.
If you will excuse me.
Metathesis is one of the most common of pronunciation errors, sir. A reversal of vowel and consonant, Barc to Broc.
Yes, I know him comes in. He stands at the bar. He doesn't say much. He orders a warm milk.
Figures.
Warm milk helps you sleep, La Forge. You should try it. What's this have to do with Barclay?
I don't know. I'm just trying to figure the man out. Do you ever talk to him?
He doesn't talk much.
Does he have any friends?
Not that I've seen.
What do you do with a guy like that?
Well, I just serve him warm milk and let him be.
Yeah, well, I'm not so lucky. I can't let him be. He's my problem.
Well, he's imaginative.
How do you know that?
I know.
Well, then maybe he's in the wrong line of work.
You engineering types don't appreciate imagination?
That's not it, Guinan. He just doesn't fit in here.
Terkim.
What?
Reminds me of Terkim. My mother's brother. Sort of the family misfit. Everybody told me to stay away from him. Bad influence.
Did you?
Are you kidding? He was the only member of the family who had a sense of humour. Except no one ever stayed around him long enough to realize it but me. My mother tells me I remind her of him, and I probably do. The idea of fitting in just repels me.
Maybe I'm not make myself clear, Guinan. Barclay, well, he's always late. The man's nervous. Nobody wants to be around this guy.
If I felt that nobody wanted to be around me, I'd probably be late and nervous too.
Guinan, that's not the point.
Are you sure? Excuse me.
Computer, where is Lieutenant Barclay?
Reg?
Beverly?
Good morning, my lord. Manners, my son. Manners. You embarrass me before our guest. Master Barclay will spank you if you misbehave.
Wesley ?
What do you want?
Well, I guess I want Master Barclay.
The boys got into another little scrap, I'm afraid. But boys will be boys.
You cannot withstand our assault forever, Barclay.
You are outnumbered, Mister Barclay. Say you will yield and it ends here.
I will speak with my sword, sir.
In God's name, where did you learn to fight like this, man?
Self taught, my capitaine. Shall I give you a few lessons?
Who is that? One of your allies?
Jean-Luc. Not that old trick. I'm very disappointed in you.
I'll make it easy for you, Commander. I'll request reassignment.
Now, wait a minute.
Look, we both know, the whole ship knows, I just can't cut it here.
Hey, Barclay, I've spent a few hours on the holodeck too, you know. Now, as far as I'm concerned what you do in the holodeck is your own business, as long as it doesn't interfere with your work.
You're, you're not going to tell anyone about this?
I don't think everybody would appreciate your imagination like I do. It is kind of unusual, recreating people you already know.
well, it was just. I needed to blow off some steam because one, one of the officers had been getting on my back.
Let me guess.
It was you, and I just couldn't tell you what I wanted to tell you to your face, so it just sort of got out of control.
I don't know. There's a part of this that's kind of therapeutic. Maybe you ought to talk to Counsellor Troi about it.
It's, it's, I, when I'm in there I'm just more comfortable. You don't know what a struggle this has been for me, Commander.
I'd like to help, if I can.
Being afraid all the time, of forgetting somebody's name, not knowing what to do with your hands. I mean, I'm the guy who writes down things to remember to say when there's a party. And then when he finally get there, he winds up alone in the corner trying to look comfortable examining a potted plant.
You're just shy, Barclay.
Just shy. Sounds like nothing serious, doesn't it? You can't know.
O'BRIEN:O'Brien to La Forge.
Go ahead.
O'BRIEN:I need you in transporter room three, Commander.
On my way, Chief. Listen, Reg. I really do want you to talk to Counselor Troi.
Troi? No, no, no, no, no. I couldn't.
I mean it. As your friend and as your commanding officer.
O'BRIEN:I was synchronising the phase transition coils, I didn't do anything I haven't done a hundred times before. The test object is made of pure duranium.
Seems normal enough to me.
O'BRIEN:Watch this.
I'm glad I don't have anywhere to go.
Chief Engineer:Chief Engineer's log, stardate 43808.2. A systems analysis of transporter room three has yielded no suggestion of a cause for the latest malfunction aboard the Enterprise.
Is this part of the same pattern?
We don't know, sir. And we don't know why only transporter room three is affected. None of the other transporter rooms are malfunctioning.
Yet.
We reach Nahmi Four in twenty two hours. We'll want all transporters operational by then. I want a level one diagnostic across the board.
Advise Mister Barclay to join us on the Bridge immediately.
Could we make that fourteen hundred hours, sir? I've got him working on something.
Fourteen hundred hours. Mister O'Brien, no maintenance on the transporters until further notice.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
I know this is difficult for you. Is there anything I can do to make you more comfortable?
No.
Have you ever been with a counsellor before?
Yes. No.
Which one?
Yes, but she, it wasn't. It wasn't really a counsellor.
Most people find a counsellor intimidating at first. It's okay if you feel that way toward me.
Not at all.
Good. Now, lean back, close your eyes.
Why?
I want to make you more comfortable.
You do?
Yes.
It's okay. Close your eyes.
What are you going to do?
Just listen to the sound of my voice. Take a slow deep breath in through your nose and let it out through your mouth just as slowly. That's better, isn't it?
Much better. Oh, yes. Oh, yes, that's, that's much better. That is extremely helpful. Thank you for your time.
But
Really. That's very helpful. In through the nose, out through the mouth. I'm going to practise that and I'll let you know. Thank you again.
I had a very strange visit from one of your officers today.
Barclay? Yes, I can imagine. Were you able to do anything for him?
To be honest, I'm not sure what happened.
Where is Mister Barclay? It's past fourteen hundred hours.
Lieutenant Barclay, report to the Bridge. Lieutenant Barclay, report.
Computer. Locate Lieutenant Barclay.
Lieutenant Barclay is in holodeck two.
I'll get him.
No, I'll handle this. I've had it with him.
Counsellor, you'd better come along.
I think you should know Barclay's been running some unique programs.
I don't care what he's been running. I just ran out of patience.
Like I said, Commander, Barclay's been running some unusual programs.
This is a violation of protocol. Crewmembers should not be simulated in the holodeck.
Commander I don't think there's any regulation against
Well there ought to be. Computer, discontinue programme and erase.
Computer, belay that order.
Counsellor?
If Barclay is having difficulty facing reality, to suddenly destroy his only means of escape would be brutal and could do considerable damage.
HOLO-PICARD:They are quite disagreeable, aren't they? Shall we have at them?
HOLO-DATA:Delighted.
HOLO-LAFORGE:We shall thrash them.
HOLO-PICARD:En garde.
Stop it. Put that down.
HOLO-DATA:Your sword, sir.
I don't have a sword.
HOLO-LAFORGE:How do expect to fight without your sword, sir?
I don't expect to fight.
HOLO-PICARD:Ha! Do I detect a streak of yellow along the good fellow's back? Perhaps we can supply a more appropriate adversary for him. Number One!
Number One!
HOLO-RIKER:Here I come.
HOLO-RIKER:Am I late? Did I miss the fight? En garde! You, sir, you have a familiar bearing. Is it possible our swords have crossed somewhere before?
Where is he? Where's Barclay?
HOLO-RIKER:Ah, a personal grudge. I warn you. It would be wise for you to put your affairs in final order before you meet him in combat. You challenge the greatest sword in all the holodeck.
You think this is funny?
You are very tall. It might be threatening to some people.
Mister Barclay will find out what it means to be threatened. Computer, discontinue image of Riker.
HOLO-PICARD:Sir, you have no sense of fair play.
Just tell us where to find Barclay.
You want us to search through all this to find him?
It could provide us with valuable information about what's troubling him. You know, there's nothing wrong with a healthy fantasy life, as long as you don't let it take over.
You call this healthy?
You're taking it so seriously. It's not without its element of humour.
HOLO-TROI:I am the goddess of Empathy. Cast off your inhibitions and embrace love, truth, joy.
Oh, my God.
HOLO-TROI:Discard your facades and reveal your true being to me.
Computer, discontinue.
Computer, belay that order! We want to get more insight into what's been troubling the poor man, remember? Quite a healthy fantasy life, wouldn't you say?
Report.
Sir, our velocity increased to warp seven point two five.
Compensating, sir.
Confirmed. Velocity now warp seven.
Maintain that. What the hell happened?
The matter-antimatter injectors locked for a split second. I am not certain why, sir. They appear to be working properly now.
Picard to La Forge.
Go ahead, Captain.
Commander, any explanation for this injector problem?
Well, I'm not in Engineering, sir. I'm in holodeck two.
Another malfunction?
Not exactly, but I'll return to Engineering immediately, sir.
Yes, I should say you should, Commander. Your holodeck activities can wait until later. And Commander.
Yes, sir?
It would be wise to consult Lieutenant Barclay
On this latest incident.
I'd like to very much, Captain. La Forge out. We need to find Barclay now.
HOLO-TROI:Cast aside your masks and let me slip into your minds.
Muzzle it.
Shh!
We have a lot to talk about, Mister Barclay.
Commander, Barclay and I had better get to Engineering.
Dismissed.
I just couldn't keep my eyes open. I'd worked twelve hours on the power systems and then, then the transporter went down.
Reg, you had a chance to get some help from the real Counsellor Troi but instead you went back in there.
I know. I didn't want to. I just couldn't help myself.
You're going to be able to write the book on holodiction. Look, I know how easy it is to get caught up in it. I fell in love in there once.
Really?
But I knew when it was time to turn it off and say goodbye. It wasn't easy, but I did it.
You know, the people I create in there are more real to me than anyone I meet out here, except maybe you, Commander.
I need you out here, Reg. Now more than ever.
The injectors aren't responding to the diagnostic commands.
I think we should drop out of warp.
La Forge to Bridge.
Go ahead, Commander.
Recommend we go to impulse power, Captain.
Take us out of warp.
Controls are not responding, sir.
It's the injectors.
Override.
It's not a computer problem. The mechanism is physically jammed. I can't clear it.
Speed increasing, sir. Warp seven point six, seven point six five. Warp seven point seven.
We can't shut it down, Captain. Antimatter flow is increasing. She's accelerating out of control.
There's nothing I can do.
Approaching warp nine sir.
Red alert.
Estimated time to structural failure.
At this rate of acceleration, fifteen minutes forty seconds, sir.
Did you copy that, Geordi?
Aye, Commander.
Recommendations.
I'll let you know as soon as we have some. La Forge out. Okay, this ship is going to start tearing itself apart in fifteen minutes. I want every idea on the table. I don't care how outrageous.
What about attempting a magnetic quench on the fusion pre-burners?
No, I already tried that. The magnetic fields won't reset.
Could the fuel inlet servos be caught in cycle?
If they were, the swirl dampers would be frozen too and they aren't.
Nothing showed up in the diagnostic sweep at all?
The tests showed there were problems, I mean no problems with the flow, the flow of the.
There's nothing wrong with the computer control protocols or the power transfer systems. As far as we can determine, the injectors are just physically jammed.
Injectors freeze, anti-grav unit goes down, and transporter malfunctions.
And a twisted glass.
What's the connection?
Exceeding warp nine point four.
Begin evacuation of secondary hull. Prepare for emergency saucer separation.
Standing by to release docking clamps.
Reroute systems to primary hull power sources.
The plasma flow to the nacelles is uneven due to injector lock. An emergency saucer separation could rupture the warp field.
Twelve minutes to structural failure, sir.
None of the systems involved interact directly with each other. I don't see anything in common.
What if, what if, what if one of us is the connection?
Us? How?
I don't know, but we're looking for a systemic explanation and there isn't one. We work with all the systems that are affected. What if we're transmitting something ourselves by touching it, or something.
The computer sensors would've picked up anything dangerous.
But if it were something, something that we couldn't scan, you might've passed it to the injectors when you were realigning the magnetic capacitors.
It was your glass, Duffy and both of you were present in the cargo bay when the anti-grav failed.
So was O'Brien.
The transporter malfunction. That's a connection too.
Danger. Approaching safety limits of engine containment field.
Computer, list all physical substances that wouldn't normally be picked up by an internal scan.
There are fifteen thousand five hundred twenty five known substances that cannot be detected by standard scans.
Great. And how many of those can exist in an oxygen atmosphere?
Five hundred thirty two.
And could alter molecular structure when it comes in contact with glass.
Five.
On screen at this station. Duffy.
Jakmanite has a half life of fifteen seconds. There wouldn't be enough time to spread it around the ship.
Right.
Selgninaem and lucovexitrin are highly toxic.
Yeah, we'd all be dead by now. That leaves saltzgadum and invidium, neither of which has been used for decades.
Could either one of them cause all these malfunctions?
Most of the affected systems weren't even invented when those substances were in use. Who knows what could happen with a transporter or a magnetic capacitor?
Wait a minute, wasn't invidium used in medical containment fields?
Not for over a century.
The Mikulaks might still be using it.
And one of those canisters was broken.
La Forge to Bridge. We have a working theory, Captain. There's a good possibility we picked up some Invidium from a broken canister in the cargo bay
And have been spreading it around the ship.
Working theories are fine, Geordi.
But we need a working solution in about five minutes.
Understood, Commander. We're on our way to cargo bay five for confirmation.
Nothing on the tricorder.
Danger. Exceeding safety limits of engine containment field. At current acceleration, structural failure will occur in three minutes thirty seconds.
If it's in there it should show up on one of the polarity channels.
There it is.
Duffy and O'Brien picked up the broken canister and became contaminated.
If we can get it, the invidium, down to minus two hundred degrees Celsius, it'll become inert.
La Forge to Bridge. Invidium has been confirmed.
Recommend we flood the injector pathway conduit with gaseous cryonetrium. That ought to neutralise it.
The question is, will the injectors come back online?
They sustained considerable damage, Captain. I can't guarantee that we'll be able to regain control.
We don't have much choice, do we?
No, sir.
Make it so.
Route primary coupling through starboard transfer conduit.
Routing. Ready for engine core injection.
At current acceleration, structural failure will occur in forty five seconds.
Injector conduit temperature minus one hundred degrees Celsius.
Transfer injector control to manual.
Ready, sir. Temperature now minus one hundred ninety degrees. Minus two hundred degrees, sir.
Injector status?
Matter injector is online. Antimatter injector still locked.
At current acceleration, structural failure will occur in thirty seconds.
Cycle power through ventral relay.
Antimatter injector online. Reducing flow capacity. Commencing warp engine shut down, sir.
Stand down from red alert.
Nice work, Geordi.
Mister Barclay and I thank you, sir.
Acknowledged.
The ship has been seriously contaminated with invidium, sir. Recommend we set course for Starbase one two one for a complete systems and bio-decontamination.
Understood. Picard out.
Glad you were with us out here in the real world today, Mister Barclay.
It has been most difficult to reach this decision to leave you, but after thinking about it and discussing it at length with Counsellor Troi, I think it's for the best. I just wanted to thank you all for your support.
You'll always be welcome here, Reg.
I know. That's why it's so difficult to leave.
It was a pleasure to serve with you, Mister Barclay.
Good luck, Reg.
It's been fun. Computer, end programme.
Erase all programs filed under Reginald Barclay.  Except programme nine.
Bring the stasis units in here, and have them online.
Yes, Doctor.
Tell Doctor Selar she can use ward three for the ambulatory cases, and I'll stay here.
Transporter room four to Sickbay. They're coming in now.
Acknowledged. Stand clear and be ready.
Let's go, let's go. Get him on here.
What happened?
The Lenarians attacked us outside of the conference room.
He's in cardiac arrest. Connect the pulmonary support units. He's got internal haemorrhaging. The bioregulator of his artificial heart's been fused. He's got liver and spleen damage. What kind of weapon caused this?
A compressed teryon beam.
Forty cc's inaprovaline. The activity in the isocortex is falling. Cortical stimulators. Now.  Again. His respiratory system is shutting down. The levels in the isocortex are still falling. Damn. Prepare a four percent series
Welcome to the afterlife, Jean-Luc. You're dead.
Q, what is going on?
I told you. You're dead. This is the afterlife, and I'm God.
You are not God.
Blasphemy! You're lucky I don't cast you out, or smite you or something. The bottom line is, your life ended about five minutes ago, under the inept ministrations of Doctor Beverly Crusher.
No. I am not dead. Because I refuse to believe that the afterlife is run by you. The universe is not so badly designed.
Very well. If you really require more evidence of your post-mortem status, I guess I'll just have to provide you some.
Jean-Luc, I told you not to go running off to that Academy.
Father.
I told you that Starfleet would bring you to a bad end, but you wouldn't listen. Now look at you. Dead before your time.
Q, enough of this.
Enough what?
Why couldn't you have listened? Didn't you know that I was working for your best interests?
Q, stop this.
After all these years, even now, you manage to disappoint me, Jean-Luc.
He's not the only one who'd like to have a word with you.
Why, Jean-Luc? Why did you do it?
Captain, there are still people down there. You can't abandon them.
There must be some other way, Captain. Some other choice than firing on them.
If you continue on this course.
A direct hit, sir. The ship is destroyed.
These are the voices of all the people you've killed throughout the years.
Whom I've killed? What do you mean?
Death has made you a little dim, Jean-Luc. These are the voices of all the people who have died through your actions or your inactions. Now, if you have any words of apology or regret, I believe they're all listening. They're a surly bunch, actually, so don't drag this out too long.
I've no intention of performing for your amusement.
This is not for me. This is for you, Jean-Luc. This is your opportunity to make peace with your sordid past.
I find it hard to believe that you are doing this for the benefit of my soul.
Well, now that you've shuffled off the mortal coil, we're free to spend a little time together.
A little time together? How much?
Eternity. Now, you're sure you have no regrets or feelings of guilt about your former life? I can't have you whining and complaining through time.
If I'm really dead, then my only regret is dying and finding you here.
You wound me, Jean-Luc. After all, I was not the cause of your death. This was.
Is that?
Your artificial heart. You might have lived if you had a real one instead of this unreliable piece of technology. By the way, how did you lose yours anyway?
A mistake.
Is that a regret I hear?
I regret a great many things from those days.
Really?
It wasn't very smart of you to take on three Nausicaans, was it?
No, it wasn't.
And did I hear a laugh? It's so unlike you, Jean-Luc, to have a sense of humour, especially about getting stabbed through the back.
I was a different person in those days. Arrogant, undisciplined, with far too much ego and too little wisdom. I was more like you.
Then you must have been far more interesting. Pity you had to change.
The pity is that I had to be impaled through the back before I learned that lesson. I started that fight with those Nausicaans. I started it because, because I was young and cocky. If I'd been more responsible in those days, I wouldn't have needed this heart, and I wouldn't have died from a random energy surge thirty years later.
So, if you had it to do all over again?
Things would be different.
Bravo! Bravo!
Nicely done.
Cortan? Cortan Zweller?
Yes. Boy, she must've hit you pretty hard. Of course, you deserved it.
You're slowing down there, Johnny. You should've seen that one coming.
Marta Batanides.
Are you okay?
Yes, I'm fine. I'm just a little disoriented, that's all.
Come on, he's just playing for sympathy now. Look, I'm going to get something to eat and head over to the casino at Bonestell. You coming?
I'll catch up with you there.
You sure you're okay?
Yes, I'm fine. Really, Marta, I'm fine.
Come on, Marty. I bet he's got another date.
That's it, isn't it? You are incorrigible.
Try not to end up in the hospital.
Attention on deck, Ensign Picard.
Q.
That's Captain Q to you, young man.
What's the point of creating this fantasy?
This is no fantasy, I assure you. It's all very real. You're twenty one years old again. A brash young man, fresh out of the Academy.
I certainly don't look it.
Well, to everyone else you do.
So, Q, I thought you told me that I was dead. Now it seems that I'm alive.
Oh, you mortals are so obtuse. Why do you persist in believing that life and death are such static and rigid concepts. Why, I can take your life and give it back to you again with the snap of a finger.
Let's say for the moment that may be true. What is the purpose of bringing me here?
You said you regretted a great many things in your life. Well, here's a chance to change some of them.
Change them? You mean change the past? Q, even if you have been able to bring me back in time somehow, surely you must realise that any alteration in this timeline will have a profound impact on the future.
Please. Spare me your egotistical musings on your pivotal role in history. Nothing you do here will cause the Federation to collapse or galaxies to explode. To be blunt, you're not that important.
I won't do it. I won't alter history.
Oh, very well. Since you attach so much importance to the continuity of time, I will give you my personal guarantee that nothing you do here will end up hurting anyone, or have an adverse affect on what you know of as history. The only thing at stake here is your life and your peace of mind. Now, whether you believe me or not, you are here, and you have a second chance. What you choose to do with it is entirely up to you. Do you know where you are?
Starbase Earhart. We came here right after graduation to await our first deep space assignments.
That's right. It's two days before your unfortunate encounter with a Nausicaan sword. You have that long to make whatever changes you wish. If you can avoid getting stabbed through the heart this time, which I doubt, I will take you back to what you think of as the present. And you can go on with your life with a real heart.
Then I won't die?
Of course you'll die. It'll just be at a later time.
What if I don't avoid the fight? What if I won't make the changes?
Then you die on the table, and we spend eternity together.
Wonderful.
I'm glad you think so. I am curious about one thing, Johnny. Why did that rather attractive woman strike you just now? Something you said?
Her name was Corlina. I'd arranged to take her out today, and then she discovered that I had already made a second date with another woman called, er, Penny, and Corlina was naturally upset.
I'd no idea you were such a cad. I'm impressed.
Computer, what is the time right now?
Sixteen eleven hours.
In fact, Penny is waiting for me right now.
Well, carry on.
You're awfully quiet today. What happened to the dashing young Ensign from last night? The one with the winning smile and the smooth talk about my eyes?
I'm just a little more contemplative.
And what are you contemplating?
Penny, er, do you think we could just talk for a while. I don't know anything about you. Where you're from, what your interests are, your last name.
I come from Rigel, my last name is Muroc and I like men in uniform. I think that's enough talking.
What's wrong? I don't look as attractive to you as I did last night?
No, no, not at all. I think you're a very handsome woman.
Handsome. That's something you say to old ladies.
You're certainly not an old lady.
I didn't want your pity.
Penny for your thoughts? You never told me you were such a lady's man.
I wasn't. I was a puerile adolescent who allowed himself to be led by his hormones instead of his head.
Looks like your friends know how to have fun. You ought to take lessons.
Excuse me.
He's winning.
Of course.
I thought you had a date.
She decided to leave.
You're getting old, Johnny.
Thank you. Thank you all. Thank you.
Very, very nice. I think you should forget about Starfleet and play dom-jot for a living.
Nah, this is nothing. A little trigonometry, some minor wrist action. Now barokie, there's a game.
NAUSICAAN 1:Human! Play dom-jot, human.
I think I could be persuaded to play one more game.
Corey, don't play him.
Why?
It'll cause trouble. He's a Nausicaan. They can get very ill-tempered if they lose.
So can I.
No, Corey, listen to me. This is a big mistake. Don't play him.
What's gotten into you? Let's go.
I see you've found your Nausicaan friend. You seem unimpaled so far.
I'm sorry to disappoint you.
Ensign Zweller seems to be doing well.
He's going to lose. The Nausicaan is cheating.
Really? I'm beginning to like these Nausicaans.
If history repeats itself, Corey will figure it out later tonight, and then he'll want revenge.
And will you help your best friend avenge this injustice?
I did last time. I rigged the table so that he would win in a rematch.
Picard, you cheated? Picard, I'm impressed.
It was a stupid mistake. The Nausicaan didn't take kindly to losing. Nor his friends. They were outraged. They wanted a fight. I gave them one.
That's a beautiful story. It gets you right here, doesn't it?
NAUSICAAN 1:Ten. Dom-jot. Human play dom-jot.
I've played a lot of dom-jot in a lot of places. I've never seen the balls roll that well for anyone.
So he was cheating?
I'll bet you that he had some sort of magnetic device in his belt. It was controlling the balls.
That's terrible.
We've got to get even.
What did you have in mind?
Well, we could do to him what he did to us. Cheat. Only this time we'll rig the table so his device'll backfire on him.
Corey, that won't solve anything.
It'll teach him that he can't go round cheating Starfleet officers.
All it'll do is provoke him. And provoking a Nausicaan is not a good idea.
I can handle him.
What if he's not alone? What if he brings some of his Nausicaan friends with him?
Well then I guess that when I'll have to depend on my friends to help me out.
Corey, there's got to be a better way to handle this.
When did you start backing away from a good fight?
Look Corey, we're not cadets anymore. We're officers. We should start to set a higher standard for ourselves.
It was a good idea,, but let's just forget it, okay?
He'll get over it.
I hope so. What?
Nothing. It's just you'd usually be the one plotting revenge.
Yes, that would be more in character, wouldn't it?
Much. But I always suspected you had a hidden streak of responsibility somewhere.
Perhaps it's just that I'm getting older.
Maybe these bars are just starting to feel a little heavy, Ensign. Ensign Picard and Ensign Batanides. It sounds weird, doesn't it?
It's going to take some getting used to.
It's too bad we can't get used to it together. The three of us, I mean.
Oh, of course.
Come.
Flowers! Is there a John Luck Pickard here?
From one of your conquests, no doubt. I guess some things aren't going to change.
Did I interrupt anything sordid, I hope?
No, Q, you did not.
Pity. She's quite attractive.
We were friends, nothing more.
Is that another regret I hear? My, my. We're simply riddled with regrets about our youth, now aren't we?
My friendship with Marta is not something I regret.
But you wish it had been more than just friendship, don't you? Well, maybe you can change all that.
Q, what is it you want?
I thought you'd like to know that Mister Zweller has decided not to take your advice. He's in the Bonestell Facility right now, rigging the table to beat the Nausicaan. I guess you weren't that persuasive.
Corey.
Ow! Johnny, don't sneak up on me like that. I thought you were the gambling foreman.
Sorry.
I'm glad you're here. Hand me that magnaspanner.
Corey, I'm not here to help you. I'm here to stop you from making a serious mistake.
You sound like my mother.
Cheating the Nausicaans could have serious consequences for all of us. It's a risk we can't afford to take.
You are my mother. Well gee, Mom, I guess I'll have to go tell those Nausicaans I don't mind if they cheat me.
This is not a joke, Corey.
It better be. Now, I'm going to finish my work here. If you want to help me, fine. If not, I'll see you back at the Starbase.
I said you're not doing this.
Are you going to hit me, Johnny?
No. But I'll tell the gambling foreman someone's been tampering with his dom-jot table.
All right. Have it your way, Ensign Picard.
I just couldn't make him understand.
At least he did finally give it up.
Yes, but he didn't take it very well.
Oh, you know Corey. He'll forget all about it by tomorrow.
I hope you're right, because he and I were friends for years after this. I mean, I hope we will be. You know, you keep smiling at me.
Well, I've just never seen you like this before. You're so serious.
Do I really seem that different?
Maybe I'm just not used to seeing you in your officer's uniform. No, it's more than that. You do seem different. Well, I'm not complaining or anything. I think it suits you.
Really?
Yes. It's very attractive. Johnny. Haven't you ever thought about us getting together?
Yes, I have, actually. I've thought about it for a long time.
Why didn't you ever say so?
I don't know. And at this moment, I really have no idea why not.
You've said so now.
Morning, darling. Feeling a little jumpy this morning? Are we guilty, perhaps?
I don't feel guilty about anything, Q.
No? We're just friends, Q, nothing more.
And we're still friends.
So what's next?
I don't know. What I do know is, things will be different.
I'm sure.
Good morning.
Johnny.
What's wrong?
Well, this is the morning after, huh?
Look, I don't regret anything that happened last night. I hope you don't either.
I don't know. We've been friends for a long time and, and now I'm afraid we've ruined that friendship.
Then perhaps we should forget about what happened and try to
I wish I could. It would make it much easier to say goodbye tomorrow. We're all supposed to get together later for our last big night before we ship out.
I don't want you to do anything that makes you uncomfortable.
We've planned it. I'll be there.
Well, let's see. You've managed to get slapped by one woman, a drink thrown in your face by another, and alienate your two best friends. Doing very well so far. The only thing left to avoid is getting stabbed through the heart.
I think you'll like serving on board the Ajax. I hear that Captain Narth is an excellent officer.
So I hear.
Well, here's to the class of 'twenty seven.
Play dom-jot, human. Give you a better chance. Give you a bigger stick maybe.
I don't think we're interested.
NAUSICAAN 1:They are undari. Cowards.
What did you say?
Coward. Like all Starfleet you talk and you talk, but you have no guramba.
Why don't we find out.
Don't be a fool, Corey. Look, there are plenty of other people to play dom-jot with. Now just go about your business.
Maybe I play with her. Give her good time.
Orcho lok resnik. Starfleet.
I'm sorry, Corey. He was reaching for a weapon.
I don't know who you are any more, but you're not my friend.
Goodbye, Johnny.
Congratulations, mon capitaine. You did it.
Can I help you?
Can I help you, Mister Picard?
Mister Worf.
This is not for me. You should take it to Commander La Forge in Engineering.
What's happened?
Is something wrong?
I'm not sure. Mister Worf, what is my rank and position?
You are a Lieutenant junior grade, Assistant Astrophysics officer.
Are you feeling all right?
Who's the captain of this ship?
Captain Thomas Halloway. Perhaps I should escort you to Sickbay.
No. I can find my own way there. Thank you, Commander.
Beverly, something's happened to me. I'm not sure
Vell, vell, vell. Vhat seems to be de trouble, Lieutenant Picard?
Q, what have you done?
I've done exactly as I promised. I've returned you to the present.
But this is not the present I remember. You said nothing would change.
Nothing has changed, Jean-Luc, except for you. But then again, that's what you wanted, wasn't it? To change the man you were in your youth? Well, you did it. This is the man you are today. And You should be happy. You have a real heart beating in your chest, and you get to live out the rest of your life in safety, running tests, making analyses, and carrying reports to your superiors.
Excuse me, am I interrupting?
No, not at all. Have a seat.
Thank you. I'd like to talk to you for a moment about my future on the Enterprise.
Of course, Lieutenant. Jean-Luc, isn't it?
Maybe I should go.
No, please, Counsellor, I would very much like to hear your thoughts. First of all, and I would like you to be absolutely straightforward with me. How would you evaluate me as an officer?
Well, er, your performance records have always been good. You're thorough, dedicated.
Reliable, steady,  punctual.
I see. What would you say if I told you that I believed that I was capable of being very much more.
Perhaps we should discuss this at your next evaluation.
I would appreciate it if we could discuss it now. You see, I feel that I would like to move beyond astrophysics to Engineering or Security, something that might even lead to Command.
Frankly, Lieutenant, I don't think that's realistic.
Why?
I really don't think this is the place to be discussing this.
Please. This is important to me. I believe that I can do more.
Hasn't that been the problem all along? Throughout your career you've had lofty goals, but you've never been willing to do what's necessary to attain them.
Would that be your evaluation as well, Commander?
I think I have to agree with the Counsellor. If you want to get ahead, you have to take chances, stand out in a crowd, get noticed.
I see.
Now, we don't want to lose you. You're a very good officer.
Just not one who stands out.
Why don't I talk to Commander La Forge in Engineering and we'll see what we can do.
But, Command?
Well, we'll see.
Senior officers, please report to the Captain's Ready room.
Acknowledged.
We should talk about this later.
All right, Q, that's enough. You've made your point. Q?
La Forge to Lieutenant Picard. I'm still waiting for that statistical analysis.
I'm on my way, sir.
Main Engineering. Are you having a good laugh now, Q? Does it amuse you to think of me living out the rest of my life as a dreary man in a tedious job?
I gave you something most mortals never experience. A second chance at life. And now all you can do is complain?
I can't live out my days as that person. That man is bereft of passion and imagination. That is not who I am.
Au contraire, he's the person you wanted to be. One who was less arrogant, and undisciplined as a youth. One who was less like me. The Jean-Luc Picard you wanted to be, the one who did not fight the Nausicaan, had quite a different career from the one you remember. That Picard never had a brush with death, never came face to face with his own mortality, never realised how fragile life is or how important each moment must be. So his life never came into focus. He drifted for much of his career, with no plan or agenda, going from one assignment to the next, never seizing the opportunities that presented themselves. He never lead the away team on Milika Three to save the ambassador, or take charge of the Stargazer's Bridge when its Captain was killed. And no one ever offered him a command. He learned to play it safe. And he never, ever got noticed by anyone.
You're right, Q. You gave me the chance to change and I took the opportunity. But I admit now, it was a mistake.
Are you asking me for something, Jean-Luc?
Give me a chance to put things back the way they were before.
Before you died in Sickbay. Is that what you want?
I would rather die as the man I was than live the life I just saw.
Coward. Like all Starfleet. You talk and you talk but you have no guramba.
What did you say?
I said, you are a coward.
That's what I thought you said.
His vital signs are stable. Captain. Jean-Luc. You've been injured, but I think you're going to be all right.
I still don't know what to make of it. Was it a dream? Was it one of Q's elaborate tricks?
A lot of people near death have talked about strange experiences, but I've never heard one so detailed.
And, you know, there's still a part of me that cannot accept that Q would give me a second chance, or that he would demonstrate so much compassion. And if it was Q, I owe him a debt of gratitude.
In what sense? It sounds like he put you through hell.
There are many parts of my youth that I'm not proud of. There were loose threads, untidy parts of me that I would like to remove. But when I pulled on one of those threads it unraveled the tapestry of my life.
I was just trying to imagine a hell-bent for leather young officer insulting a Nausicaan twice his size. I wish I'd had a chance to know that Jean-Luc Picard.
Oh, well, to tell the truth, that wasn't the first run-in I'd had with a couple of surly Nausicaans.
Really?
Oh, yes. During my sophomore year, I was assigned to training on Morikin Seven. Well, there was a Nausicaan outpost on one of the outlying asteroids, and one day
I'm Captain Picard. Welcome aboard. We hope your journey will be pleasant and comfortable. Arranging that will be my First Officer, Commander Riker.
Welcome aboard. If you'll follow me I will show you the accommodations that we've
We can already smell the Anticans. They were taken aboard first?
Only because their world was the first on this heading to Parliament.
Will our quarters be near the Anticans?
About one hundred metres apart.
Is that all right?
No. Unsatisfactory.
I believe we can accommodate your wishes. We'll rearrange the suite assignments. If you'll follow me.
And we must be upwind from the Anticans.
Of course, sir.
Neither seem like very promising Federation candidates, sir.
Even Parliament's peacemakers may find this case a little difficult.
But do you understand the basis of all this nonsense between them?
No sir. I didn't understand that kind of hostility even when I studied Earth history.
Really? Oh, yes, well these life forms feel such passionate hatred matters of custom, God concepts, even, strangely enough, economic systems
Sir, my sensors are picking up an unusual energy object ahead.
On screen.
Confirmed, sir. My sensors read nothing solid but considerable energy in changing patterns.
Also travelling at warp speed, sir. Intriguing. I can find no match with anything in our records, sir.
Change course to make a close sensor pass. We can then increase warp speed and reach Parliament on schedule.
Aye, sir.
So, Worf, why the interest in this? It's just routine maintenance on the sensor assemblies.
Simple, Geordi. Our Captain wants his junior officers to learn, learn, learn.
Not just the junior ones. Okay, you hold this relay offline while I adjust these sensor circuits.
Security to Sensor Maintenance.
Lieutenant La Forge here.
We're making a close sensor pass on an unusual object, Geordi. Any problems?
Not at all, Lieutenant. All equipment on line and functioning.
Sensors ready, sir.
Life form reading?
No life form reading, sir.
Begin the pass.
Sir, it is changing shape.
Any readings of matter there?
Negative, Captain. Energy only.
Worf! La Forge to Sickbay. We havd a medical emergency in sensor maintenance. I repeat, this is a medical emergency.
What happened?
I don't know. He got hit by some sensor feedback, maybe.
You got it, Doc?
I got it. Lieutenant Worf, can you hear what I'm saying? Let's get him up.
Okay. Come on, big guy. On your feet. Here we go. That's it.
Are you okay?
He was just monitoring the sensor console when he jerked as though something hit him. What my sensors showed was a glow, just for a second. I can't explain it.
Could your Visor device have malfunctioned?
I doubt it, sir. It seemed what I was seeing was something real.
Sorry to call you, sir. Not strictly security. It's about the dietary requirements of the Antican delegates.
I thought that had been taken care of in advance, Tasha.
So did we, sir. Their live animals were beamed aboard. We were going to preserve the meat for them, but they say we must bring it to them alive.
Then do so. Lieutenant Yar was confused. We no longer enslave animals for food purposes.
But we have seen humans eat meat.
You've seen something as fresh and tasty as meat, but inorganically materialised out of patterns used by our transporters.
This is sickening. It's barbaric.
He's reading normal now. How did you manage that?
Yes. Normal.
Are you all right?
Yes, perfectly. Both of us. Quite normal now.
What? Where am I?
Don't you remember? You were in the sensor maintenance room.
I remember monitoring the sensor console. What am I doing here?
That's a story the Doctor will tell you.
Obviously you feel it's something we should look at more carefully.
A mystery is only a mystery as long as it remains uninvestigated, sir.
I love a mystery, Data, but this one will have to to wait until we deliver the delegates to their peace conference on Parliament. Time and tide, Lieutenant La Forge. Go to warp eight.
Warp eight, sir.
Him Mom. You're back early.
Yes.
Physical sciences class. We're studying Doctor Channing's theory on dilithium crystals.
Tell me about it.
Really? You never seemed that interested in warp theory before. Doctor Channing thinks it's possible to force dilithium into even more useful crystals. If as shown here, matter and antimatter could be aligned even more efficiently
Would that affect navigation?
This is engineering, not helm control.
Oh yes, the helm's located on the Bridge.
Mom, is something wrong?
This is the helm.
Unless there have been some changes I don't know about.
Doctor Crusher?
You will wish to know Lieutenant Worf is much improved. Ready to return to duty.
What was the diagnosis?
A temporary mental aberration.
Doctor, when such a diagnosis concerns a bridge officer, I expect a better explanation.
Then I will first have to run some crosschecks on the library computer. Klingons are so unusual in their reactions, aren't they?
Use Science Station two, Doctor.
Intriguing, Doctor. What does helm control have to do with medical crosschecks?
Why am I?
Is something wrong, Doctor?
Doctor, are you all right?
Yes. Yes. I'll do my work in my office. That's where I should be.
Do you want someone to accompany you?
Captain? There is a malfunction in this station. I cannot bring any information up on it. Science two does not function either, sir.
Engineering to Captain Picard.
We have something wrong with warp drive circuitry, sir.
Transporter room six to Bridge. Reporting transporter console malfunction, sir.
Data, this ship is less than a year out of Spacedock. What are the chances of this occurring?
It is a virtual impossibility, sir.
So what the hell is going on here?
And you are telling me there are no explanations for these malfunctions?
At least, sir, all the department heads have reported the damage repaired.
That was not my question, Number One. What caused the malfunctions?
I believe it was a rampant electronic short that jumped from system to system, sir. But the only thing is, er
Yes, Mister Singh?
That shouldn't be possible. The affected systems don't generally interact with each other. And where they do, it wasn't an interlink that was malfunctioning.
Have you spoken with Chief Engineer Argyle about this problem?
With all the Engineering staff, sir. They're just as puzzled.
Well, I'm not satisfied. I want an explanation of this by the time we reach Parliament.
But, sir.
By the time we reach Parliament, Mister Singh.
These weapons were taken from two of your people who were loitering out of sight in the vicinity of the Selay delegation quarters. Would you care to explain, sir?
These are not weapons, First Officer. They are tools. We use these to dispatch the animals we consume.
Your food supply is not on the same deck as the Selay delegation, sir.
And you have to admit that these could kill.
I admit some of my people are impulsive. and we all have reason to hate the Selay.
They appear to have the same feelings about you, sir.
The nature of politics.
Nevertheless, Chief Delegate, you're on notice that all of your weapons, no matter what their basic function, are being confiscated. Violence will not be tolerated on the Enterprise.
Of course not. And if any does occur, let me assure you it will not be we Anticans who start it.
Thank you, sir.
But we will finish it.
Sir, warp power is fading.
Picard to Engineering.
What is the problem?
We have lost the warp engine computer tie.
Warp five, four, three, two
State of the art vessel? Data, signal Parliament we'll be delayed. We will send a new arrival time as soon as it is determined.
Sir, subspace radio is out.
All right, gentlemen, your theories on this sudden vulnerability of these systems.
If the Enterprise were really this fragile, sir, she never would have left Spacedock. Therefore, her systems' failures are not endemic to the ship, but are the result of the actions of an unknown adversary.
We have a saboteur aboard.
I believe I said that.
Gentlemen. The question is, who? I can't believe it's one of our people.
Agreed. It must be someone from either alien delegation. Now, if the Ferengi could have bought or bribed even one of them, that's all that they'd need.
Ferengi contacts have been detected on both Selay and Antica, sir.
Can any of you suggest any other suspects?
You're sounding like a private eye, sir.
Inquiry. Private eye?
A private consulting investigator, Data, who solves crimes.
A most interesting occupation.
In the world of fact, probably not. However, in literature, criminal detection can be a fascinating exercise. The immortal Sherlock Holmes would have an interesting view of our mystery, I believe.
But I'm afraid we're going to have to find our solution without history's greatest Consulting Detective.
How about here, Mister Singh? If the control network breaks at this point
It bleeds warp engine commands off into dead ends. Excellent. I believe I can handle it from here, Mister Crusher.
But, sir
You are scheduled for class work now. Sorry.
Yes, sir. But I don't learn nearly this much in school.
I tend to agree, but the captain's orders on this are very clear.
Hi. Solve any new problems today?
I was starting to, maybe. Mister Singh sent me off to class.
Wes, you're only an acting ensign. You've got to let the commissioned officers do some of the work.
Mom, I've learned a more than they understand. For example, the Channing's dilithium crystals theory I was telling you about?
When were you telling me about that?
This morning. Don't you remember?
Honestly, I don't remember.
Engineering to Captain Picard. Security alert.
Picard.
Lieutenant Worf, sir. I just found Mister Singh. He's dead.
Captain's log, stardate 41249.4. I've ordered an immediate investigation into the death of Assistant Chief Engineer Singh. We continue to run on impulse power.
He could have been working there, restoring warp power.
According to these readings, we could go back to warp speed now.
Those aren't the same readings as when I left.
Singh probably repaired it just before he was killed.
He couldn't have repaired, sir. The problems were inside the engine.
Who else could have corrected it, Wes? Inform the bridge of engine status.
Engineering to Bridge. We now have warp capacity, sir. All power on line.
Well done. Warp engines ready on previous heading. Warp factor six.
I tolerate these questions, Lieutenant Yar, because I need this vessel to get us to Parliament. Your shipboard problems do not concern me.
They should. Our delays are your delays.
The peace conference will wait for us.
I must ask where you were during this vessel's Earth hours of eighteen hundred last night and zero seven hundred this morning.
Eating.
Sir, we're talking about hours here.
It was a large meal, Lieutenant Yar. And a very interesting animal.
You wanted me, Doctor?
Yes, concerning your memory blackout.
I still don't remember having one.
The same thing happened to me.
I want to try hypnosis on both of you. It may restore your memory as to what happened.
One thing is clear. Almost all of the peace delegates answered our questions with lies.
Imprecise, Lieutenant. They omitted certain truths, which in itself tells us something.
We can learn something from non-disclosure?
Indubitably, my good woman.
It's something the Captain mentioned. Sherlock Holmes. Indubitably, Data has been studying him.
Has studied, sir. Every case. As Holmes would've pointed out, during the time in question, something was afoot.
Afoot?
While both sets of delegates say they were in their quarters, our crew locator sensed them passing here and here.
But since it doesn't show where they went, we're still in the dark.
On the contrary, dear colleague. On their return, they drew medical supplies appropriate to the treatment of minor wounds and abrasions on these life forms.
Which, leaves us with only one conclusion.
Exactly. That they were too engaged in their own affairs to have disabled our ship and murdered the Engineer. Given a choice, they'd rather kill each other than any of us. It's elementary, my dear Riker. Sir.
Beverly, can you hear me?
Yes.
I want you to go back in your mind to the moment when you first recall this sensation of memory loss. Picture it exactly as it occurred.
He's lying on the hospital bed sedated. I'm walking up to him. I.
How do you feel at this moment, as you lean over him to take the specimen?
I feel someone else. There's someone else who's there. Not alone. Get out. Get out of my mind.
That's almost exactly what you said. As though there was something else inside you.
Which confirms the feeling of duality that I sensed earlier in both of them.
Why didn't you report it?
Because, sir, I assumed at first it was the kind of duality we Betazeds feel in all of you. Even you, sir. When you approach a decision and ask yourself which way to go, who are you talking to?
Your hypnotism revealed another form of duality?
Yes, sir. I believe something invaded them.
It seems the only possible conclusion.
Data, let's proceed without the pipe.
Yes, sir. If you wish, sir. But I ask if you'd take it as incontrovertible that it cannot be a family member or one of our crew?
Yes. Very unlikely.
Then our investigation was worthwhile, sir. We have eliminated both the delegates and the ship's regular complement.
Data, what are you suggesting?
I am referring to the great detective's credo, sir. I quote, we must fall back on the old axiom that when other contingencies fail, whatever remains, however improbable, must be the truth.
That engine computer net wasn't repaired, sir. It just suddenly became all right.
Sometimes it's the result that counts, you know. What the? Oh, no.
What is it?
Helm control just went down. She won't respond.
Bridge to Captain. You're needed here immediately.
Wes, alert Engineering from your panel, alright?
I'm trying.
Report.
Helm is down, sir. There's no apparent reason.
Captain, we've just dropped to impulse power.
Sir, are you all right? I thought I just saw
I'm fine. Everything is fine now. Why the drop to impulse power, Lieutenant?
The helm is suddenly malfunctioning, sir.
Malfunctioning? You're wrong. Look again.
Sir, I was just
Mister La Forge?
Well, there's nothing wrong with it now, sir. Everything is just as it should be.
In that case, make our heading nine two five mark three seven.
Sir?
You have a problem with that heading, Lieutenant?
You want to double back on our course, sir?
Isn't that what I ordered?
Yes, sir.
Sir, I'm puzzled about your reversing our course.
That energy cloud, Commander. I believe it important we have another look at it.
But we're behind schedule for Parliament already.
I believe a very important scientific discovery awaits us on this heading.
Perhaps you'd like to share your reasoning on that, sir?
Yes, since we obtained only minimal information on our sensor pass of it.
Right, Data. We must go back to learn more. Counsellor, do you believe a ship Captain should explain every order?
Of course not, sir.
I demand to see the Captain.
O'BRIEN:Stop! Return to your quarters.
What is that doing on our deck?
I demand to know why this starship has changed its course!
O'BRIEN:Please, return to your quarters, delegates!
A mere change of direction hardly justifies mutiny.
Exactly what do you believe you're sensing from him?
It's just a feeling that he's, well, that he's closed part of his mind to me. I just feel that the Captain has become, perhaps dangerous.
If he's dangerous. If.
Then he'd have to be relieved of command. Which you could do, Doctor, but it's beaucoup trouble if you're wrong.
And at the moment it is all pure speculation. He has done nothing to subject the Enterprise to danger.
I'd need a medical log citing clear evidence of incapacity. You could do it without that problem.
Only if all command officers agreed it vital to do so. But he has not been showing any overt unusual behaviour.
Ultimately, I believe he will.
As second in command, it's still in your corner. I'll order medical and psychiatric exams. You'll have to back me up somehow.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. After meeting with the senior officers, Doctor Crusher and I decided to approach the Captain regarding his recent behaviour.
Yes?
I'd like you to come to Sickbay for some examinations, Captain.
Oh? I'll be glad to do when I'm free.
I'd like to conduct them now, sir.
Why? What can I do for you, Number One?
Sir, Counsellor Troi has recommended the examinations.
Same question. Why?
It is my duty to inform the Captain we believe he may be under some kind of alien influence which may constitute a danger to this ship.
I consider it equally possible that the two of you, and Counsellor Troi, are overworked, and possibly suffering hallucinations. Now this is an order. You will arrange medical and psychiatric exams of both yourself and them. Doctor, are you aware everybody is behaving strangely?
I'm concerned that you've suddenly turned the ship away from it's course.
What's happened to your mind, Doctor? The search for knowledge is always our primary mission. I'm sorry, I really am too busy for this kind of nonsense. Do I have to call Security to force you to report to the Sickbay?
No, sir.
What the hell?
Sorry. Wrong species.
Riker to Security Chief.
Yar here.
Security guard to the Engineering deck.
Selays are playing hide and seek down here, obviously with the Anticans. It's a lethal game. I want them returned to their quarters under guard.
Right away, sir.
Come.
What do you want?
Here are the results from the exams you ordered, sir. You don't care to inspect them? Please, are you Jean-Luc?
He is here.
The Jean-Luc I know?
And more.
The more frightens me.
And elates us. We wish you could understand the glorious adventure ahead.
You and?
Soon we'll both be home.
First Officer:First officer's log, supplemental. On the orders of Captain Picard, we have returned to the vicinity of the energy pattern cloud. I am personally convinced that something from this cloud now shares the Captain's mind. But there seems to be nothing we can do, at least within regulations.
We're now approaching the cloud, sir.
Very well, Mister La Forge. Bring us to within ten thousand kilometres and hold us there.
Aye, sir.
Shall we begin the scientific tests you wanted, sir?
Oh, they're already underway. I have an announcement for the entire Bridge. As many of you suspected, when our ship passed through the edge of this, it accidentally carried away a sentient being. Much like these energy patterns we're seeing here. A terrifying experience for any intelligent being. As if a great claw had reached down and scooped one of you from your home world. Drawn into the energy circuits of this vessel, it found its way to you, Worf. Frantic at being carried from its home world, and recognising you as sentient beings, it pleaded for help, but in ways you couldn't understand. Desperately going from person to person, and then discovering the computer intelligence in this ship's memory circuits. Oh, simplistic intelligence, but it furnished it enough to slow this Enterprise thing that had captured it. And it very much regrets the accidental death of Engineer Singh.
Captain, do you exist in combination with this entity?
Is it in control of you, sir?
Very soon after we combined we had learned much about each other. A passion for exploration, for the unknown. We found we had similar dreams, and it offered your Captain a way to realise them beyond human expectations.
Captain, I must speak to you privately now.
I understand. As an energy pattern, free of the limitations of matter, he might travel anywhere, at any velocity.
Captain, do you hear me?
Sir, I see no way for you to journey with an energy form.
Isn't there?
He's planning to beam himself and the entity into that cloud.
The transporter need not pattern your Captain into matter. We'll beam energy only, and we will become a combined energy pattern of our life forms. A resignation from this command and from Starfleet has been appropriately recorded.
I refuse to allow this, sir.
How does this resignation threaten the ship and its crew in any way?
Captain Picard, you are now relieved from duty. I judge you to be disabled and mentally incapacitated.
Security! Red Alert! Restrain the Captain!
Where is he?
This is blinding me.
Captain! I'll help you if you'll let me.
Someone restrain the Captain!
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. More than an hour has passed since the Captain beamed out, energy only. Every effort has been made to determine his whereabouts.
The Transporter Chief has no idea what the coordinates were, sir.
So he's just floating around out there? How can we settle for that?
Give me a choice then.
Still no readings, no sign of anything.
Mister La Forge, it's time to set a course for Parliament. Warp eight.
We're really leaving him?
Commander, wait! It's the Captain. But only the Captain. He's out there alone!
The entity, has it abandoned him?
No, but the combination wasn't possible out there. He's in trouble, sir. We have to beam him back.
Beam him back as what? He's nothing but energy now.
Sir, the entity was caught in the ship's circuitry. The Captain might try to get in the same way if he's in trouble.
Bring us in closer, La Forge.
Moving in, sir, but where?
There's no way to know. Let's hope he can come part way himself. Troi, is there any way you can get a message to him?
I wish I could.
Sensors monitoring the perimeter, ship's circuitry, sir. Nothing.
Bring us right into the edge of it, La Forge.
Aye, sir.
Sir? On my sensor controls.
There's something's here. I feel it.
Just as before, going to Worf first.
Something crazy on my panel. Commander Riker.  Static?
P for Picard!
He's in the ship's circuitry. Come to the Transporter room, please. There might be a way, sir. Hurry!
Is it a wild theory, Data?
I knew we had to have the Captain's physical pattern here, sir. He was the last one to beam out.
Is what you're thinking possible?
Unknown at this time, sir. I hope the Captain remembers his physical pattern is here. If he has, his energy has moved into the transporter relays by now.
I wish we had some sign that he's in here. I guess we have no choice but to risk it.
Energising, sir.
What the devil am I doing here?
Sounds like our Captain.
But confused. This Picard pattern was formed before he went out there.
What's happening to me, Number One? I was preparing to beam out to somewhere. And I remember there was talk of an entity? But it all seems so vague.
I believe the Captain is now his separate self, sir. Much of what happened is naturally missing.
What are you talking about, Data? Is this still Sherlock Holmes?
Indubitably, sir, Indubitably.
Well, at least you got rid of the damn pipe.
Doctor Crusher asked me to steer you past Sickbay. She said you've been looking very tired.
Captain!
Yes, Lieutenant.
Sorry, Commander, but Security Team Two reports they've discovered a puddle of blood outside the Selay Quarters and they can't find one of the delegates and so
Lieutenant. This couldn't have waited a moment?
It's good to see you, sir. The problem is that one of the cooks has just been asked to broil reptile for the Anticans, and it looks like the Selay delegate.
Riker, with the peace delegates and all, I think I do need a rest. Take charge, Number One.
Personal log, stardate 47391.2. I am returning from the Bat'leth competition on Forcas Three. The conditions were difficult. Several contenders were maimed. But I was triumphant. I won Champion Standing. I am looking forward to resuming my duties aboard the Enterprise. However, I am anticipating a troubling situation.
It looks like we're going to have to head into to the Argus Array. This is the third time this year it's stopped relaying data. Starfleet's beginning to think it's more than a simple malfunction. I want you to start a long range scan once we get. Lieutenant? Are you listening to me?
Hmm? Yes, sir.
You seem awfully tense for a man who just came back from vacation.
Today is my birthday.
What's the matter with you?
Because it is my birthday I assumed that you or one of the others would try to mount an unexpected social gathering.
A surprise party? Mister Worf, I hate surprise parties. I would never do that to you.
I am sorry, Commander.
Settle in. I'll meet you on the Bridge.
Aye sir.
Surprise!!
I love surprise parties.
Cha Worf Toh'gah nah lo Pre'tOk. Cha Worf Toh'gah nah lo Pre'tOk. Cha Worf Toh'gah nah lo Pre'tOk. Tu Mak Dagh Cha doh Borak!
That was not a Klingon song.
It wasn't easy to translate. There doesn't seem to be a Klingon word for jolly.
It's traditional for the birthday boy to cut the cake.
Captain Picard sends his birthday wishes. He was needed on the Bridge.
Happy birthday, Worf.
Thank you.
Ah. A painting.
Yes. I have entered my Expressionistic phase. This is my interpretation of the Battle of HarOS.
The Battle of HarOS?
I think it's wonderful. And I know just where to put it.
What are you doing?
I always thought this room could use a little more colour.
Nice. The Battle of HarOS, right?
Worf, are you all right?
Yes, Yes, I think Data's painting is making me dizzy.
Some cake?
Thank you, Doctor.
I thought the cake was chocolate.
Don't I wish. This is from Alexander. He gave it me just before he left to visit your parents.  Thank you.
What is it, Worf?
It is a cast of Alexander's forehead. The ridges of a warrior.
He wished he could have been here when you got back from shore leave. You should have seen him, Worf. He stayed up all night talking about how proud he was of his father.
Thank you for watching him while I was away.
Oh, it was my pleasure.
So, how old are you, Mister Worf?
Captain, I was told you could not attend.
I wouldn't miss this for the world. How old are you?
I am old enough.
Report.
The Array appears to be functioning normally, sir.
That can't be right. We were told the Array stopped relaying data six days ago.
The Array is still transmitting data, sir, but it is no longer sending that information to the Federation. It appears someone has redirected its imaging systems.
Where is the information being sent now?
Sector one nine six five eight, sir. I am unable to access it's main computer, so it is impossible to determine the exact location.
What's in that sector?
It is uninhabited. But there could be a ship or a subspace relay station receiving the data.
Captain. I suggest we beam a repair crew aboard the Array. We can begin downloading their imaging logs, find out what the Array's been observing for the past six days.
Make it so.
Mister Data?
Excuse me, Counsellor. Do you have a moment?
Of course.
I have been meaning to speak with you about Alexander.
Oh?
It has never been easy for me having Alexander on board. I have always tried to be a good father, to give him guidance, but he seems to have his own mind about some things.
Most children do.
I could not have come this far without your help. Alexander looks up to you. At times, I have felt that you are like a mother to him.
Worf, that's one of the nicest things anyone's ever said to me.
One time when I thought I was going to die, I asked you to watch over Alexander. I was wondering if you might consider formalising that arrangement. I want you to be Alexander's Soh-chIm.
His Soh-chIm?
You would become his surrogate mother. In case anything ever happened to me, you would be responsible for him.
I don't know what to say. It's a great honour. So, that would make me your?
The closest analogy is step-sister.
That would make my mother your step-mother.
I had not considered that. It is a risk I am willing to take.
I accept.
Lieutenant Worf, please report to Engineering.
I am on my way.
We have analysed the imaging logs. It appears the Array was reprogrammed to observe several Federation sites.
This is Deep Space Five. Starbase Forty seven. The Iadara Colony and the Utopia Planitia Shipyards.
They're responsible for new starship development.
Someone is using the Array for covert surveillance of the Federation.
That is our theory. We believe unauthorised access was made six days ago. The imaging logs from that day show a ship approaching the Array.
That's a Cardassian ship. Galor Class.
We're only three light years from Cardassian space. They would have easy access to the Array.
Mister Worf, start a long range scan of the region. See if there are any Cardassian ships nearby.
Aye sir.
Worf, here's a propulsion analysis of the Cardassian ship. You might try scanning for its energy configuration.
Lieutenant, are you all right?
I feel dizzy.
Worf, you don't look so good. Maybe you ought to go to Sickbay.
Yes. Yes, perhaps I will.
Any nausea or blurred vision?
No. However, I did experience some dizziness earlier today at my birthday celebration.
Sounds like you're having some of the side effects from the concussion. I can give you some vertazine for the dizziness but I'd like you to rest.
Doctor, perhaps you are thinking of another patient. I have no concussion.
Worf, you came in here this morning complaining of ringing in your ears. I scanned you. You had a concussion. You don't remember any of this?
No.
Temporary memory loss is common for this kind of injury. Do you remember telling me about the Bat'leth tournament? You said that one of the competitors hit you over the head. That's why you lost the match.
I won that tournament. And I can prove it to you.
What's wrong?
It says ninth place. This is not the same trophy. Someone is playing a trick on me.
Worf, try to stay calm. Memory loss can be very disorienting.
The log. I recorded a personal log on my way back to the Enterprise. Computer, access personal logs on Shuttlecraft Curie. Show my log entry for Stardate 47391.2.
Personal log, stardate 47391.2. I am returning from the Bat'leth competition on Forcas Three. The conditions were difficult. Several contenders were maimed. One of the contenders used an illegal T'gha manoeuvre against me. The judges chose to ignore it and I was robbed of my rightful standing. I was awarded ninth place. I am looking forward to resuming my duties aboard the En
I do not understand.
Worf, I'm sure this is very disturbing for you, but don't worry, your memories will return. The best thing you could do right now is to settle back into your normal routine, but slowly.
Thank you, Doctor.
Let me know if you have any more problems with dizziness. I'll give you a hypospray.
Lieutenant, have you completed the metallurgical scan of the Array?
Sir?
The metallurgical scan. Have you completed it?
I do not remember you asking me to. Captain, there is a Cardassian ship approaching. Galor Class.
Open a channel.
On screen.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Starship Enterprise. You are in Federation territory. Please explain your presence here.
We were wondering the same thing about you, Captain. Why would Starfleet's flagship want to venture so close to the Cardassian border?
We are repairing one of our subspace telescopes.
I see. May we offer our assistance?
No, thank you. Everything is under control.
If you don't mind my asking, what exactly is this telescope of yours designed to do?
It's a long range subspace Array. We use it for gathering data on astronomical phenomena.
I'm certain it would never be used to observe a neighbouring species.
Certainly not.
Well then, best of luck with your repairs. Just try to make certain that your studies are limited to astronomical phenomena.
Charming fellow.
Captain, that ship was responsible for reprogramming the Array.
What are you saying?
It is the same class and energy configuration as the ship we saw in the imaging logs.
The imaging logs? Are you suggesting that you have evidence the Cardassians have tampered with the Array?
They are using the Array as a surveillance device. You saw the logs yourself.
I haven't heard anything about this.
Neither have I.
Commander Data, show them the logs you downloaded from the Array.
I know of no such logs.
Mister Worf, are you feeling all right?
Yes.
Mister Data, perhaps you had better re-examine the Array. See if you can find any evidence to support Mister Worf's claims.
Doctor Crusher says I am experiencing further memory loss, but my instincts tell me it is more than that. I remember those imaging logs. I could tell you every detail, every word.
Worf, let's assume for a second you're right, that things did happen as you remember them. Are you saying that everyone's memory on this ship has been altered but yours?
Enter.
Counsellor. Worf, I wanted you to know that we re-examined the imaging logs. They don't show a Cardassian ship or any evidence that the Array was reprogrammed. From what we can tell, the Array suffered a simple mechanical failure.
That is not right. I was certain that
What's wrong?
Counsellor, the painting that Commander Data gave me. It has moved.
Worf, I hung that painting there. At your birthday party, remember?
No.
The painting has changed. Don't you see it?
Your hair and your clothing, they have changed as well.
Worf, maybe you should come with me to Sickbay and
Now, Mister Worf! Now!
What are you waiting for? Raise the shields.
This panel configuration has been altered. I do not know how
Direct hit. Engineering Section and deck forty two. Shield generators are overloading.
Number One.
Firing photon torpedoes. Full spread.
Direct hit on their main reactor. They're returning fire.
Captain, we have sustained heavy damage to the deflector systems. Hull breaches on decks seventeen and thirty six.
Ensign, take us out of here, maximum warp.
Aye, sir.
Are they pursuing us?
No, sir. They are firing on the Argus Array. They destroyed it, sir.
Bridge to Engineering. Mister La Forge, what's your status?
This is Ensign Hayes, sir. Commander La Forge has been taken to Sickbay with plasma burns. There's serious damage to the secondary plasma conduit but I think we've got it under control.
Acknowledged. Ensign, lay in a course to Starbase one two nine.
Aye, sir.
What happened back there, Lieutenant?
I believe I experienced another memory loss.
Memory loss? What are you talking about?
I do not feel well. Request to be temporarily relieved of duty, sir.
Granted.
Computer, access personal logs on Shuttlecraft Curie. Play log entry for stardate 47391.2.
There is no log entry from the Shuttlecraft Curie for that stardate.
Computer, display any log entries regarding the Bat'leth tournament on Forcas Three.
Personal log, stardate 47391.2. There has been a malfunction in the ship's main deflector. It will require two more days of repairs. As a result, I will not be able to compete in the Bat'leth tournament on Forcas Three. I have asked my brother to take my place. He does not have my prowess with the blade, but
Why'd you lock the door?
Why shouldn't I?
I heard what happened on the Bridge. Are you all right?
I am not sure.
Do you want to talk about it?
I would rather not, Counsellor.
Very well, Lieutenant. Hot chocolate.
Is there something I can do for you?
Actually, there is.
Come and sit down. I just want you to relax for a minute.  There.  You are so tense. Now, I know you don't want to talk about what happened on the Bridge, but there are times when it's just best to let things out. Come on. If you can't talk to me, who can you talk to?
I do not believe this is appropriate behaviour!
Even for your wife?
Wife?
Worf, what's wrong?
I do not know. Things are changing.
What's changed?
I do not remember us, you and I, being mates. It is as if events, circumstances, continue to change from moment to moment, but I am the only one who seems to be aware of it.
Are you saying you don't remember the last three years? You don't remember us falling in love and getting married?
I do remember the last three years, but they were different. We did not have this relationship. We were friends. And the Enterprise did not have a battle with the Cardassians. And no one believes me.
Whatever's wrong, whatever happened, I want you to know that I believe you. And that I love you. And together we'll find out what's happening.
I am initiating a subspace scan to search for temporal anomalies on or off the ship.
Counsellor Troi, please report to Sickbay.
I'm on my way. Let me know if you find anything.
Commander, how long have I been married to Counsellor Troi?
Two years, one month and twelve days.
And when did this relationship begin?
It is my understanding your romantic affiliation began shortly after you recovered from your spinal injury on stardate 45587. It was six months later that you asked Commander Riker for his formal permission to court Counsellor Troi. You felt to do otherwise would be dishonourable.
And then we mated?
I am not privy to the exact details of when, where or how your first coupling took place. I could investigate it
No, that is all right.
I am detecting no temporal anomalies in this system. Perhaps we should try to pinpoint the exact moment when events became discontinuous. Do you remember the first change?
I was in Sickbay. Doctor Crusher told me I had a concussion but I do not remember that happening.
Think back. Are you sure that was the very first change?
Before. Yes. Yes, I was in Engineering. I felt a wave of dizziness and when I looked up, you and Commander La Forge were on the opposite side of the room. Captain Picard was gone. I thought I had blacked out for a moment and had not observed your movements. And at my birthday party, the cake was chocolate and then it was yellow. And Commander Riker told me Captain Picard was not going to attend, and then suddenly he was there.
We should try to find the commonalties in these events. Where were the people you were with?
Everyone was at my birthday party. Then I was with Counsellor Troi, then Commander La Forge came in. Geordi. Geordi was present at all three locations. And he was near me in each case just before I noticed the differences. There has to be a connection.
It is possible. We should speak to Commander La Forge.
Doctor, is Geordi well enough to answer some questions?
Geordi's dead.
There do not appear to be any unusual readings. Energy residuals from the plasma burns, the beginnings of cellular decomposition. I see nothing that connects these bio-readings to your recent sense of discontinuity.
What about his visor?
I still see nothing unusual. Perhaps we should activate it.
Hook it up to the diagnostic array and I'll check it out.
The visor is active.
Worf, are you alright?
Have you noticed another discontinuity?
Doctor Crusher was not here. Doctor Ogawa was.
Doctor Ogawa?
My uniform has changed. What is my rank and position?
You're a Commander and First Officer.
Are we still married?
Yes.
I am detecting a quantum flux in your cellular RNA.
What does that mean?
I do not know. I will have to analyse these readings.
I have found the quantum flux in Worf's cellular RNA extends to the subatomic level. It is asynchronous with normal matter. In essence, Captain, Mister Worf does not belong in our universe.
What?
All matter in the universe resonates on a quantum level with a unique signature. That signature is constant. It cannot be changed through any known process. It is the basic foundation of existence.
Are you saying that Worf's quantum signature is different from ours?
Yes, sir. I cannot explain it. It is as if he originates from a different quantum universe.
Mister Worf, you say the discontinuities started to occur after you returned from a Bat'leth tournament on Forcas Three.
Yes, sir.
Now, I know for a fact that you never attended that tournament and that no shuttlecraft has left the Enterprise for over a month.
I understand that, but I also clearly remember attending the tournament and returning to the ship in a shuttlecraft.
Do you remember the route you took to return?
Yes.
Let's backtrack that course. See if there are any unusual readings or anomalies.
Aye, sir.
If I may inquire, sir, how long have you been Captain of the Enterprise?
Four years. Ever since Captain Picard was killed in the incident with the Borg. You don't remember any of this, do you?
I do remember. I just remember differently.
Captain, I'm picking up a minor subspace disturbance off the port bow.
Full stop.
Aye, sir.
Analysis, Mister Data.
It appears to be a quantum fissure in the space-time continuum.
On screen.
The anomaly cannot be seen, but I believe I can enhance it with a warp field to make it visible.
Is it dangerous?
Not from this distance, sir. I am also detecting an ion trail intersecting the phenomenon. I believe it was left by a Starfleet type six shuttlecraft.
So I was here.
I have an explanation, sir.
I believe the quantum fissure we discovered is a fixed point across the space time continuum. A keyhole which intersects many other quantum realities.
What do you mean, quantum realities?
For any event, there is an infinite number of possible outcomes. Our choices determine which outcomes will follow. But there is a theory in quantum physics that all possibilities that can happen, do happen in alternate quantum realities.
And somehow I have been shifting from one reality to another.
That is correct.
How did this happen?
When Worf's shuttlecraft came into contact with the quantum fissure, I believe its warp engines caused a small break in the barriers between quantum realties. Worf was thrown into a state of quantum flux. He immediately shifted into other realities.
And Geordi's visor somehow triggered that effect?
Exactly. The visor uses a subspace field pulse. I believe that whenever Geordi came near Worf, the field pulse intensified the quantum flux and pushed Worf into another reality.
How can we find my original quantum state and return me to it?
We could scan the quantum fissure using a subspace differential pulse. Maybe we could locate the quantum state that shares Worf's signature and find a way to get him back.
An excellent idea, Lieutenant.
Worf. From what I understand, there's a good chance my Worf won't return. I guess it's just hard for me to accept that there's a reality out there where you never loved me.
Deanna, I have always considered you a close friend. And although I have never seriously considered a romantic relationship, I would not be opposed to the possibility.
What about our children?
Children?
You didn't know?
When the last shift occurred in Sickbay, we did not have any children.
We have a little girl, Shannara, she's two years old, and a three year old boy, Eric Christopher.
What about Alexander?
Alexander?
He was my son in another reality.
I've used a differential pulse to analyze over ten million quantum states within the fissure, but I still haven't found one with your signature. This may take some time, sir.
Captain, a Bajoran ship is approaching.
Red Alert.
Sir, the Bajorans?
Ever since the Bajorans overpowered the Cardassian Empire, they've become more and more aggressive.
Yesterday they destroyed one of our subspace telescopes because they thought we were using it to spy on them.
They're charging their weapons, sir.
Shields!
Return fire.
They've damaged our power systems, sir. It's caused an energy surge within the subspace pulse. The quantum fissure is beginning to destabilise.
Can we disengage the pulse?
Too late, sir.
What the hell is happening?
The barriers between quantum realties are breaking down. Other realties are emerging into our own.
The Bajoran ship is disengaging, sir.
The rate of quantum incursions is increasing exponentially. At this rate, the sector will be completely filled with Enterprises within three days.
Captain, we're receiving two hundred eighty five thousand hails.
I wish I knew what to tell them. Mister Data, can we stop these incursions?
Perhaps, if we can find the ship which that Commander Worf's quantum signature.
How would that help?
It was Worf's shuttlecraft which traversed the fissure and weakened the barriers between quantum realities. If he re-enters the fissure in his original shuttle, and emits a broad spectrum warp field, it may be enough to seal the fissure and stop additional realities from emerging into our own.
What then? How do we get the Enterprises that are already here back to where they belong?
In theory, the act of sealing the fissure should restore the barriers between quantum states. The ships would return to their own realities.
Lieutenant Crusher, send a general hail, all ships.
Aye, sir.
This is Captain Riker of the Enterprise. That is, the Enterprise which is indigenous to this universe. We've all encountered a quantum anomaly. We think we have found a way to return all of us to our proper realities, but we need to find that ship which exhibits a certain quantum signature. Our Mister Data will transmit that signature to you now.
Anything?
There's too much comm. traffic, sir. It's tough to isolate who's talking to who. Wait a minute. Here it is. Someone's responding.
On screen.
Captain, it would that we have found the quantum signature you are looking for.
Data believes that by sending Worf back through the fissure again, it would return us all to our proper realities.
Our Data has said the same thing.
We need you to send us your shuttlecraft Curie.
We're launching it now.
Thank you. It's good to see you again, Captain. It's been a long time.
Did they send the right shuttle?
Yes, sir. It matches Commander Worf's quantum signature precisely. I have remodulated the shuttle's engines to emit an inverse warp field. You will need to activate the field at the precise moment you enter the fissure.
Assuming it works, will I find myself near my own ship?
That is one possibility. However, the uncertainty principle dictates that time is a variable in this equation. You may end up several days before the event or several days after. There is no way to tell.
I understand.
Good luck.
Setting course for the fissure.
Acknowledged.
Captain, the shuttlecraft is under attack.
The Bajorans again.
No, sir. It's one of the Enterprises. They're hailing us.
On screen.
We won't go back. You don't know what it's like in our universe. The Federation's gone, the Borg is everywhere! We're one of the last ships left. Please, you've got to help us!
I'm sorry, there's no choice. If this works, everything will return to
No, we won't go back!
Sir, they're firing on the shuttlecraft.
Open fire. Try to disable them.
Direct hit. Their shields have collapsed. Their engine core is overloading.
What happened?
It looks like the ship had already taken heavy damage. Their warp containment field must have been weak.
Probably from fighting with the Borg.
Captain, Worf is entering the fissure.
Charging primary systems. Initiating inverse warp field.
Worf to Enterprise.
Enterprise here.
Captain, is everything all right?
Yes, Lieutenant. Is there a problem?
No, I do not believe so, but I will explain when I arrive.
How was the Bat'leth tournament?
It was fine, sir. I won Champion Standing.
So you think this quantum fissure is nothing that we need to worry about?
No. No, I believe the inverse warp field resealed it.
I'm looking forward to reading your report.
Something wrong?
I know what you are planning, sir. I will not be surprised.
Surprised? I don't know what you're talking about.
Of course you don't.
Welcome home, Worf.  I hope you don't mind, I let myself in. I promised Alexander I'd feed his Dalvin hissing beetle while you were both away.
So you do not live here?
What's that supposed to mean?
It is a long story.
Happy birthday, Worf. Will wanted to give you a surprise party, but I knew you'd hate it so I talked him out of it.
Thank you.
I know Klingons like to be alone on their birthdays. I'm sure you have to meditate, or hit yourself with a pain stick or something.
Deanna. You do not have to leave.
Oh?
I have not had dinner. Would you care to join me?
I'd love to.
Champagne.
The characteristic response to the Kriskov Gambit is to counter with the el-Mitra Exchange, particularly since I have already taken both your rooks. By missing that opportunity, you have left your king vulnerable.
We'll see.
As you wish, Counsellor. Check.
Intriguing. You have devised a completely unanticipated response to a classic attack. You will checkmate my king in seven moves.
Data, chess isn't just a game of ploys and gambits. It's a game of intuition.
You are a challenging opponent, Counsellor.
Thanks, but don't think a compliment's going to get you out of our bet. You owe me one Samarian Sunset made in the traditional style, as only you can make it, Data.
I will honour our agreement.
Raise your arm to the side.
Is that it?
I'm afraid so. What do you think?
Well, it looks like you tucked when you should have flattened out.
Something like that.
Turn your head to the left. Some tearing of the ligaments. Nothing we can't take care of.
Good.
If I remember correctly, the last time you graced my Sickbay, you were diving off the Cliffs of Heaven on Sumiko Four. Holodeck programme 47C.
Same thing. Only that time, I flattened out when I should have tucked.
Well, as your Doctor, I would like to recommend the Emerald Wading Pool on Cirrus Four. It's a lot safer.
Navigators on this ship have been doing flight handling assessments the same way for years, Ensign.
And I've found a better way.
Bridge. Do you mind if we discuss changes in procedure before you make them?
If I had come to you in advance and asked you to do it my way
I might have said
No.
Yes, maybe. The point is, I didn't get the chance.
The point is, with all due respect Commander, you're trying to turn me into your idea of the model officer.
The rules on this ship do not change just because Ro Laren decides they do.
We are picking up a subspace signal, Captain. Sensors indicate a small spacecraft ahead.
The configuration is unfamiliar. Nothing in our database comes close.
Within visual range.
On screen.
Analysis, Mister Worf.
No discernable armament. Reading one lifeform aboard.
Hail the vessel.
No response, Captain.
We're being scanned. It's not like any sensor system I've ever seen. Shall we raise shields?
No, let's begin this with a show of good faith.
Sir, the scans are now matching the frequency of our optical data network. It could be an attempt to access our computer system.
Scanning intensity has increased by fifteen hundred percent.
Shields up.
One Samarian Sunset, made in the traditional style.
It's beautiful.
I hope you enjoy it.
I hope you enjoy it.
The scanning signal has penetrated our shields.
Computers are going down.
Take evasive action.
The helm's not responding.
What happened?
What the hell?
I don't know who any of you are.
Nor do I. I don't even remember who I am.
Looks like we're all in the same boat.
Make that on the same starship.
But who are we? What are we doing here?
It looks like I'm the pilot. We're not going anywhere now. The helm's dead.
But you still know how to work it.
Yes.
This console has tactical configuration?
Yes. Phaser power status, intruder scan, torpedo guidance. But they do not appear to be operable.
Clearly, we still possess certain skills. It would seem we know how to operate this ship. But our identities have somehow been erased or suppressed.
We are on the Bridge. There's a good chance this is our ship. Looks like you're the leader.
Perhaps we should not jump to conclusions. I am decorated as well.
It seems to me that determining leadership is not crucial right now. We need to find out who we are and well, what we're doing out here.
But how did this happen? What did this to us?
Better still, who did this to us? I've got some intermittent sensor readings here. The scan keeps repeating itself like it's stuck, but it looks like there's metallic debris right in front of us. Distance, seventeen kilometres.
The remains of another ship?
That's a good possibility.
Perhaps we were engaged in battle.
If they stunned us with some type of bioelectric field that could have wiped out our memories.
Then we fired back, destroyed them.
But if that presumption is correct, then we could have sustained other damage. Um, Computer, status report.
No voice interface.
No interface, period. Hey. Got something. I've accessed the basic system directories.
Can we get a general status report?
Life support systems throughout the ship are fully operational. Navigation, propulsion offline.
What about communications?
Completely disrupted.
That rules out a distress signal.
If we even knew where to send it.
Do we have an onboard communications system?
We do now.
Lets use it. This ship must have a crew. They may still have their memories.
We should be careful what we say. There could be a boarding party somewhere on the ship.
Bridge to all personnel. Select a representative from your group to contact the Bridge and report on your status.
Remain where you are and stay calm. Bridge out.
Well, that helps a lot.
Report on our status? I wonder if every one else is in the same condition as we are.
This hurts.
How's that?
Thanks.
I didn't even think. I just picked it up and knew how to use it. At least I have an idea of what I'm doing here.
But what about me? I mean, I'm a patient in a bathing suit. That doesn't say much.
No, it doesn't.
Do you have any clothes around here I could borrow? At least until I figure out where the swimming pool is?
We've heard from all decks. There are over a thousand people on board. Everyone's had their memories affected in the same way we have.
I have completed a survey of our tactical systems. We are equipped with ten phaser banks, two hundred and fifty photon torpedoes, and a high capacity shield grid.
We're a battleship.
It appears so.
This turbolift system gives us access to the rest of the ship.
That sounds like the next logical step. Start with the most crucial areas.
Main Engineering, deck thirty six. I'm on my way.
Whoa, wait a minute. We've got to coordinate our efforts here first.
I just need to do something.
Look, I feel the same way. We all do. But if anything's going to get done.
I know, I just. It's really an ugly feeling I don't like being so out of control.
Well, we're going to have to depend on each other if we're going to get through this, okay?
Okay.
We're going to search the ship.
Very well. Proceed.
I'll go with you. I want to get my hands on the computer core. See if we can re-establish control from there.
I've accessed the optical data network for the engineering core. I can monitor every system that's routed through here.
Warp and impulse drive are reading within tolerance levels. So are the tactical arrays, defensive and offensive.
Everything looks functional. Now, if we could just access the control systems, we could get them up and running.
According to the schematics, the engineering computer core access is down that corridor.
Weapons, propulsion and shields are the priorities. We could be in danger of another attack.
That's where I'll start.
We'll begin our crew survey on decks five through ten. When you get those systems going, try to pull up the personnel files. It'd be nice if we all had names. Right. Good luck.
Yeah. You too.
So far our survey team has found no deaths or injuries among the crew. Shuttlecraft are all operational, as are the transporters.
But no one they've talked to knows any more about their identities than we do.
Engineering is working on accessing the control systems. As soon as the ship is operational, we must make it combat ready.
Well, I would recommend that before we prepare for combat, we try to access the ship's logs, find out who we are, what our purpose here might be.
I disagree. We must first make ourselves ready for battle. That is the highest priority.
Engineering to Bridge.
Go ahead.
I've regained control of navigation, propulsion, weapons and communications.
We should be able to tie them into the Bridge in just a few minutes.
Well done. Now we are ready.
The question is, for what?
The phasers are operational.
We now have full tactical control.
We should run a complete diagnostic of all command systems.
A full diagnostic would require us to take our systems offline. We would be defenceless.
If we're going to trust our lives to these systems, we should be certain they're not going to fail.
The computer was damaged. Some processors might still be down.
Proceed with the diagnostic.
What have you found, Doctor?
Not much. The brain scans I've run are unusual, but there's no damage to the hippocampus. That suggests that we still have our long-term memories but somehow they're being blocked.
Is it possible to bypass the normal pathways? To get at those memories some other way?
That's what I'm hoping. What I need now is to see some normal brain scans for comparison. Is there any chance I can get the crew's medical files?
We are currently running a full diagnostic. Computer resources are limited.
The medical records are our next priority.
Thank you.
I guess these are my quarters, but I don't remember anything.
If it's any comfort, we're all in the same situation, so stay put for now. We'll be back in touch.
Okay, sir. Thanks.
That's all I need for now.
Well, that's it for the living quarters on this deck. What's next?
There's a large room up ahead called Ten Forward.
Let's go. So if everything were back to the way it was supposed to be, what do you think you'd be doing right now?
I'd be having more fun than searching the ship, I'd imagine.
Fun?
Well, with that holodeck we just saw. I think I could conjure up an interesting programme or two.
Now that's disappointing.
Why?
You don't strike me as a man who needs a holodeck to have a good time.
Who reported to the Bridge from this group?
I did.
Have you found anything that might give us some insight into what happened?
Not specifically, but there are two things that seem unusual. The bartender is an artificial lifeform.
Can I get you something? A beverage?
No, thank you.
I'm fine.
Your memories are gone as well?
The databanks that identify who I am are not functioning.
You were going to mention something else?
I don't know if this means anything, but I seem to have an ability that the others don't. I have a very strong sense of what other people are feeling at times it's almost
Is something wrong?
No. Just for a moment, you seemed familiar.
You remember me?
Not exactly. I mean, I don't know who you are, but there's something about you.
Bridge to survey team.
Survey team here. Go ahead.
We have accessed the personnel files. Report to the Bridge immediately.
We're on our way.
Computer give me a biographical listing of all personnel responsible for primary operation of the ship.
A full biographical listing is not available.
Is there any list of the ship's senior officers?
The crew manifest is available.
That's better than nothing. Give me the crew manifest.
Commanding Officer, Captain Jean-Luc Picard. Executive Officer, Commander Keiran MacDuff. Second Officer, Commander William Riker. Operations Officer, Lieutenant Commander Data. Chief Medical Officer, Doctor Beverly Crusher. Ship's Counsellor, Lieutenant Commander Deanna Troi. Chief Engineer, Lieutenant Commander Geordi La Forge. Security Chief, Lieutenant Worf. Helm Officer, Ensign Ro Laren.
Commander MacDuff, have the other officers listed here report to the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
Your next priority will be to retrieve any information you can about this ship's mission. Contact the Operations Officer to assist you.
Aye, sir.
He's in Ten Forward, waiting tables.
Captain. I regret my recent behaviour. I assumed an attitude of authority that was unwarranted.
Mister Worf, we're all doing the best we can in a difficult situation. Think nothing more of it.
Thank you, Captain.
We haven't finished a full search of the computer records, but we have found out quite a bit.
This vessel is called the Enterprise. We are part of an organization called the United Federation of Planets. The Federation is currently in a state of war.
With whom?
The Lysian Alliance. They're a genocidal race determined to destroy us. The war has been going on for years.
Starfleet Command believes the Lysians are using a new weapon which has shifted the balance of power to their favour.
Over the last two months, fourteen Federation ships have been captured, apparently very easily, their crews held captive on Lysia.
What do we know about this weapon?
Our scientists theorise the Lysians are using an energy wave, either plasma-based or a subspace interference pattern. The weapon severely disrupts a starship's computer system as well as the mental functions of its crew.
That's what happened to us.
Mister La Forge, do we have any record of our current mission?
Yes, sir.  We're approximately here. We've been ordered to cross into Lysian territory and destroy their Central Command. This is it. The nerve centre for the entire Lysian military operation.
Captain, there's been a great deal of damage to our computer system. Maybe we're not getting the correct information.
What are you saying?
That we get confirmation of this mission from our headquarters.
If we use subspace radio we will be detected.
There could be thousands of lives at stake.
Our orders specifically require us to maintain radio silence.
Our mission is part of a highly coordinated effort to put an end to the war. There are other vessels on other fronts, all working according to an intricate plan.
We're the lynchpin to the operation. If we don't destroy the Central Command, the entire effort will fail.
He's right, Captain. Our choice is clear.
Commander MacDuff, set a course for the Lysian Central Command.
These are your quarters.
Thanks for your help. Come in for a minute?
Recognise anything?
It's like it belongs to someone else. Nothing feels right. This room, this ship, most of all this war we're fighting.
I don't imagine war ever feels right.
I suppose that's true.
What is it?
That same feeling. You seem familiar. You're the only thing that does.
Can you remember anything specific about us?
I don't know. It's more like remembering an emotion. Feelings that you're somehow associated with.
I hope they're good feelings.
Yes, they are. This entire situation is a little unnerving.
It's been a long day. We've all been through a lot.
We certainly have.
I'll see you tomorrow. Goodnight.
Hi.
I know I didn't get the wrong room.
I just didn't like the way my quarters were decorated. Besides, I have this funny feeling that maybe I spend most of my off hours here.
Really?
For all we know, you and I could be married.
For all we know, you and I could hate each other.
Sort of exciting, isn't it? We just don't know.
We might regret this.
Regret what? Aren't you being a little presumptuous? Like I said, I just didn't like the way my quarters were decorated.
Maybe we should switch quarters.
Maybe we should stay right here and see what happens.
What if I snore in my sleep?
What makes you think you're going to get any sleep?
Captain, we have crossed the Lysian border.
Take us out of warp, Ensign. Go to three quarters impulse.
Yes, sir.
Mister Worf, maintain a continuous sensor sweep.
Aye, sir.
How long till we reach their central command?
At our current speed, approximately thirty seven hours.
Captain, I am picking up a vessel directly ahead.
Can you identify it, Mister Data?
The ship matches the Starfleet description of a Lysian destroyer. A short range attack vessel with disruptor style weapons, and a standard crew of fifty three.
Within visual range.
On screen.
The destroyer is increasing its speed. They are moving to intercept.
Evasive manoeuvre sequence delta.
Yes, sir.
They are matching our manoeuvres.
Activating phaser arrays. Ready to fire, sir.
Stand by.
Captain, our orders were to destroy all Lysian warships.
I'm aware of that, Commander. Tactical analysis, Mister Data.
The destroyer has minimal shields. Their disruptor capacity appears to be only two point one megajoules.
They're no match for the Enterprise.
Captain, the destroyer is hailing us.
Open a channel.
No! Their new weapon. Whatever it was that erased out our computers and our memories, maybe this is how they do it, over communication channels.
It is conceivable, sir.
It's also possible that they just want to talk to us. I think we should respond.
Captain, the ship is hailing us again.
If you're wrong, it could mean our destruction. We can't take the risk, Captain.
The Lysians have stopped transmitting, Captain. They are powering up their disruptors. They have locked onto us, sir.
Full shields.
Shields up.
Captain?
Return fire.
The ship has been destroyed.
Maintain this course, Ensign. Three quarters impulse.
Yes, sir.
Well done, Captain.
The Lysian Central Command would have received any transmission from the destroyer by now.
They're going to be on alert.
I recommend a randomly vectored approach to our target. It would be our best chance of avoiding sort of any pursuit.
Agreed. Doctor, the success of this mission would be far more likely if we could get our memories back. Is there anything you can do?
I found several cases resembling our condition in the medical index. The causes are different, but the cure is similar in each case.
Could the same treatment work for us?
That's my hope. It involves increasing the activity of the medial temporal region of the brain, using short-term memory synapses to retrieve long-term memory.
When can you start?
As soon as our medical files become available. It would be dangerous to attempt treatment without them.
Mister La Forge?
Data and I ran into some trouble accessing the medical file areas in the computer, but with a little time I'm pretty sure we'll be able to get there. Three hours, maximum.
Proceed.
I don't get it. I'm still hitting a file wall.
There appears to be a command path discontinuity. I shall attempt to rewrite the locator subroutine.
You must have been one hell of a bartender. It's too bad there aren't any more of you around. We could certainly use the help.
Yes.
I wonder why you're the only one on board?
I have expended considerable thought with respect to my apparent uniqueness among the crew.
Any conclusions?
Several possibilities suggest themselves. I may represent an entire race of artificial lifeforms. If so, there may be a home planet for others of my kind. A shared history and a culture of which I am not presently aware.
Then again, you could've been built just for this ship.
I have considered that possibility as well. It may also be the case that every starship in the Federation is equipped with an artificial lifeform such as myself.
If that's true, maybe you all look alike. A standard issue android. Hard to construct so only one allowed per vessel.
There is another possibility. Perhaps my origin is unique. In that case, I am alone. We have accessed the information storage area. Considerable damage has been done to the files themselves.
The mission reports are gone.
As well as the crew records, and the personal logs.
So are the medical records.
Come in.
I'm restless. Mind if I visit for a while?
Please. What's wrong?
Everything. Every time I think about this war, our mission, I feel a sense of panic like a hand's closing around my throat.
You're never going to feel good about this war. None of us will. But we've got to complete our mission. I've been doing a little research, trying to find out about William T Riker.
What have you discovered?
He's a musician, for one thing.
Very impressive.
No one was more surprised than I.
So what else has your research uncovered about William Riker?
He's athletically inclined, loves to climb mountain. He's from somewhere called Alaska. He enjoys exotic food, and takes his vacations on a planet called Risa.
Ode to Psyche. John Keats.
Open it.
To Will, all my love, Deanna.
That may explain some of the familiar feelings we have.
I don't know what to think.
Come in.
Hello, Counsellor.
Ensign.
Am I interrupting anything?
RIKER + TROI:No.
I was just visiting. We'll talk again soon, Commander.
Of course. Thank you, Counsellor.
Bye.
And what was all of that about?
Oh, we were just discussing the situation we're all in.
Good. Because I have a feeling that I used to be the jealous type.
What bothers me, Captain, is how specific this damage is. Any records of a personal nature, any files that could tell us about who we are, those are the ones that are gone.
It's a little too selective to be coincidence.
As selective as what was done to our own memories. Skills still in place but personal knowledge is unavailable.
It is consistent with what we know about the new Lysian weapon.
Doctor, is it absolutely necessary to see the medical files to attempt treatment?
It would be dangerous to do it without them.
It's a risk I think we have to take.
He's right, Captain. I volunteer for the procedure.
That's strange. The diencephalic activity is exactly the same. There should be some increase. Let's try broadening the bandwidth. Go to thirty point one. Raise the frequency as well. Increase by thirty three percent.
Something's wrong with the sequencing programme.
Kieran. Kieran.
I'm all right. I'm all right. What happened?
I don't know. Something went wrong with the sequence initiator. We're lucky we didn't lose you. Did any of this work? Do you remember anything more about yourself?
No. I'm sorry, Doctor.
Back to square one.
Come.
You wanted to see me, Captain?
Yes, Commander. Please, come in. Sit down. I find myself having grave concerns about our mission.
Concerns as to its success?
No, no, no. More fundamental doubts. Whether or not it can be justified.
I've been asking myself the same thing. I'm sure our superiors feel their orders are justified.
Orders which we can't even verify.
Orders we can't ignore.
But I also can't ignore that we have greatly outclassed the only enemy vessel we've encountered. And that every single possible shred of information which might shed some light on this situation has been conveniently eliminated. I feel as though I've been handed a weapon, sent into a room and told to shoot a stranger. Well, I need some moral context to justify that action, and I don't have it. I'm not content simply to obey orders. I need to know that what I am doing is right.
So do I. I'd feel a lot better about this if all the questions were answered. And if you want to abandon our mission until our memories return, that's your choice, but I must ask you. Is it right to risk prolonging this war, to allow the needless deaths of thousands on both sides, solely on the basis of our moral discomfort?
Come.
Lieutenant.
You wished to see me, sir?
I did. Please. Memory or no, it seems clear that both you and I were born for battle. More so than the others.
I thought this as well.
It's conceivable that is the very reason that we've been assigned to this vessel. The Enterprise has science officers, medical specialists, engineers. Our Captain is undoubtedly an accomplished diplomat. But we, we are the warriors. There are times for diplomacy. This is not one of them.
You're concerned about the Captain?
I am concerned about completing our mission, ending this war. In victory. We may soon face a critical moment. The success of our mission may hang on a split-second decision. A hesitation would kill us all, and those that are counting on us will surely die as well. We cannot let this happen. That'll be all.
We are entering the Lysian system, sir.
Slow to one quarter impulse.
Yes, sir.
The Central Command is directly ahead. Still beyond weapon range.
Red Alert. Battle stations. Bring us to an attack posture, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
Sensors show several objects in our path, sir. They are twenty nine metres in length and are unmanned.
According to Starfleet records, they're sentry pods programmed to defend their Central Command.
I'm reading forty seven of them around the perimeter.
Tactical analysis, Mister Data.
The pods are equipped with fusion-generated pulse lasers and minimal shielding.
Not much power there.
Forward shields to maximum. Lock phasers on the sentry pods. Prepare to return fire.
Shields up. Phasers locked on targets.
Full impulse. Take us straight through them.
We are through the perimeter, sir.
That was too easy.
We have yet to encounter any battleships. They may lie ahead.
Load all torpedo bays. Ready phasers.
Aye, sir.
Approaching Central Command.
Mister Data, scan for defences.
I am picking up no vessels, no additional sentry pods.
Optimal firing range in fifty five seconds.
Phaser banks ready. Loading torpedoes.
What are the defensive capabilities of the Central Command?
Armaments consist of four laser cannons and thirty nine cobalt fusion warheads with magnetic propulsion. Defensive shield output is four point three kilojoules.
One photon torpedo ought to do it.
Data, how many people on that station?
Fifteen thousand, three hundred eleven.
We're within range, Captain.
Stand by.
Waiting for your order, sir.
Captain, this isn't right.
The rest of our forces are depending on us.
How can our mortal enemy be over a hundred years behind us in weapons technology?
Their battleships may be on the way right now. We must attack!
I do not fire on defenceless people. Mister Worf open a channel to the Lysians.
Belay that order! There's something wrong with the Captain. I'm taking command of this vessel. Fire all weapons! Mister Worf.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are on a course to Starbase three zero one. Doctor Crusher has been working steadily, and has restored the memories of most of the crew.
The Lysians have identified Commander MacDuff as a Satarran, an alien race that's been at war with the Lysians for decades. I have conveyed our deepest regrets to the Lysians over the tragedy of their lost ship and crew.
With all the power that MacDuff had to alter our brain chemistry and manipulate the computers, it's hard to believe he needed the Enterprise.
The Satarrans' weapons technology is no more advanced than the Lysians'. One photon torpedo would have ended their war.
It almost did.
I hope I'm not interrupting.
RO + TROI:No.
I was hoping to run into you.
Please, sit down.
Well. I'm glad I ran into the two of you. When you have no memory of who you are, or who anybody else is, you find yourself
The Counsellor tells me that at times like that, we might do the things that we've always wanted to do.
She said that?
It's psychologically valid.
Commander, don't worry about it. As far as I'm concerned, you and I have shared something that we will treasure forever.
Well, I'm a little confused.
Well, if you're still confused tomorrow, you know where my office is.
Good morning, Commander.
Data. Interesting night?
I found it extremely interesting. The lateral sensor arrays ran three separate spectral analyses of the Alawanir Nebula on three distinct frequencies.
Sorry I missed it.
I will have the report sent to you, sir. We are still on course for the Gariman sector. Our speed is warp six, ETA thirteen hundred hours. Sickbay reported one minor injury in the exobiology department at zero four twenty hours.
Very well.
Isn't Lieutenant Worf scheduled to replace Ensign Torigan?
Yes, sir. I was not informed of any change in the duty roster.
He's never late. Riker to Lieutenant Worf. Computer, locate Lieutenant Worf.
Lieutenant Worf is in his quarters.
Something's wrong. Mister Data, you have the Bridge. Security team, meet me on deck seven, section twenty five baker.
Aye, sir.
Computer, override security lock on this door. Authorisation, Riker alpha six zero.
Torva luk do shel! Torva
Worf, what the hell are you doing?
Enter.
Captain.
On your feet, Lieutenant.
Sir.
Mister Worf, your personal affairs are strictly your own concern until they interfere with the operation of this ship. You have now crossed that line. As your Captain, I want to know exactly what is going on.
It is difficult to explain.
Try.
Ever since I returned from the Carraya system I have felt empty.
Does this have something to do with the Klingons you rescued from Carraya Four?
They were young. They knew nothing of their heritage. So while I was there, I tried to teach them. Teach them about their people, their culture. I told them our ancient stories, instructed them in our customs, explained our beliefs. And then I told them about Kahless. How he united our people long ago. How he gave us strength and honour, and how he promised to return one day and lead us again.
Is that what you're doing here? Trying to recapture those feelings?
Yes. I was trying to summon a vision of Kahless.
It's a pity you didn't try using the holodeck instead of setting fire to your quarters.
Using the holodeck would not have been appropriate. Everything had to be real if Kahless were to appear. But all this was is nothing. He did not come to me. I gave Toq and the others a belief in Sto-Vo-Kor, the life which lies beyond this life where Kahless awaits us. When I saw the power of their beliefs I began to question the strength of my own. And I found it wanting.
Have you lost your faith in Sto-Vo-Kor?
To lose something, one must first possess it. I am not sure I ever had a true belief. But I should not have allowed it to interfere with my duties. My behaviour has been
Inexcusable. And understandable. It may be that what you are looking for cannot be found here on the Enterprise. Perhaps you need to immerse yourself in Klingon beliefs in order to discover whether they can hold any truths for you. Is there something you can do, is there somewhere you could go to explore your faith more fully?
Boreth. The Followers of Kahless await his return there. To Klingons, there is no more sacred place.
Boreth is only twelve days from here by shuttle. As of this moment, Mister Worf, you are on leave.
Thank you, sir.
But when you set foot on this ship again, I expect you to perform your duties like a Starfleet officer.
Yes, sir.
And, Mister Worf? I hope you find what you're looking for.
Thank you, sir.
Kahless! I see Kahless! He is standing before me with a sword. He wants something. Me. He wants me! He wants me to go with him!
It is a powerful vision you have had, Divok. Kahless wants you to join him in Sto-Vo-Kor. You are only nineteen and yet your place among the honoured dead is already secure. Take him back to his chamber. Let him sleep.
You're leaving us?
It has been ten days, Koroth. I have had no visions. I have received no insight. There is nothing here for me.
What is the Story of the Promise, Worf?
When Kahless had united our people and gave them the laws of honour, he saw that his work was done. So one night he gathered his belongings and departed for the edge of the city to say goodbye.
The people wept. They did not want him to go.
Then Kahless said, 'You are Klingons. You need no one but yourselves. I will go now to Sto-Vo-Kor. But I promise one day I will return.' Then Kahless pointed to a star in the sky and said, 'Look for me there, on that point of light.'
So here we are, on a world circling that distant point of light. It has been fifteen centuries since he made that promise, and still we wait. What are ten days in the life of one Klingon compared to that? Is the son of Mogh really so easily discouraged? You came to us seeking answers but this is a place of questions. Open your heart to Kahless. Ask him your questions. Let him speak to you with your mind unclouded by doubt or hesitation. Only then can you find what you are looking for. If you cannot do that, then perhaps you should return to your starship.
Torva luk do shel. Torva luk
I see Kahless.
You are real.
I am Kahless, and I have returned.
What are you doing? Who are you?
It is Kahless.
I have returned. You doubt me. Who here knows the story of how this sword was forged?
No one knows. It is not written in the sacred texts.
I went into the mountains, all the way to the volcano at Kri'stak. There I cut off a lock of my hair and thrust it into the river of molten rock which poured from the summit. The hair began to burn. Then I plunged it into the lake of Lusor and twisted it into this sword. And after I used it to kill the tyrant Molor I gave it a name. Bat'leth. The sword of honour.
You know. The story of the sword is known only to the High Clerics. It was never written down, so that if he returned, we could be sure it was Kahless.
I have returned because there is a great need in my people. They fight among themselves in petty wars and corrupt the glory of the Klingon spirit. They have lost their way. But it is not too late. I have returned and I will lead my people again.
Vorcha doh baghk, Kahless!
Vorcha doh baghk, Kahless! Vorcha doh baghk, Kahless!
What is it you are doing?
I was getting my tricorder.
Tricorder? Is it a weapon?
No, no. It is a tool. I intended to use it to see
To see if I was real. Proceed. Use your tricorder. Well?
You are Klingon.
What else could I be?
There are many possibilities. A shape shifter, a holographic projection.
So, you are a sceptic, Worf. I like that.
How do you know my name?
We have met before. I appeared to you in a vision in the caves of No'Mat. You were just a child then. I told you that you would do something that no Klingon had ever done before. You still do not believe it is me, do you Worf?
I want to believe.
That is a beginning.
Gowron is the Leader of the Council. He commands the entire Defence Force. If he chooses to oppose you
Do not worry. We are on the threshold of a new era for our people. Klingons from all over the Empire will flock to my banner. Yet something still weighs heavy on the brow of the son of Mogh. Are you contemplating yet another question for me? After three days, I am beginning to wonder if you know how to do anything else.
Questions are the beginning of wisdom, the mark of a true warrior.
Do not forget that a leader need not answer questions of those he leads. It is enough that he says to do a thing and they will do it. If he says to run, they run. If he says to fight, they fight. If he says to die, they die.
If the commander is worthy of their trust.
NuQ cha'tak. NuQ!
What is wrong? Is there only anger and bloodlust in your souls? Is that all that is left in the Klingon heart? We do not fight merely to spill blood, but to enrich the spirit. Look at us. Two warriors locked in battle, fighting for honour. How can you not sing for all to hear? We are Klingons! Yes! Let it out! Let the joy in your heart be heard. We are Klingons!
We are Klingons.
We are Klingons.
We are Klingons. We are Klingons. We are Klingons. We are Klingons. We are Klingons. We are Klingons.
Captain's log, stardate 46852.2. The Enterprise is to proceed directly to the planet Boreth to take aboard a very unusual guest.
Did you take any other tricorder readings? An anatomical profile or a neurophysiology scan?
No.
It's going to be very difficult to eliminate any possibilities at this point. He may be a coalescent being taking Klingon form, or a bioreplicant or even a Klingon who has been surgically altered to look like Kahless.
There is another possibility. He could be the real Kahless. He may have actually returned as he promised.
The appearance of Kahless in the lava caves is consistent with the stories found in the Klingon sacred texts.
Worf, no offence, but I have trouble believing that the man I that escorted to deck eight is supernatural.
I did not say that he is. I merely think we should not completely reject the possibility.
Look, we have no reason to rule out anything. We are not ordered to investigate the origins of our guest, nor tell anyone what they should believe. We are simply to transport Kahless to the Home World. And while he's here with us, he will be treated as an honoured guest.
Lieutenant? May I ask a question? In the absence of empirical data, how will you determine whether or not this is the real Kahless?
It is not an empirical matter. It is a matter of faith.
Faith? Then you do believe Kahless may have supernatural attributes? As an android, I am unable to accept that which cannot be proven through rational means. I would appreciate hearing your insights on this matter.
Perhaps some other time, Commander. I do not believe I can provide much insight at this minute.
Welcome aboard, Gowron.
Where is he, Picard?
I assume that you're referring to Kahless.
I am referring to the filthy pahtk who is using his name.
Well, the person in question is in his quarters at the moment.
What have you learned about him so far?
What kind of medical analysis have you made? Do you have any theories about his true origin?
We haven't done any analysis.
What kind of fools do you have working for you, Picard? The imposter's been aboard for nearly a day.
If you wanted to run tests on Kahless, you should have sent a Klingon ship for him.
And have him begin spreading his poisonous lies through a ship of loyal Klingons? Never.
If he really is an imposter then you have nothing to worry about.
Kahless has been dead for a thousand years, but the idea of Kahless is still alive. Have you ever fought an idea, Picard? It has no weapon to destroy, no body to kill. The idea of Kahless' return must be stopped here, now, or it will travel through the Empire like a wave and leave nothing but destruction behind.
So Gowron has come on board in order to test your claim.
Gowron knows that his days are nearly over. Now he comes crawling aboard with some kind of test.
We do not have to prove anything to Gowron.
What is this test?
He has brought a knife with him, a knife is was supposed to be stained with the blood of Kahless.
Gowron has brought the Knife of Kirom? No one is permitted to remove it from the sacred vault.
Gowron does not care about what is sacred.
He wants to run a genetic analysis on a sample of the blood and on you. That should tell us if there is a biological match. Now if you agree to the test, I will make the Enterprise facilities available to ensure that it is conducted impartially.
Perhaps it is time to settle the doubts of those who still do not believe. I will allow this test.
There, that should do it. Computer, run a genetic comparison on this blood sample and the tissue belonging to Kahless.
The genetic patterns are identical.
But how? How can this be?
It is true. Kahless has returned.
I am sorry. Our replicators do not do justice to Klingon Warnog.
It has been so long since I have tasted any food or drink. There are many things I have forgotten.
Kahless, may I ask you about death and Sto-Vo-Kor? Tell me, what awaits us beyond this life.
I do not have those answers. I am merely a traveller, someone who has journeyed back and forth between this world and the next. While I am in this form, I know only about this world. And there is much work for me to do in this world, and you will be part of it, Worf.
Me?
It was your purity of heart that summoned me back from Sto-Vo-Kor, and Koroth has told me about the respect you have earned in the Federation and the Empire. I want you to have a place at my side as we restore honour to our people. Let me tell you about this new Empire we will forge.
It will be glorious!
It will be war. You are not a fool, Worf. Do you really think that every Klingon in the Empire will bend his knee and grovel before this man just because Koroth says he is Kahless?
He is Kahless. Your own test proved it.
I will not hand over the Empire to Koroth because of one test.
It is not Koroth, it is
Of course it is Koroth! Open your eyes. Koroth and the other Guardians have always opposed me. This is nothing more than a ploy for them to finally seize power. Even now, there are warriors on my own ship who want to see Kahless. There are others who believe he is an imposter. The divisions are already forming.
But it does not have to be this way. We could all join together and welcome Kahless as a united people.
Don't you see? This is exactly why they want you to join them. Because your brother sits on the Council and your voice carries weight in the Empire. They want you to influence others to follow them. Worf, we fought together once side by side to keep the Empire from being torn apart. Will you stand by and let these impostors destroy all that we fought so hard to protect? Renounce him, Worf. Stand with me and we can hold the Empire together.
You do not understand. Kahless is our future. Only with his help can we revive the pure warriors within ourselves. Listen to him, Gowron. Open your heart. Hear his words. He will restore your faith as he has restored mine. Give him a chance to lift your spirit and cleanse your heart before you take up arms.
Koroth. I see that not all fools die young.
Kahless!
Kahless, may I present Gowron, Leader of the High Council.
Kahless.
Long ago, a storm was heading toward the city of Quin'lat. The people sought protection within the walls. All except one man who remained outside. I went to him and asked what he was doing. I am not afraid, he said. I will not hide my face behind stone and mortar. I will stand before the wind and make it respect me. I honoured his choice and went inside. The next day, the storm came and the man was killed. The wind does not respect a fool. Do not stand before the wind, Gowron.
What was his name?
What?
If you were really there, you should be able to tell us the name of the man outside the walls. Describe him to us. What was he wearing? How tall was he? What colour were his eyes?
I do not remember. It was long ago, and in another lifetime. What matters is, I have returned to restore faith and hope to my people. To lead them back to the way of honour and the glory that was once theirs and can be again. Is that what you oppose, Gowron?
I oppose you. I say you are not Kahless, and I will not bend my knee to you as long as I can draw a breath or pick up a blade.
No!
Koroth!
A good try, Gowron, but not enough.
You have no joy, Gowron. Is your heart so filled of distrust and suspicion that you've forgotten what it is to be truly Klingon?
Kahless. The greatest warrior of them all.
Everything will be all right. We will say that Gowron used a dishonourable tactic in his fight with Kahless.
That he cheated.
That is a lie. He did not
We do not need to hear any more from the son of Mogh. None of this would have happened if you hadn't brought them together.
I am Kahless, I am the strongest, the bravest warrior.
Do not think about what happened. You must think of the future, of the Empire.
There is no future here. No glorious new era for our people. Gowron was right. You did not know the name of the man who faced the storm. You do not even know what real warnog tastes like. And you certainly are not the greatest warrior of all. Whoever you are, you are not Kahless.
You have said enough. Now get out!
You are using the name of Kahless for some twisted game. For that alone, you should die. And if you do not tell me what you have done, I will kill you right here.
The problems with your memory are the result of the way you returned.
What do you mean?
We, the Guardians, have been awaiting your return for centuries, but we did not have the technology to bring you back. Until now. We were able to use an organic sample of the first Kahless to give you life.
The first Kahless?
A clone. He is a clone.
What is a clone?
A being created in a laboratory by genetic material taken from another being. You are a copy. A fraud.
You are not just a copy. We gave you more than the body of Kahless.
We found a way to imprint specific information in your neurosynaptic patterns. We gave you memories, and not just any memories. We gave you the experiences of Kahless as written in the sacred texts.
So, I did not do any of the things that I remember. I was never at the city of Quin'lat. I never went to the Kri'stat volcano.
You were not awakened until we transported you into the cave and you appeared to Worf. Before that time you were unconscious in a laboratory where we accelerated your growth, corrected any genetic anomalies that occurred, gave you the wisdom and memories that
They grew you in a test tube like some kind of fungus and programmed you like a machine.
You are twisting the truth.
You talk to me of truth? You, who have brought to life this lie and called it Kahless?
It is not a lie. Genetically, he is Kahless, and he is needed by our people. You know better than anyone the corruption and dishonour that has destroyed the Empire. They need him.
They do not need a false god.
How do you know that this is not the way the prophesy was to be fulfilled? Who is to say that what we did was wrong?
I am. I will not let this fraud continue.
Worf! You cannot tell Gowron of this.
Do not give me orders, Koroth.
All right, but consider this. If you tell Gowron what we have told you, it will destroy him.  And with him, the last chance to restore hope to our people. It's your choice.
They have been sitting here for three hours seventeen minutes. They refuse to transport back to the ship with the rest of Gowron's men. They insisted on waiting here until they see Kahless again. Their faith appears to be unaffected by his inability to defeat Gowron. They still believe.
Then they are fools.
Does that mean you no longer believe this is the real Kahless?
Yes.
I am curious. Do you still think the real Kahless will return someday? Or has this experience only deepened the spiritual crisis which originally sent you to Boreth?
I do not know.
I understand your dilemma. I once had what could be considered a crisis of the spirit.
You?
Yes. The Starfleet officers who first activated me on Omicron Theta told me I was an android, nothing more than a sophisticated machine with human form. However I realised that if I were simply a machine, I could never be anything else. I could never grow beyond my programming. I found that difficult to accept, so I chose to believe that I was a person, that I had the potential to be more than a collection of circuits and subprocessors. It is a belief which I still hold.
How did you come to your decision?
I made a leap of faith.
The man who appeared to me on Boreth is not Kahless. He is a clone.
A clone!
Yes.
Did you really think you would get away with this kind of fraud, Koroth? I will have you and this abomination put to death.
It does not matter, Gowron. You will still not be able to stand against him.
What? He's not real. You just said so.
I said he was not the Kahless, but in the minds of our people he can be just as powerful as Kahless. Even now, two members of your own crew are sitting on our Holodeck waiting for him to return.
I do not care what they think.
But hey are not alone. Like many of our people, they need something to believe in, just like I did. Something larger than themselves, something that will give their lives meaning. They need Kahless.
But when they find out the truth?
It will not matter, Gowron. Despite the facts, they will still believe. They will make a leap of faith and there will be others just like them. Not everyone, but enough to plunge the Empire into civil war if you oppose them.
What are you saying? That I should just hand over the Empire?
No, that would be unwise as well.
Then what are you proposing, Worf?
You were right about one thing, Koroth. Our people are becoming decadent and corrupt. They need moral leadership. Kahless can be that leader, as Emperor.
There hasn't been an Emperor in three centuries!
The political power will remain with the High Council. Kahless would be a figurehead, but he will have the ability to rally the people, to lead by example, to guide them in spiritual matters.
The title is meaningless without the power to back it up.
Real power comes from within the heart. You would have the power to mold the Klingon heart. You could return them to honourable ways according to the original teachings of Kahless which are within you. It would be a great challenge, if you have the courage to accept it.
And what will we tell the people about their new Emperor? That he appeared in a cave or a laboratory?
We will tell them the truth. All of the truth. But we will tell them that even if he is not the real Kahless, he is the rightful heir to Kahless.
And if I refuse to go along with this?
Then my brother and those who support him on the Council will fight you, and I will fight you. And the Empire will fall back into civil war.
What do you say about this, Koroth?
What I say is unimportant.
It is acceptable.
Join with me, Gowron. Let us usher in this new era together.
Vorcha doh bagh  Kahless.
Farewell, Worf.
Goodbye.
What's wrong? You should be proud of what you've accomplished.
I went to Boreth to find my faith. For a time I thought I had. But my heart is empty again. I do not know what to believe.
You doubt the real Kahless will return one day. You doubt that he is still waiting for you in Sto-Vo-Kor. Kahless left us. all of us, a powerful legacy. A way of thinking and acting that makes us Klingon. If his words hold wisdom and his philosophy is honourable, what does it really matter if he returns? What is important is that we follow his teachings. Perhaps the words are more important than the man. Q'apla, son of Mogh.
Q'apla Kahless.
That's very good.  Well, that's very nice.
No, it isn't. I just can't get it right. Do you think the wings are too big?
Not at all. Birds have wings of all sizes, Eric. And you shouldn't worry about making it look perfect.
But Mrs Narsu said we should try to make our sculptures as realistic as possible.
She's right. It is important that you be able to make the clay take the shape you want it to have, but you're not supposed to be concentrating on technique today. I'm here to help you focus on the feelings you want to convey with your sculpture. For instance, what do you think about when you see a bird?
Flying?
Fine. So, make your sculpture make me think of flying, too.
How's it going, Data?
I have finished.
The dimensions are accurate to within one point three percent.
I'm sure they are. Data, you obviously don't have a trouble with realism, but you're here to work on your imagination. Maybe you should try something a little more abstract. Here. I want you to start a new piece. I'd like you to sculpt music.
Counsellor, music is a collection of acoustic vibrations. How can I reproduce a sound with clay?
Well, think of the effects that sounds have on people, the images that music brings to your mind, and then give it a form.
It's a start.
Riker to Data. Please report to the Bridge.
Acknowledged, sir. On my way.
Captain's log, stardate 47615.2. We have encountered a rogue comet in sector one one five six. It is not native to this region of space, and there is no previous record of this object on any Federation charts.
Based on its present trajectory, the comet appears to have originated in the D'Arsay system.
That's over two sectors away.
That is correct, sir. This object has been en route for eighty seven million years.
That's a long time alone in the dark.
Begin a full sensor analysis, Mister Data, and log the findings with the Federation Astrophysical Survey.
Aye, sir. The comet's outer shell is composed primarily of gaseous hydrogen and helium surrounding an icy mantle. The inner core consists of heavier elements
What was that?
There is distortion within the comet's inner core. I believed we experienced an intense sensor echo.
Can you correct for it?
I am attempting to do so now, sir. I have compensated for the effect. Sensors are reconfigured for a low intensity sweep. We are still picking up some interference, but the distortion is manageable. At these settings, the scan will be complete in thirty nine hours.
Worf says he's going to teach us some mok'bara throwing techniques today.
More like falling techniques. Last time we did that I was sore for a week.
What's this?
I have no idea. I've never seen it before.
Maybe Will left it for you. A little present?
It's not quite his style.
Then maybe it's a secret admirer.
That's an interesting thought
Well, you'll figure it out later. Come on, we're going to be late.
That's nice. Data, this is amazing. How did you come up with this?
I followed your advice, Counsellor. I used my imagination.
That's an understatement.
For some reason, as I was shaping the clay, the image of the mask was exceptionally clear in my mind. The design seemed to flow quite naturally.
Data, have you been in my quarters?
No, Counsellor.
Somebody left an object in my room. Some kind of artefact, and it has something very similar to this. And you don't know anything about it?
I do not.
Excuse me, Counsellor. Can you help me with my terminal? It's not working right.
Perhaps we should investigate this matter further.
These symbols don't match anything in the Federation linguistic banks.
Some kind of alien information has been downloaded into our computer core. I don't know how it's working, but it's reconfiguring our systems.
How did it get in?
I was able to trace its path from the replicators to the sensor array.
The sensors? They've been scanning that comet for the past eighteen hours.
Those energy readings from the comet's core, that sensor echo. We still don't know what's inside that thing.
Maybe it's about time we found out. Could we use the phasers to melt down the shell of the comet?
Yeah, a dispersed wide-field beam might do the trick. It wouldn't take long to come up with the firing parameters. What do you think, Data?
Data? What's wrong?
I believe I recognise these symbols.
How?
I do not know.
Do you think maybe your systems have been affected?
It is a possibility. I do not believe my systems are currently impaired, but I will run a full diagnostic to make certain.
What do you think they mean?
Boundary. Border. Road. Companion. Message. Messenger.
What's that one?
Death.
Captain, phasers are set for wide dispersal, ten percent maximum power. The beam will automatically terminate once the comet's core is reached.
Very well, Mister Worf. Fire.
Phasers have terminated.
Mister Data, what are we looking at? Is it a ship?
I do not know, sir. The object is nearly solid. It is composed primarily of fortanium and several unknown materials. It is over eighty seven million years old.
That's older than the comet itself. Could someone from the D'Arsay system have built it?
There are no technologically advanced cultures in that system now. But perhaps eighty seven million years ago, there were.
Why would they want to hide something like that inside a comet?
Possibly it accumulated those frozen gasses over time as it travelled through space.
In any case, it's definitely responsible for the system anomalies we've been experiencing. They're using our sensor beam as a carrier wave to transmit information into our computers and replicators.
But the question remains, why? What is its purpose?
Captain, I believe this object is an informational archive.
Why do you say that, Mister Data?
I do not know. However, I seem to have an intuitive understanding of its function.
Data, the internal structure of that thing is pretty complex, and it's got a repetitive node configuration which might suggest a database of some kind, but it could be practically anything. I don't see how you could know for sure what it is.
Data, do you believe that you're in communication with that object?
It is a possibility, sir. I recommend we run a level one diagnostic of my positronic net immediately to determine if that is the case.
Very well. Mister LaForge, give him a hand.
Aye, sir.
Do you think it's just trying to make contact with us?
Yes, it's possible. But if that is an archive from some ancient civilisation, we should allow it to do so. But we must be careful. Mister Worf, will you keep an eye on the sensors. If the ship is in any danger, I want you to sever the connection immediately.
Aye, sir.
Come.
Captain?
Yes, come in, Number One.
We've confined the system corruption. It won't be spreading any further. But we still have alien symbols floating around on our computer. This is quite a collection you've assembled. I've seen these things all over the ship. They all look the same. Primitive and non-functional.
Ceremonial, and deceptively primitive. Only an advanced technological society could have built that object out there. These artefacts played a ritualistic role in that society, I think.
Do you think Data could be right? Could we have stumbled across some sort of alien library?
Oh, yes, it's possible. And if so, this is a find of most enormous significance. That library seems designed to do so much more than simply store information. Who knows what we might learn from this?
I keep seeing this design.
Yes, this symbol seems to be of particular significance.
What do you think it means?
The concept of the four cardinal compass directions is quite common in many different cultures.
The words that Data recognised in the computer, boundary, border, road, they were all arranged in this design.
Well, perhaps the artefacts that all have this compass symbol belong to the same theme, movement. Finding a direction, travelling a path, crossing a boundary.
And death? One of the symbols was death.
The ultimate boundary.
I've seen this symbol everywhere too, but much less prominently displayed. It's always in the background, smaller than the others.
What do you think it represents?
I have no idea.
Lower synaptic functions are completely normal. Autonomous systems all check out.
I suggest we examine the memory subsystem next.
All right.  Data, what's wrong?
I am not certain. I am experiencing a curious sensation.
Well, what is it?
An impulse.
Impulse? What kind of impulse?
I do not know.
I'm going to check out your higher functions.
Geordi, what does it feel like when a person is losing his mind?
Data, come on, you're scaring me now. What's going on?
I do not know. I am different.
Well, you're going to be all right. You're with me, okay?
Okay.
Listen, I'm going to disconnect you.  What's going on?
Data.
DATA-IHAT:Masaka is waking.
Captain
DATA-IHAT:Captain. I've been waiting for you. You should feel honoured. I don't usually wait for anyone.
What is it you want?
DATA-IHAT:Masaka is waking.
Are you Masaka?
DATA-IHAT:I am not Masaka. I am Ihat.
What have you done to Commander Data?
DATA-IHAT:Commander Data? You mean the one who was here?
Yes.
DATA-IHAT:He's gone. Who can say where?
Picard to Counsellor Troi. Report to main Engineering immediately.
DATA-IHAT:Picard to Counsellor Troi. Report to main Engineering immediately.
Ihat, this place you come from, is it a cultural archive of your species?
DATA-IHAT:I come from Masaka's city.
Are there others like you there?
DATA-IHAT:There are no others like me.
Who is Masaka?
DATA-IHAT:You will find out.
I would like to know Masaka, speak with her.
DATA-IHAT:Do you understand pain? Death? That is all you need to know of Masaka. It is what she is. Go. Leave this place before she finds you. It can be done. I did it.
DATA-IHAT:Masaka.
DATA-VICTIM:I am yours. Every part of me is yours.
We should confine him to quarters.
This is a micrograph of what's happened to Data's positronic net. Now, as near as I can tell, these are behavioural nodes. I've counted fourteen so far. I think the archive is using Data to create different people within its culture much in the same way it used our replicators to create artefacts.
As a result, Data's real personality has been completely buried. In a sense, Data has the android equivalent of multiple personalities.
The archive hasn't stopped yet. Data's positronic net is still being transformed. There's no telling how many more personalities might emerge.
Geordi, I want you to continue to scan the archive. See if you can find some way to access it. And in the meantime, I'll see what I can learn from these people inside Data.
I'm not going to hurt you.
DATA-VICTIM:Only Masaka can hurt me. I am for her alone.
I need to speak with Ihat. Do you understand? Ihat.
DATA-IHAT:Captain. That was a cruel joke you played on me. For a moment, a brief moment, I actually thought that woman was Masaka.
Whoever took your place wasn't afraid of Masaka. He seemed eager for his fate.
DATA-IHAT:Pitiful, isn't it. You won't catch me humiliating myself for a woman even if she were a queen.
Then Masaka is your queen?
DATA-IHAT:She's a lazy creature. She spends most of her time sleeping. The problem is, what she does when she's awake.
Then should we try to keep her asleep?
DATA-IHAT:Try to stop the sun from climbing the sky? Only Korgano can do that, and he's not here.
Where is he?
DATA-BOY:Help me. Please.
What's wrong?
DATA-BOY:I'm afraid.
Of what?
DATA-BOY:Of her.
Masaka?
DATA-BOY:Her!
Picard to Bridge.
Report.
The archive just activated some kind of tractor beam, sir. We're not able to disengage it.
Has there been any damage to the ship?
There was an emergency reported in Ten Forward. Mister Worf's on his way.
Captain, there's some kind of energy pulse coming through the tractor beam.
It's overriding our control systems.
I'll be right there.
DATA-BOY:Don't leave me.
I won't leave you. Please, let go of me.
DATA-BOY:Does it hurt?
Yes.
DATA-BOY:She's going to hurt us all.
DATA-IHAT:Now you've done it, Captain. Masaka is awake.
Who's this?
I'd say that that is Masaka. Ihat referred to her as a queen, and it's not unusual in ceremonial cultures to find royalty symbolised by a sun.
You said the personalities inside Data were in awe of her, even terrified.
According to Data, the sun image is also a symbol for death.
There it is again. The same U-shaped symbol, small and insignificant. Almost as if it's an afterthought.
Captain, this is incredible. These artefacts weren't beamed over here from the archive. The matter here in Ten Forward has been transformed.
Into living plants? How is that possible?
I'm not sure. But bit by bit, this ship is being transformed.
We have been receiving reports from the rest of the ship. Part of deck twelve is now an aqueduct.
What are we being transformed into?
I'm not sure I want to find out.
I don't think we have a choice. We must destroy that archive. Mister Worf?
Sir, our weapon control systems are inoperative. However, we could reconfigure a photon torpedo for manual launch.
Make it so.
There's so much here we could have learned. I really regret losing that opportunity.
Okay, I've locked in the targeting parameters. What's the phase alignment now?
Less than point seven percent.
Good, that'll do it. I'm setting the yield at maximum.
Sir, the onboard power systems are not functioning.
Let's see what's going on here?
Something tells me we'd better get out of here.
Engineering to Bridge. Emergency transport. Two to beam out.
Maybe we'd better talk in here. The Observation Lounge has turned into a swamp.
So, what's our status?
Well, so far the archive has transformed about twenty percent of the ship. We've lost main propulsion and weapons systems in the process.
What about communications, sensors, life support?
We have communications, and limited sensor control. Life support seems to be unaffected.
I've analysed the alien plant forms. They've developed from biological matter we have on the ship.
The stone, the artefacts, are made in much the same way, extrapolating from the ship's own alloys.
Apparently the archive can reorder and transform molecular structure including DNA into anything it wants.
So it's using our ship, our alloys, our DNA, to create elements of its own culture.
But why is this happening? What does the archive hope to accomplish?
Well, whatever the intent that lies behind its process, I'm not going to permit this ship to be turned into an alien city. Mister La Forge, do you have any ideas?
We still haven't been able to cut off that beam, but I have managed to access the archive by sending an energy pulse back along their signal path. If I can locate the transformation programme, I might be able to control it.
That's a good idea, but I feel that the answer lies there, with Masaka. We must find her, access her. Talk to her.
Hello.
DATA-ELDER:Difficult to stay warm. It's not warm enough, not for an old man.
Tell me about Masaka.
DATA-ELDER:My daughter.
Tell me, how can I talk to her?
DATA-ELDER:Children grow, forget their parents. Only Korgano can talk to Masaka.
Korgano? Who is that?
DATA-IHAT:Well, aren't we the persistent one.
Ihat.
DATA-IHAT:Is anyone else so charming?
Masaka is taking over my ship.
DATA-IHAT:I told you she would.
I want to talk with her but I understand that Korgano is the only one who can do that.
DATA-IHAT:Who told you that?
An old man. Masaka's father.
DATA-IHAT:Oh, yes, yes. Legend has it she chopped him up and used his bones to make the world. Any wonder he doesn't like to talk about her?
How can I find Korgano?
DATA-IHAT:I don't know. He's not chasing her anymore.
Where has he gone?
DATA-IHAT:Stop asking me these questions. I was fast enough to get away from her once. I don't want her to find me again. I'll wind up on her sacrificial slab.
Ihat, if she's looking for a sacrifice, she can take me. Perhaps then she'll stop looking for you.
DATA-IHAT:Well, there's an idea. Better you than me.
Very well. What do we do.
DATA-IHAT:You must build Masaka's temple. The Queen's temple. That will get her attention.
Very well. How do I do that?
DATA-IHAT:You need the sign. I could give it to you. So could the old man. But just try getting it out of him.
Give me the sign.
DATA-IHAT:If she finds out, you can't imagine her rage. She lets people die of thirst. A terrible death. Sometimes she burns them alive. She is glorious.
Ihat, the sign, give it to me.
DATA-IHAT:If she comes, you will take my place?
Yes.
DATA-IHAT:All right. Quickly, give me your hand. A line, as the unending horizon. A curve as. She has found me.
Masaka, show yourself. I will go with you.
DATA-IHAT:It seems I was not fast enough.
DATA-ELDER:So hard to stay warm. Are you one of my children? I can't remember anymore.
I need your help. I need the sign for the temple. For Masaka's temple.
DATA-ELDER:It won't help you. Korgano no longer pursues her. Only he can stop her.
A line as the unending horizon. A curve as? A line as the unending horizon. A curve
DATA-ELDER:As the rolling hillside. A point as a distant bird. A ray as the rising sun.
Thank you.
DATA-ELDER:Now, come sit with me. Tend the fire.
DATA-BOY:I'm alone. No one left to help me. She's coming.
Are all the others dead? Did Masaka kill them?
DATA-BOY:No. She sent them away. It will take them days to die.
Any progress, Mister La Forge?
I think I've found the archive's transformation programme.
Will it accept the symbol for Masaka's temple?
I think so. I've isolated the program's input pathways. They're keyed to accept symbols. If I input this one, it should initiate the transformation process.
And create the temple?
I hope so. If this is the wrong symbol, it might turn the Enterprise into a big chunk of rock. No way to know for sure.
The question is, can we trust a personality from an alien archive that seems bent on taking us over?
Ihat risked his life to show me that symbol, and Masaka killed him for doing it. I think we have to risk it.
Captain. The entire deck has been cleared of personnel. We may proceed.
Commander Riker, we're ready.
Understood.
Initiate transformation.
Inputting the symbol now.
This would seem that this is Masaka's temple.
There is no one else here.
Ihat said that if we created the temple, then it would get her attention. It may be some time before she shows herself.
How will she do that?
I don't know.
Captain, take a look at this.
This is the first time I've seen these two symbols paired. That could be significant. Look, there it is again, and again. And there again. This is obviously an important pairing. He isn't chasing her anymore.
Sir?
Ihat said that someone named Korgano isn't chasing Masaka anymore. And the old man said, he pursues her no longer. In a sense, this small symbol might be seen to be chasing Masaka.
The symbol suggests antlers of some kind. Horns. Maybe it is meant to represent an animal.
Animals are worshipped in many cultures.
That smaller symbol could represent Korgano. Both Ihat and the old man said that Korgano was the only one who could control Masaka. Many ritualistic cultures incorporate the idea of balance into their belief systems. Now, Masaka is a queen. A powerful, god-like figure. It's not unrealistic to believe that she might have a counterpart, a consort. Look around. See if you can find that horn-like symbol anywhere else.
This is the most prominent instance of the horn symbol we've seen yet.
But now it appears as though Masaka's sun is chasing it.
The sun chasing an animal?
Maybe it's simpler than that. Maybe their relationship is more like the sun and the moon.
I see. Masaka and Korgano switching positions. The sun setting and the moon rising.
Exactly. Like two powerful rulers changing places in a continuous cycle.
And like the sun and the moon, only one of them can be in ascendance at any given time.
If we can find Korgano in the archive and bring him out, then perhaps he could force Masaka to leave.
But would we be any better off with him?
Ihat and the others didn't seem to be frightened of Korgano.
Sir.
Masaka.
Masaka, I am Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship
DATA-MASAKA:Go away.
Please, hear us. Your archive is destroying
DATA-MASAKA:I do not hear you.
She will not even listen to us.
Then we will have to find someone too whom she will listen.
I've found it, Captain. This is the only place in the archive where Korgano's moon symbol appears by itself, not linked with Masaka's.
All right, Mister La Forge, I want you to access the transformation programme. And when you're ready, input the symbol.
Isn't that a little risky?
We have no way idea what the result would be. The symbol might generate anything from Korgano's temple to Korgano himself.
In one sense, Korgano is Masaka's nemesis. Whatever this symbol represents, it could be for us a means to control her. Now, if anyone has a better idea, I'd be happy to entertain it.
I've accessed the programme, Captain.
Initiate the transformation.
Another mask.
You know, we could be going about this all the wrong way. This is a very ritualistic culture based on symbol and myth. Perhaps we should try to confront them on those terms. If I could somehow incorporate myself in their ritual, then perhaps Masaka would listen to me.
You're going to try to pose as Korgano?
Captain, we know so little about this culture and even less about Korgano. How would you convince Masaka that you're him?
I'm really not certain, but there are similarities between this culture and others that I've studied. I would imagine I'm just going to improvise. Mister Worf, what's our status?
I estimate we have less than two hours before there is nothing left of the ship. At least, nothing we can recognise.
Masaka.
DATA-MASAKA:Korgano.
Are you surprised to see me?
DATA-MASAKA:I thought I had escaped you.
You should know that is impossible.
DATA-MASAKA:You are a fine hunter but I am a powerful prey. You will never catch me.
Do you want to be the prey forever?
DATA-MASAKA:I thought I was alone. I thought I would not have to share the sky with you.
But without me you are not complete. I know you so well. You live for the chase, as do I. Will you not miss being the hunter, pursuing me, forcing me from the sky so that you can rise again?
DATA-MASAKA:You know me well, Korgano.
I think that you are beginning to tire. It is difficult, brightening the sky forever.
DATA-MASAKA:I am getting sleepy. You always do that to me.
So that you can wake with the dawn and begin the hunt again.
DATA-MASAKA:Let the hunt begin again. I am eager for that.
As am I.
Riker to Picard. I don't know what you did, sir, but it looks like everything's back to normal.
Acknowledged, Number One. Mister Data, are you all right?
I believe so, sir. I am not entirely certain what has happened. Have I been dreaming again?
I'm afraid that will take some time to explain.
Captain's log, stardate 47618.4. Commander La Forge has managed to disable the alien transformation programme. Starfleet has dispatched an archaeological team to study the archive further.
But I don't understand. I thought all the alien artefacts had disappeared from the Enterprise.
That one was not created by the archive, sir. That is the clay mask I originally made. I have since painted it.
A memento.
Yes, sir. Although I am relieved to be rid of those alien personalities, in a sense, I am now empty.
I can imagine. Doctor Crusher told me that there were possibly dozens of personalities inside you.
I suspect the number was much greater. My impression is that there were thousands, of all ages and walks of life. It was a remarkable experience.
Well, Data, you never may become fully human, but you've had an experience that transcends the human condition. You have been an entire civilisation.
Three weeks ago, one of our most celebrated Ambassadors, an advisor to Federation leaders for generations, disappeared.
I gave Spock the benefit of experience, of logic. He never listened.
It's been suggested that Spock might have defected.
Why would anyone want a Vulcan shield array?
Beats me, Commander. Every question we answer here seems to bring up two more.
K'VADA:Be careful, android. Some Romulan beauty might take a liking to you. Lick that paint right off your ears. You. Do you know what the Romulans will do to you if they discover who you are?
I have a good idea.
Sir, the ship is locking phasers.
Shields up. Red alert.
What do you know of this human? Jean-Luc Picard, a Starfleet Captain.
You've made a mistake.
ROMULAN 1:Quiet. Come with us.
I have come on an urgent mission from the Federation. I'm looking for Ambassador Spock.
You have found him, Captain Picard.
What are you doing on Romulus?
That was to have been my question of you, sir.
It is no concern of Starfleet.
On the contrary, it is very much Starfleet's concern. You're in a position to compromise the security of the Federation.
You may assure your superiors, Captain, that I am here on a personal mission of peace, and I will advise Starfleet when it is appropriate.
That is not satisfactory.
You cannot remain here, Captain Picard.
And I will not return without a full explanation. Ambassador, with great respect for all that you've achieved on behalf of the Federation, this sort of cowboy diplomacy will not easily be tolerated any more.
Cowboy diplomacy?
If you wish to undertake a mission with obvious repercussions to the Federation, then you should discuss it with the Federation. I'm here as their representative. You'll have to discuss it with me.
That is precisely what I had hoped to avoid.
I also have the responsibility of being the bearer of unhappy news.
Sarek? Sarek is dead? Walk with me, Picard.
I know of your mind-meld with my father which enabled him to complete his last mission.
It was an honour. He is a great man.
He was a great representative of the Vulcan people and of the Federation.
I was with him before coming here. He expressed his pride in you. His love.
Emotional disarray was a symptom of the illness from which he suffered.
No, those feelings came from his heart, Spock. He shared them with me. I know.
Sarek would no more approve my coming here than you do, Picard. For some time now, I've been aware of a growing movement here of people who seek to learn the ideals of the Vulcan philosophy. They've been declared enemies of the state. But there are a few in the Romulan hierarchy like Pardek, who are sympathetic. He asked me to come now, because he believes it may be time to take the first step toward reunification.
Reunification? After so many centuries? After so many fundamental differences have evolved between your peoples?
It would seem unlikely to succeed, but I cannot ignore the potential rewards that a union between our two worlds would bring.
What is this first step that Pardek suggests?
There is a new Proconsul in the Romulan Senate. He is young and idealistic. He has promised many reforms. Pardek believes that he may be receptive to discussing reunification.
Why would you not bring something so important to the attention of your own people or the Federation?
A personal decision, Captain. Perhaps you are aware of the small role I played in the overture to peace with the Klingons.
History is aware of the role you played, Ambassador.
Not entirely. It was I who committed Captain Kirk to that peace mission, and I who had to bear the responsibility for the consequences to him and his crew. Quite simply, I am unwilling to risk anyone's life but my own on this occasion. So I ask you respect my wishes and leave.
Ambassador, your logic escapes me. If I didn't know better, I would say that your judgment is influenced by your emotions.
You speak as my father would if he were here, Picard.
I speak as a Starfleet officer, and I cannot ignore the risks to you.
I was involved with cowboy diplomacy, as you describe it, long before you were born.
Nevertheless, sir, I'm not prepared to leave until your affairs are completed.
In your own way, you are as stubborn as another Captain of the Enterprise I once knew.
Then I'm in good company, sir.
K'VADA:We have more important things to attend to than acting as your nursemaids.
Captain Picard regrets detaining you, but it will be necessary for a while longer. In addition, I require access to your ship's computer.
K'VADA:Access to our computer? For what purpose?
I am going to attempt to penetrate the Romulan Central Information net.
K'VADA:Don't bother. We've been trying for years.
I have unique skills that may allow me to succeed.
K'VADA:I cannot reveal classified Klingon entry codes to Starfleet.
Your entry codes can be easily reconfigured after we depart. And Captain Picard has authorised me to share with you any information we obtain from the Romulan databanks.
K'VADA:Anything else?
We will also need to communicate with the Enterprise in sector two thirteen.
K'VADA:You do and the Romulans will instantly know our co-ordinates.
Using conventional means, that would be true. However, I suggest we piggy-back our signal on Romulan subspace transmissions.
K'VADA:Piggy-back?
A human metaphor, pardon me. We would use a Romulan signal as a carrier for own one, thus disguising its origin.
K'VADA:It won't work.
I believe it would. During the last hour, I have conducted a systematic review of the entire Romulan subspace grid. I have compared my findings with the specifications of your own transmission array. They appear to be compatible.
Thank you for your co-operation.
ROMULAN 1:Allow me to brighten your table. Jolan tru.
The Senate has adjourned. Pardek will be here shortly.
How widespread is this movement?
There are groups in every populated area. I've personally spoken with members from four provinces. It has become a serious concern for the Romulan leadership.
Serious enough for the leaders to suddenly embrace a Vulcan peace initiative? I have some difficulty in accepting that.
I sense you have a closed mind, Captain. Closed minds have kept these two worlds apart for centuries. In the Federation, we have learned from experience to view the Romulans with distrust. We can either choose to live with that enmity or seek an opportunity to change it. I choose the latter.
I will be the first to cheer when the Neutral Zone is abolished. But I wonder if this movement is strong enough to reshape the entire Romulan political landscape.
One can begin to reshape the landscape with a single flower, Captain.
D'TAN:Jolan Tru, Mister Spock. Here, look what I've brought you.
This is my friend, D'Tan. He's very curious about Vulcan.
Hello, D'Tan.
Where did you get this? This is very old.
D'TAN:They read to us from it at the meetings. It tells the story of the Vulcan separation.
D'Tan, you should not bring that out here. You've been told many times.
D'TAN:I just wanted to show it to Mister Spock.
Off with you. We'll see you later tonight.
D'TAN:Will you tell us more stories about Vulcan?
Yes, I will.
D'TAN:Jolan Tru.
Perhaps this is not such a good place to talk.
So, what do you think of your enemy, Captain Picard?
These people are no one's enemy, Senator.
Many of my colleagues fear what they have to say. But I have learned to listen carefully. Children like D'Tan are our future. Old men like me will not be able to hold on to ancient prejudice and hostility. Young people won't allow it. But now, now that they've met their first real Vulcan, it has only inspired them more. I am sure that is evident to you, Spock.
I did not anticipate such a passionate response to my arrival.
Romulans are passionate people. The Vulcans will learn to appreciate that quality in us.
If we are successful.
We will know soon. The Proconsul has agreed to meet with you.
First Officer:First Officer's log, stardate 45245.8. The Enterprise remains at Qualor Two as we continue to investigate the theft of a surplus Vulcan ship. The trail has led us to the former wife of a deceased smuggler.
A new face.
Same one I've always had.
And what would you like to hear?
Know some blues?
Look at me, Mister. What do you think? Seven different shades of them. How about some Andorian blues? Suck salt?
Never cared for it.
Good for you. Nasty habit. So who are you looking for?
Who says I'm looking for anybody?
Your face. Your uniform. In a place like this.
Okay. I'm looking for you.
Oh, you just made my day.
I have to ask you about your husband.
Well, it was nice while it lasted. Which husband?
The dead one, I'm afraid.
Oh, you must be from the Enterprise. You destroyed his ship.
He was into some bad business. He took the evidence with him.
His one endearing quality, he always cleaned up after himself. And what do you want from me?
I was hoping you might know his business partners.
And why should I help you?
To be honest, I can't think of a good reason.
Well, you did kill my ex-husband, and that's not a bad start. So why don't you drop a few coins in the jar and I'll see what I remember.
I don't carry money.
Well, you don't offer much, do you?
Move over.
Oh, just what I need. Another set of hands.
You know this one? Twentieth century, Earth. Maybe I can teach you a lick or two.
You already have.
So, what do you say?
You going to be around for a couple of days?
I can be.
Sooner or later, a man named Omag will come by for a song. Always wants to hear the same thing, Melor Famagal.  He's an arms trader. A fat Ferengi.
Enter.
Proconsul?
Yes. Pardek, come in.
Ambassador Spock of Vulcan.
Proconsul.
Please. I've never liked titles since I was a lowly Uhlan in the Romulan guard. I am Neral. How is it again, Pardek's tried to show me.
I am honoured.
Good.
Permit me to withdraw.
Will we see you and your wife tomorrow at the state dinner?
We're looking forward to it.
It's been years since old Pardek's been invited to an official function. He's far too attached to the common man for most peoples' comfort.
That is their loss. I have found Pardek to have a unique insight into many issues.
Let me tell you something, Spock. We're going to start something here, you and I, that will redraw the face of the quadrant.
Are you prepared to support reunification?
I believe it must eventually come. Our two worlds need each other.
Forgive me, I did not expect to hear a Romulan Proconsul speak like a member of your underground.
I want you to know exactly where I stand.
And do you believe that you can gain the support of your full Senate?
Things are not what they once were in the Senate. The old leaders have lost the respect of the people. Involvement in the Klingon War, endless confrontations with the Federation, they're tired of it. Times are changing, and leaders who refuse to change with them will no longer be leaders. Spock, I am prepared to publicly endorse the opening of talks between our peoples. What do you think the Vulcan people think of that?
They will be cautious. There are generations of distrust to overcome.
But surely with a man of your influence leading the way?
Proconsul, the Senate has been recalled into session.
Very well. Can we meet again tomorrow?
As you wish.
Good. Jolan tru, Spock. Oh. Live long and prosper.
ROMULAN 1:It's everything we could have hoped for.
It is more than we could have hoped for.
But if Neral is ready to publicly endorse reunification.
It's hard to believe that he could rise to the rank of Senate Proconsul without the support of the Romulan traditionalists.
That may be true.
Then how can he turn his back on them so easily? How can he endorse reunification when it's considered subversive?
ROMULAN 1:Because he's not afraid of them. He knows that we'll support him.
Captain Picard is correct. It is not logical for the Proconsul to support reunification at this time.
WOMAN 2:Why would Neral lie?
Perhaps because he's hoping to expose members of your movement.
WOMAN 2:No, this is our chance for acceptance. Finally to be heard.
ROMULAN 1:I believe it's the Federation that fears an alliance between Romulus and Vulcan.
That is not true.
I came here to determine the potential for reunification. In spite of what has occurred, I intend to continue with my efforts. I intend to meet with the Proconsul as planned.
You let their emotion sway you.
On the contrary, I am pursuing the most logical course.
You are as sceptical as I am. Is it logical to ignore your own good sense?
I fear the influence of Sarek has coloured your attitudes, Captain, toward reunification and perhaps toward me.
That is the second time you have accused me of speaking with another man's voice. It's true he will always be a part of me. His experiences, his spirit. But I speak with my own voice, not his.
Curious that I should hear him so clearly now that he is dead. It is possible that I have brought my argument with Sarek to you, Captain. If so, I apologise.
Is it so important that you to win one last argument?
No, it is not. But it is true that I will miss the arguments. They were, finally, all that we had.
But your fight with Sarek is over, Spock, and you have none with me.
I always had a different vision than my father. The ability to see beyond pure logic. He considered it weak, but I have discovered it to be a source of extraordinary strength. Sarek would have seen this mission of reunification as a fool's errand, but somehow I think it is not. Logic cannot explain why, I know that I must pursue this.
Even if it leads you into a Romulan trap.
If the Romulans do have an ulterior motive, it is in the interests of all concerned that we determine what it is. So, I will play the role that they would have me play.
Have you had any success, Mister Data?
Negative, Captain. The Romulan Information net employs a progressive encryption lock. I have been unable to penetrate their security measures.
May I assist you, Commander? I have had some experience in these matters.
By all means, Ambassador.
The Romulans have incorporated a forty three part cipher key into their entry sequence.
Yes, sir, the twenty ninth is the only one I cannot bypass.
I think I'll take this opportunity to remove my ears.
He intrigues me, this Picard.
In what manner, sir?
Remarkably analytical and dispassionate, for a human. I understand why my father chose to mind-meld with him. There's almost a Vulcan quality to the man.
Interesting. I have not considered that. And Captain Picard has been a role model in my quest to be more human.
More human?
Yes, Ambassador.
Fascinating. You have an efficient intellect, superior physical skills and no emotional impediments. There are Vulcans who aspire all their lives to achieve what you've been given by design.
You are half human.
Yes.
Yet you have chosen a Vulcan way of life.
I have.
In effect, you have abandoned what I have sought all my life.
I believe I have isolated the twenty ninth cipher access code. I shall attempt to access the Proconsul's files.
Ambassador Spock, may I ask a personal question?
Please.
As you examine your life, do you find you have missed your humanity?
I have no regrets.
No regrets. That is a human expression.
Yes. Fascinating.
Do you know any Klingon opera?
I don't get a lot of requests for it.
Surely, you must know at least one theme from Aktuh and Maylota.
I may be a little rusty.
What is that dreadful noise? It sounds like a Bardakian pronghorn moose. You know what I want to hear.
Yes, yes, I know.
Worf to Enterprise.
Go ahead.
A fat Ferengi
Has just entered the establishment.
Is that Melor Famagal I hear?
It is.
I'm on my way.
Where's the waiter? Is there a waiter in this sorry place?
Is there a problem?
Yes. I need more napkins.
Use your sleeve.
What did you say?
Or use one of their sleeves, I don't care.
Who are you?
Commander William Riker, USS Enterprise.
Am I supposed to stand up and salute?
We're investigating the disappearance of a Vulcan ship.
Well you've got the wrong Ferengi. I never trade in Vulcan ships.
We know that you're involved.
Who would want a Vulcan ship? Vulcans are pacifists. I deal in warships. Can somebody get me a napkin?
Who would want a Vulcan ship?
Hypothetically speaking?
Hypothetically speaking.
I never learned to speak hypothetical.
Are you crazy?
Let me explain what'll happen to you if you don't tell me about the Vulcan ship. Your right of passage through this sector will be revoked and more than that, I will be very unhappy.
I delivered it to a Barolian freighter.
At what coordinates?
I don't remember. Ow! Watch it! You're stretching my neck.
Co-ordinates?
At Galorndon Core. Near the Neutral Zone. That's all I know. I swear it.
Enjoy your dinner.
As soon as I heard this Barolian ship was at the Galorndon Core, I started to think Romulans.
And the Romulans are suddenly very interested in bonding with the Vulcans. Spock has been meeting with the new Senate Proconsul about reunification.
Reunification?
The Proconsul says that he is prepared to endorse peace talks.
And Spock?
The Ambassador is sceptical, but he cares a great deal about reunification. As long as there's a chance of success, he's prepared to pursue it.
I'm afraid I don't see how a stolen Vulcan ship fits into all this.
Neither do I, Counsellor. How soon can you be at Galorndon Core, Number One?
A little over eight hours.
Well, this may prove to be a wild goose chase, but I don't see that we have any other choice, do you?
Agreed.
We are losing our Romulan carrier wave, sir.
We'll advise you further as soon as you reach your destination, Number One. Picard out.
Ensign, set a course to Galorndon Core. Take us to warp eight.
Aye, sir.
Captain, the Romulan subspace logs identify a transmission from the Romulan surface to a Barolian ship near Galorndon Core twelve hours ago.
K'VADA:Galorndon Core is along the Barolian trade route. They trade a great deal with the Romulans. It's probably just routine.
This would not appear to be routine. I was able to trace the source of the transmission. It incorporates the code prefix of Romulan intelligence.
Can you access it?
It is a short sequence of numbers. One four zero zero.
Nothing more?
No, sir.
D'TAN:Spock! I've been looking for you.
I have been meeting with the Proconsul.
D'TAN:Does he still speak of reunification?
He speaks of nothing else.
D'TAN:Have you ever seen these?
The syllabic nucleus of the Vulcan language.
D'TAN:They were my toys when I was small.
Your parents wanted you to learn to understand Vulcan?
D'TAN:Yes, as did their parents before them, to prepare us for the day when we would live again with our Vulcan cousins.
ROMULAN 1:Your friends from the Federation have returned. They need to see you immediately. I've told Pardek. He'll meet you at the cave.
The only communication that was sent were the numbers one four zero zero.
What does it mean?
It means that the Proconsul has apparently been attempting to deceive me. For what purpose I cannot say yet. But his conversations with me have obviously been part of a greater plan which involves the stolen Vulcan ship.
How do you know that, Ambassador?
The time the Proconsul set for the subspace announcement of our peace initiative is fourteen hundred hours tomorrow. One four zero zero.
Why would they need a Vulcan ship?
That will become clear very shortly. Captain Picard, welcome to Romulus. I trust you've enjoyed your visit. And this is the android I have come to respect in battle.
Lieutenant Commander Data.
How could they know of this location? Someone has betrayed us.
Yes. You did.
Spock, we've been friends for eighty years.
It is the only logical conclusion. You asked me to Romulus, you arranged the meetings with the Proconsul, and you knew that Picard and Data had returned to the surface with new information.
The great Spock. Very well. Senator Pardek, your service to the Romulan people is noted and appreciated.
Jolan tru, Spock.
Do not be distressed. Your dream of reunification is not dead. It will simply take a different form. The Romulan conquest of Vulcan. Bring them.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. The Enterprise has reached Galorndon Core, near the border of the Neutral Zone.
Any signs of life, Mister La Forge?
Negative, Commander.
The Romulans could have a cloaked base on the surface.
Or anywhere else along the Neutral Zone.
Sir, a coded subspace signal from Romulus. It's the Captain.
What?
Maintain position at Galorndon Core. Diplomatic initiative appears to be succeeding. Will advise.
The message did employ the proper coded sequence.
Yeah. I'm sure it did.
Come in, gentlemen. Take a seat, please.  Excuse me, I'm just finishing up a speech. For you, Mister Spock. I rather enjoy writing. I don't get to do it often in this job.
Perhaps you would be happier in another job.
Please feel free to change any words that you wish. I've tried to make it sound Vulcan. A lot of unnecessarily long words. In a few hours, you will deliver this statement alongside our Senate Proconsul. It will announce to the Vulcan people that a peace envoy is on its way from Romulus. We will transmit it on all Federation subspace frequencies.
Peace envoy, in a stolen Vulcan ship.
Actually, three Vulcan ships, Captain. The Enterprise is only aware of the one we stole from Qualor Two. We have been following your investigation. It has forced us to make some minor changes. One of them, a message sent in your name, ordering them to stay where they are.
The moment those Vulcan ships appear in the Neutral Zone, the Enterprise will move to intercept.
In that event, the Enterprise will be given more important matters to attend to. In the meantime, Ambassador Spock will be telling his people to welcome the peace envoy. And when they do, our forces will seize control before anyone realises what has happened.
Do you seriously believe that the Federation will not immediately intervene?
Of course it will, and we're fully prepared for it. But we will be there, entrenched, and it will be very difficult to get us out once we are. Reunification will become a fact of life.
I will not read this or any other statement.
If you do not, you will die. All of you will die.
Since it is logical to conclude that you will kill us in any event, I choose not to cooperate.
I hate Vulcans. I hate the logic. I hate the arrogance. Very well. Computer, holographic programme Spock One. By taking advantage of holographic sampling during the last several days, we have created a programmable Spock. Run programme!
HOLO-SPOCK:This is Ambassador Spock of Vulcan. By now, Federation sensors are tracking three Vulcan ships crossing the Neutral Zone. These ships carry the future of the Romulan and Vulcan people. Our long conflict is finally over.
Freeze. We would have preferred an interactive Spock who could have responded to questions, but this will have to suffice.
You can hardly believe this will convince anyone.
I don't need to convince them. Just confuse them long enough to reach Vulcan. End programme. If you'll excuse me, it's time to send our ships on their journey.
Suggestions?
Commander Data, are they still unaware that we have access to their computers?
I believe so, Ambassador.
Then perhaps you and I can find a way to create a diversion.
Sir, sensors are picking up three vessels crossing the Neutral Zone. Vulcan ships.
Vulcan?
What's their heading, Mister Worf?
One four three mark zero one two.
That would put them on a course to Vulcan. They don't seem to be in any hurry. They're only moving at warp one, Commander.
Worf, signal them on subspace. Request their status. Geordi, see if you can tell if it's one of ships we've been looking for.
They say they are escorting a peace envoy from Romulus to Vulcan. They request that we monitor Federation subspace channels. Ambassador Spock will be making an announcement shortly.
Perhaps his reunification talks were successful.
Geordi?
None of the transponder signatures matches that of the missing ship. They could have been altered. I'll keep checking.
Set a course to intercept.
Sir, the Captain's orders were to maintain
I know the Captain's orders, Lieutenant. Engage.
Impossible! There's no way they could have gotten out of this room.
That's far enough.
Stay right where you are. Drop your weapons.
How did you get in here?
Drop your weapons.
Drop your weapons.
Cease fire. Holograms.
I'm afraid I don't know too much about Romulan disruptor settings.
Cowboy diplomacy?
Well done, Mister Data. Though I don't think you got Commander Riker's hair quite right.
I will be more observant in the future, sir.
It doesn't matter what you do now. Spock's announcement will be made in minutes. Our forces will be on Vulcan before you can alert anyone.
We've just received a priority one distress call from the colony on Dulisian Four. A massive failure of the environmental support systems. They're going to require evacuation.
Mister Worf, any other ships in the vicinity of Dulisian Four?
One, sir. A Rutian archaeological vessel.
I'm sure it's not equipped to handle something of this scale, Will.
Geordi, any update on the Vulcan ships?
I've checked every sensor display backwards and forwards. If the Romulans altered them, they didn't leave any fingerprints. I can't tie any of them to the surplus yard.
The Vulcan ships have entered Federation space. Maintaining low warp.
Lay in a new course to Dulisian Four.
Incoming message from Romulus on all subspace channels.
On screen.
This is Ambassador Spock of Vulcan. By now, Federation sensors are tracking three Vulcan ships crossing the Neutral Zone. These ships carry a Romulan invasion force and must be stopped. I repeat, these ships carry a Romulan
Doctor, contact Dulisian Four and confirm this distress call. I have a feeling it may prove to be a false alarm. Mister Worf, how long before we intercept the Vulcan ships?
Fourteen minutes, sir.
Communication lines have been terminated at the transmitter, but I am quite certain the message was sent prior to the interruption.
Well done, Mister Data.
You'll never get out of this building.
I disagree, Commander. After studying the design of this structure, I have determined that our best route of escape would be the underground exit to the east of this wing. I have disconnected certain security scanners to assist us. I am afraid we cannot permit you to warn your guards.
Not bad.
The Vulcan defence vessels are also responding. The Romulan force is retreating toward the Neutral Zone.
They're not taking those Vulcan ships home with them.
Visual range, Commander.
On screen.
Romulan warbird decloaking alongside the Vulcan ships.
Red alert.
Advise the warbird to withdraw from Federation space, and tell them to leave the Vulcan ships where they are.
The warbird is powering up its forward disruptor array.
Ready phasers.
There were over two thousand Romulan troops on board those ships.
They destroyed their own invasion force.
Rather than let them be taken prisoner. Stand down Red alert. Mister Worf, advise the Klingon ship to signal us as soon as Captain Picard and Data are safely aboard.
Aye, sir.
D'TAN:This way. Pardek never saw these caves. It's safe. They won't find us here.
What will you do now ?
WOMAN 2:What we have always done. Continue to teach. Pass on the ideals to a new generation. Work for the day when new thoughts may be spoken aloud.
The Federation will welcome that day.
Captain, we will need to reach our transport site in fourteen minutes.
I wish you well.
Thank you. Thank you Captain.
Captain, I will not be coming with you.
Ambassador
The reason for my coming here has never been more clear. The union of Vulcan and the Romulan people will not be achieved by politics or by diplomacy, but it will be achieved. The answer has been here before us all along. An inexorable evolution toward a Vulcan philosophy has already begun. Like the first Vulcans, these people are struggling to a new enlightenment. It may take decades, even centuries for them to reach it, but they will reach it. And I must help.
I have learned it is useless to argue with you once your mind is set.
Not at all, Captain. I have found our arguments quite useful. Almost as useful as those I had with my father.
Would it surprise you to learn that he found them equally valuable?
Ironically, you may know Sarek better than his own son does. My father and I never chose to meld.
I offer you the chance to touch what he shared with me.
Analysis. Mister Data.
The planet's atmosphere is dissipating, sir. Intense plasmonic reactions are destroying it. The stratosphere is already breaking down. There are turbulent radiation storms across much of its surface. I estimate that the planet will be uninhabitable in less than thirty eight hours.
The distress call came in only four days ago. Why would Doctor Rozhenko have waited so long before sending it?
Atmospheric dissipation is a rare and essentially unpredictable event. When it occurs, it proceeds rapidly. Doctor Rozhenko may not have had sufficient warning.
What was that?
The dissipation effect is generating plasmonic energy bursts.
Is there any danger to the ship?
I do not believe so. However, we may experience intermittent system failures and power surges as a result.
Keep an eye on it. Mister Worf, any luck?
There is still no response to our hails, sir. I am attempting to scan the observation post.
He could be hurt. Maybe he can't respond.
Sensor interference is significant, but the post appears to be intact. Their power grid is still functioning. However, I am reading no life forms within the structure.
It's not like him to the post.
Especially under these circumstances.
Captain, I am detecting faint power emissions from a system of caverns near the post. It could be a deflector shield.
That can't be native to the planet. The Boraalans don't have anything close to that level of technology.
Captain, request permission to lead an away team.
Very well. But regardless of this planet's immediate situation, we must observe the Prime Directive. I want to minimise the risk of contact with the inhabitants. You will go alone, Mister Worf, and I want to have you surgically altered so that you could pass as a Boraalan.
Aye, sir.
You're worried about Nikolai, aren't you?
Yes.
Are the two of you close?
We are brothers.
You never talk much about him. What's he like?
Nikolai is older than I. We are not alike. We had many disagreements when we were growing up.
That's not unusual.
Nikolai has a mind of his own. He attended Starfleet Academy, but he was unable to follow the rules. He left after one year. But he has many fine qualities. He is brilliant, persuasive. A natural leader.
Sounds intriguing. I look forward to meeting him.
What are you doing here? You're not from our village. Who are you?
Who is this?
My name is Worf. I am a traveller.
How did you survive the storms?
I would know that voice anywhere. Worf, is it really you? It's good to see you. You've changed a lot in four years.
Nikolai?
Yes. Oh, Worf. This is my brother, Worf. He's come to help us.
But if you were able to get here, the storms must have subsided.
Please.
Do you think it's safe enough to return to the surface?
Please, I must speak to my brother.
Nikolai, what have you done?
They were dying. I refused to sit there safe in that observation post and watch it happen. I set up a deflector shield to screen these caves from the radiation and then I brought them here.
What did you tell them?
They think I'm a Boraalan. I told them I was from another village far from here.
At least you had that much sense.
When I sent the distress call I knew the Enterprise was in this sector, but I wasn't sure you'd be the one to come. I'm so glad that you're here, Worf.
Nikolai, there is nothing we can do for these people. You have only postponed their deaths.
I want to discuss that with your Captain.
And I am certain he will want to speak with you.
Friends, my brother and I must go back to the surface. He has provisions and will need help bringing them here. We'll return shortly.
It's too dangerous. The storms can occur without warning. If you're caught in one.
Don't worry. Worf is a seer. He understands the nature of the storms. He'll know when it's safe to travel.
Yes, that is correct.
Our seer died when the storms first came. We've been without his guidance for many weeks.
Let me go with you. I know the terrain better than anyone and I can help.
No, Vorin. Worf and I will be safe. We'll return shortly.
Doctor, you were fully aware that the atmospheric dissipation could not be stopped. What did you hope to accomplish by assisting these people?
I was trying to give them a future. What I propose is we create an atmospheric shield on the planet. We can camouflage the equipment just as was done with my observation post. No one will ever know it's there.
You can't be serious.
Indeed I am. I realise it will only provide atmosphere for a limited area on the surface, but it will be enough to save one village.
I have no intention of compounding what you have done by committing another gross violation of the Prime Directive.
Captain, the Boraalans have a rich and beautiful culture, a deep spiritual life. They deserve the chance to survive. And isn't that what the Prime Directive was truly intended to do, to allow cultures to survive and grow naturally?
Not entirely. The Prime Directive was designed to ensure non-interference.
But aren't we interfering either way? If we take no action, it's a conscious decision to let the Boraalans die.
Exactly. We have the power to save some of them. All we have to do is exercise it.
We are sworn to uphold the principle of the Prime Directive, and until that is changed there is no further course of action that we can take. Is that understood?
Some of my log recorders are still in my observation post. They contain most of my research. Since it appears that the only way I'm going to preserve Boraalan culture is in a museum, I request permission to return to the surface and retrieve them.
I'm afraid that won't be possible. But you can have full use of the ship's computer to set up a comm. link and upload your data from here. If there's nothing further, you're dismissed.
I'm sorry, Nikolai. I wish there were another way. I am quite familiar with your communications systems. If you like, I will help you set up your comm. link.
I'll do it myself.
Captain, atmospheric dissipation has accelerated over the past several hours. I estimate the planet's atmosphere will be completely gone within three minutes.
Captain, I've completed my data uplink. With your permission, I would like to integrate my research logs with the ship's library computer.
Of course.
The mesosphere is gone. Plasmonic reactions are now beginning to break down the troposphere.
Put it on screen.
What's going on?
It appears the plasmonic reactions are continuing to interfere with our sensors.
I thought you had compensated for that.
I had, sir. I will attempt to engage additional filtering elements. Visual re-established.
This is one of those times when we must face the ramifications of the Prime Directive and honour those lives which we cannot save.
I find no honour in this whatsoever, Captain. You will forgive me if I don't stay.
You have the Bridge, Number One.
Helm, take us out of orbit. Set a course for Starbase eighty seven, warp five.
Aye, sir.
What happened?
There appears to be an unusual power drain in the EPS distribution net.
What's the source?
Unknown, sir. It is difficult to localize.
The power drain has registered on my security grid as well, sir. It appears to be coming from deck ten.
All right, Mister Worf, get a security team on it.
Concentrate your scans on the EPS transfer links.
Computer, open holodeck five.
Unable to comply. Holodeck five is in use.
Override. Authorisation, Worf theta six one nine.
Unable to comply. Holodeck control systems have been bypassed.
Worf Come in.
What are you doing here?
I have to show you something. Whatever you do, stay quiet.
Look.
I've done what you refused to do. I've saved them.
I started thinking about this days ago when it became clear the planet was doomed. I knew if I could get access to your ship's computer, I could generate a replica of the caves. The hard part was transporting the Boraalans into the holodeck without anybody on the Enterprise noticing. But I was able to blank out the sensors and make it look like interference from the plasmonic bursts. And it worked, perfectly. The Boraalans were transported while they were sleeping. They never knew anything had happened.
Bridge.
It's a simple plan, really. That's the beauty of it. Worf, trust me. This is going to work.
Trust you? You never had any intention of obeying the Captain.
I wasn't going to let those people die just because your Captain started quoting Federation dogma to me.
Your duty was to respect the Captain's orders and to uphold the Prime Directive.
Duty. That's all that really matters to you, isn't it? Well, I refuse to be bound by an abstraction. The lives of the people of Boraal are far more important to me. You worry too much, Worf. You always did. Everything will work out.
You have disgraced yourself and you have disgraced me. I want nothing more to do with you.
You realise your career is finished.
I know that, Captain, and I would do it all again.
What do you expect us to do now? You have left us with a colony of Boraalans who think they're still on their planet.
I didn't beam them up without a plan. I've given this a lot of thought. I think we can find a new planet, an M class world, that can be their new home.
A home which would look very different from Boraal. You can't really believe that they'll be fooled.
That's where the holodeck comes in. I'll go back and tell the Boraalans we're going on a journey, to a different place where they'll be safe from the storms. The holodeck can gradually change the terrain as we travel, so that at the end, the holodeck simulation will match the conditions on the new planet. Then we'll simply beam them down.
What if it doesn't work? What if they become aware that something strange is going on?
Captain, I can't prepare for every contingency, but I assure you I'm accustomed to thinking on my feet. I'll deal with the situation as it evolves.
I'm not enthusiastic about this plan, but I don't see that we have another option. Very well, let's give it a try.
Thank you, Captain.
There are countless M class planets in Federation space which can support the Boraalans. We need to narrow the parameters.
It will take approximately nine and one half hours to complete the analysis.
Even then there's no guarantee that we'll find a suitable planet.
That is correct, sir.
Captain, you'd better take a look at this.
What is it?
We've got a problem, sir. I don't think it's going to be possible to keep this holodeck simulation stable.
Why not?
The plasmonic energy surges from the planet are affecting the ship's systems. We're having problems with the EPS systems and the power distribution matrix.
And as a result, the holodeck imaging processor has been severely destabilised.
It's not a question of whether the simulation will break down, it's a question of when.
There's no way round it?
Not while it's running. In order to fix it, I'd have to shut down all of the holodecks and re-initialise the entire system.
That will take hours.
We'll just have to hope the simulation holds long enough.
Very well. Let's try it. Mister La Forge, I want you to monitor the situation very carefully, and keep an open comm. link with the Holodeck so as to be apprised of any problems.
Aye, sir.
Captain, I'll return to the holodeck as soon as my surgical alterations are completed and I'll prepare the Boraalans for their journey.
Considering the situation you have put us in, I don't think it's wise to leave you alone with those people. Mister Worf will accompany you.
Sir, perhaps someone else would be a better choice. Counsellor Troi is familiar with
Mister Worf, the Boraalans already know you. There's no need to introduce them to anyone new.
Aye, sir.
Keep a close eye on your brother. I don't want him making this situation worse than it is.
My friends, we have returned. We have food. This is difficult to say, but you have a right to hear it. By the time Worf and I had reached the surface, the village was gone. The storms have destroyed everything. There is nothing for us to return to.
We can't survive in here. Our supplies won't last forever.
That's why we must leave. There is a place far from here where there are no storms. It will be a difficult journey, but in the end we will have a new home.
I know a way through the caves. We will travel safely until we return to the surface.
Where is this new land?
As we said, it is far from here. It will not be like the home you knew. Even the stars may be different.
Why would they be different? And how do you know we'll be safe there?
My brother is a seer. If he says we'll be safe, you must trust that we will be safe.
What's wrong?
Look.
Do not worry. It is an omen.
What does it mean?
This is the sign of La Forge. It is a message to travellers. It is said when these lines appear and disappear
In a pool of water, the road ahead will be filled with good fortune.
Hang in there, Worf. Give me just a second. There. That should do it.
You see? Our journey is already blessed. The road ahead is long. Let us have a meal together, then we'll make preparations to leave.
Worf, very good work. Apparently we don't make such a bad team after all.
We are not a team. I am here because Captain Picard ordered me here.
Worf, don't we both share the same goal? Aren't we both trying to make this plan work?
Only because you forced us into it.
I'm not ashamed of what I did. I'm not sorry I saved their lives.
You have not changed. You still expect people to solve the problems you create.
I'm not here to work out the issues of our childhood. I'm here to save a people who I care about. And if that upsets you, then so be it.
These are the two planets which best match our search criteria. Draygo Four features an unusually large temperate zone. However, it is within three light years of Cardassian space.
There are constant border disputes in that sector.
The alternative is Vacca Six. It is located in the Cabral sector.
That's pretty isolated.
It offers a less hospitable climate than the Boraalans are accustomed to. However, it would still appear to be the better choice. Do you disagree, Doctor?
No, Data, you're right. It's just that the enormity of what we're doing is overwhelming. We are deciding the future of a species.
It is a formidable responsibility.
There are so many questions we don't have answers to. What if the climate is so different that it affects them in a way that we can't anticipate? How do we even know they'll be able to survive? And if they do, how will their society evolve and what impact will it have on the Vaccan system? We have no idea what this decision will mean to their future.
Doctor, I do not believe we can offer any guarantees. We can simply make the best choice we have at the moment.
All right, Data. Vacca Six it is.
Data to Bridge.
Picard here.
We have located a new home for the Boraalans, sir.
It is Vacca Six in the Cabral sector.
We can reach that in forty two hours at maximum warp, sir.
Very well. Helm, set course for Vacca Six.
Aye, sir.
What is this?
Our chronicle. The history of our village. Doesn't your village keep a chronicle?
Not in this manner.
Then how do you teach your children their history, who their ancestors were, where they come from?
We tell each other stories, make up songs.
Stories change with each person who tells them. This, this will always be the same. Our chronicle has been maintained for seventeen generations. I was only able to save the last six. This shows the destruction of our village. This is you and Nikolai leading us to safety.
We must leave. Gather your belongings.
One of the scrolls is gone. I must have dropped it in the passageway. I'll go find it.
We must stay together. We will have to leave it behind.
Worf, the chronicle is the life of our village. Without that past, our future means nothing. I must find it.
Go, and return quickly.
Seer. I am an old man. Would you help me with my gear?
Of course.
That is Tarrana, my daughter. I am fortunate she was old enough to survive the storms.
She is a fine girl.
She is a beautiful girl. She has not been promised to anyone. If I do not reach our new home, I would like her to become your wife.
You will reach your new home. I promise.
Can I help you?
All right, all right, it's okay. Do you need some help? It's okay.
All right, everybody. Back off, back off.
I know things must look very strange to you, but everything's going to be all right. No one's going to hurt you. We're friends of Nikolai and Worf. Don't be afraid.
Nikolai?
Yes. He's my friend. That means you are, too. I promise I won't hurt you.
Please, help me. Where am I?
I'm sorry, there is nothing I can do. His neural physiology is unusual. I can't wipe his memory.
I see. How is he?
As well as can be expected. I've given him a mild sedative and Troi's been speaking with him. And he seems much calmer.
Does he understand the situation?
I think so.
Contact Mister Worf. Make sure he knows what's going on.
Here he is now. This is Captain Picard.
Vorin, isn't it?
Why did you bring us here?
Your planet was dying. It could no longer support life. We took you away from it.
But we never left the caves.
We have the ability to create the illusion of other places, like the caves on your planet. You have actually spent the last two days here on this starship, not on Boraal.
Then our home is gone.
Yes.
Vorin, listen to me. We can visit many other worlds. We can take you to one where you can build a new life.
A new life?
A chance for your culture, your people, to survive and grow.
How can we grow when everything that made us who we are is gone?
Dobara, you go on ahead.
I will carry your pack. Go and join the others.
Thank you, seer.
It'll be dark soon, in a few hours. Would you ask Mister La Forge to create a suitable campsite for us a few kilometres from here? What's wrong?
Vorin has left the holodeck.
How did he get out?
I do not know, but Doctor Crusher cannot erase his memory.
What will they do with him?
They have explained the situation to him. He must make his own decisions.
Wait. Are you saying that if Vorin wants to come back in here, they'll let him?
That is right. He is not a prisoner.
But if he comes back here and tells the others what he has seen on the Enterprise, everything we have done will be for nothing.
Then you should have considered that before you beamed them on board. But you never think about the consequences of your acts.
If you mean by that that I'm willing to do something while others hesitate, that's true.
Wherever you go, you create chaos. How many times did our parents lie awake at night, wondering what kind of trouble you were in?
Oh, if only I could have been like you. Worf, the perfect son.
I was not perfect, but I was not wild and disobedient.
Of course not. You were too busy doing your duty.
I would rather be accused of that than making our mother weep. But I see it is clear you have no intention of changing. I see no reason to discuss it further.
Commander, the holodeck malfunctions
Are increasing.
I'm running every stabilisation routine I know.
How much longer till we reach the new planet?
We'll be there in less than eight hours. You're just going to have to hold things together a little while longer.
Someone is coming.
May I speak with you?
Yes, of course.
I don't know what Nikolai said to you but, please, forgive him.
It is an old argument.
I've never seen him like this. He's usually so confident, so sure of himself. But now he seems different. Do you know why?
No. No, I do not.
Ever since Vorin was lost, people have been afraid. Worried that we won't reach our new home. We need Nikolai's strength now more than ever. When the storms first came to our village, many of us were ready to die. But Nikolai refused to let us. He gathered us together and led us into caves. He saved us. He is a brave and compassionate man, and I love him. Please, go to him. Make things right between you. I want us to be a family.
Us?
Yes. I want you to consider yourself my brother. After all, you're going to be the uncle of my child.
We are in synchronous orbit above the beam down site, sir.
Good. Mister La Forge, how much longer before we can transport the Boraalans?
A few more hours, Captain, but we've got some problems here.
I don't think the holodeck's going to last that long. We've had materialisation errors and resolution failures all over the place, and it's getting worse. The simulation could fall apart any minute.
We'll have the transporter room standing by. But we may have to transport the Boraalans whether you're ready or not. Please keep Mister Worf apprised.
Aye, sir.
You have the Bridge, Number One. We still have one more problem to worry about.
Yes.
We have arrived at the planet that I told you about. Have you made a decision?
I believe I would like to go back to my people.
I see. What do you intend to tell them?
I don't know.
If you tell them the truth, what will happen? Will they believe you?
I'm not sure. It is a fantastic story.
Perhaps they will think that you have had an hallucination, or that you're insane.
I don't think I would like to live my life knowing what I know and being regarded as a madman.
On the other hand, they may believe your fantastic story. They would learn about alien worlds, starships.
That would be disastrous. It would destroy everything they believed in. I can't tell them the truth, but I don't think I can live with a secret.
Then stay here. Make a future for yourself with us.
I need some time. Please.
How could you have mated with a Boraalan? What were you thinking?
I don't owe you an explanation. This is a matter between Dobara and me.
As usual, you are thinking only of yourself.
And as usual, you are here to point out the error of my ways.
You have treated Dobara with dishonour.
I have not! I love her and we're going to raise our child together.
That is not possible. I cannot allow you to stay here.
You will have to kill me first.
What does it mean ?
The storms have returned.
We will be killed.
No, you won't. Worf has the power to end the storms once and for all.
Yes. But everyone must take shelter in the tents.
The tents won't protect us.
Worf will protect you. You must trust him. Hurry, hurry. Get to your tents now.
Commander, it might be helpful if you could produce
A storm. Wind, lightning and thunder.
I'll see what I can do.
Get in! Get in! The storm is getting worse! Stay inside. Worf and I will take care of you.
Commander, energise.
The storms will not return.
As I said he would, my brother Worf has saved us all.
Captain's log, stardate 47427.2. The Boraalans have safely reached the site of what will eventually become their new village. None of them suspects they ever left their planet. However, our success has come at a high price.
I think it was some form of ritual suicide.
He said that he had nowhere to go.
He would have died even if we hadn't interfered.
But he wouldn't have died alone and afraid.
Are you saying you're sorry we saved the Boraalans?
No, of course not. Our plan for them worked out well. But I wish that Vorin could have bridged the gap between our two cultures. I would have liked the chance to have known him better.
Go inside.
Nikolai, don't.
Please.
I told you, you would have to kill me to get me away from here.
I do not want to fight you, Nikolai.
Things were never easy between us, were they?
No.
It's my fault. If I'd been more like you, we wouldn't have had so many problems.
No. If you had been more like me, these people would not be here now. You gave them a chance at a new life.
And I intend to share that life with them. The village will need a new chronicle. Someone will have to begin it. My child will need a father. My place is here. I'm finally taking responsibility.
You were never good at drawing. How will you keep a chronicle?
I learn quickly.
Then perhaps there is hope.
Could I take this with me?
It's yours.
I will have to explain all of this to mother and father.
They won't understand.
They may. I will tell them that you are happy.
Very impressive.
It's beautiful, but frightening at the same time.
Captain, I am detecting a transmission emanating from within the system.
What sort of signal?
It is self-repeating, of unknown pattern.
Where is it coming from?
A small moon orbiting the fourth planet.
Life signs?
Indeterminate. I am attempting to screen out sensor interference. Readings are still inconclusive, however the moon's atmosphere is capable of supporting life.
It could be a distress call. Helm, take us into transport range. Doctor Crusher, meet me in transporter room two with a medical away team.
Acknowledged.
I'm reading one life form, very weak signs.
Riker to Enterprise.
Go ahead, Number One.
We've found the wreckage of a small craft.
One survivor. It's a Borg. Male, adolescent. He's badly hurt.
Sir, there is no indication of other Borg activity within sensor range.
Away team, prepare to return to the ship.
Captain, we can't
Leave him here. He won't survive.
I think the Captain understands that.
I don't.
The Borg usually collect their dead.
He's not dead.
The transmission
At least not yet.
The transmission that we intercepted was probably a homing signal. We have to assume they're on their way.
Let me at least stabilise his condition, give him a chance of surviving until they get here.
Your concern is noted, Doctor, but any intervention on our part would alert the Borg to our having been here.
I'm afraid we've turned that corner already.
Kill it now. Make it appear that it died in the crash.
Leave no evidence that we were ever here.
Security measures must be taken before we beam it on board.
Thank you, Captain. Standing by.
Mister Data, notify Security to prepare a detention cell. Bridge to Engineering.
La Forge here.
We're bringing a Borg survivor on board. We'll need to neutralise the homing signal
Prevent it from sending or receiving transmissions of any kind.
I'll set up a subspace damping field around the detention cell.
Very well.
Four more. None survived.
Picard to Riker.
Go ahead, Enterprise.
We are transporting you directly to the detention cell.
I need him in Sickbay, Captain.
The cell, Doctor. Whatever equipment you need will be brought to you there.
Very well.
Come.
Captain, I just wondered if there's anything you wanted to talk about.
I don't think so, Counsellor.
I would have thought having a Borg on the ship would stir some feelings.
I'm quite recovered from my experience, thank you.
Sometimes even when a victim has dealt with his assault there are residual effects of the event that linger. You were treated violently by the Borg.  Kidnapped, assaulted, mutilated.
Counsellor. Counsellor, I very much appreciate your concern for me, but I can assure you it is quite misplaced. I have carefully considered the implications of having a Borg on this ship. I have weighed the possible risks, and I am convinced that we are doing the right thing. Now, I am quite comfortable with my decision.
I see. Well, if at any point you want to talk more.
I shall certainly avail myself of your help.
Lower the forcefield.
Captain, the Borg is still unconscious.
He suffered massive internal injuries. We've been able to control the haemorrhaging, but some of the implants in his brain were damaged. I may have to remove them.
The Borg will die if they're removed permanently. Their brains grow dependent on the biochips.
Perhaps Geordi can construct some new implants.
They contain relatively straightforward programming, interface protocols. We have the files we downloaded after your experience, Captain. I think I can manage it.
Mister La Forge, do you know enough about Borg programming to alter the pathways to their root command structure?
I'm not sure, sir. The subroutines are pretty complicated. I'd probably have to study the data processing algorithms. It's the only way I could trace the access codes.
If we could get to the root command, we could introduce an invasive programming sequence through its biochip system and then return it to the hive.
The Borg are so interconnected it would act like a virus.
Which would infect the entire Collective. We could disable their neural network at a stroke.
Infect it? You make it sound like a disease.
Quite right, Doctor. If all goes well, a terminal one.
If this works the way I think it will, once the invasive programme starts spreading, it'll only be a matter of months before the Borg suffer total systems failure.
Comments.
A question. What exactly is total systems failure?
The Borg are extremely computer dependent. A systems failure will destroy them.
I just think we should be plain about that. We're talking about annihilating an entire race.
Which under most circumstances would be unconscionable. But as I see it, the Borg leave us with little choice.
I agree. We're at war.
There's been no formal declaration of war.
Not from us, but certainly from them. They've attacked us in every encounter.
They've declared war on our way of life. We are to be assimilated.
But even in war there are rules. You don't kill civilians indiscriminately.
There are no civilians among the Borg.
Think of them as a single, collective being. There's no one Borg who is more an individual than your arm or your leg.
How convenient.
Your point, Doctor?
When I look at my patient, I don't see a collective consciousness. I don't see a hive. I see a living, breathing boy who's been hurt and who needs our help. And we're talking about sending him back to his people as an instrument of destruction.
It comes down to this. We're faced with an enemy who are determined to destroy us, and we have no hope of negotiating a peace. Unless that changes, we are justified in doing anything we can to survive.
Security to Captain.
Picard here.
The Borg has regained consciousness, sir.
Acknowledged. We proceed with the plan.
What's he doing?
He's trying to find an access terminal so he can interface with the collective. He doesn't understand that the signal has been cut off.
He's emitting a homing signal and a second subspace beacon, but our damping field is blocking both signals.
He's alone. For the first time he's being forced to cope with his environment without the resources of the Collective.
He must be hungry. The Borg don't ingest food. Their implants can synthesise any organic molecules the biological tissues require. What they need is energy.
Arrange to feed it.
Aye, sir.
I'll have to adapt a power conduit and install it in there.
If I didn't know better, I'd think he was scared.
I don't think I like this sport.
Last week when you scored two touches, you liked it well enough. Today you were dropping your foil. You kept letting me inside.
Ah, but if I lift up, you lunge right underneath. Let's face it, you're just better at this than I am. I understand we have a guest on board.
Yes.
Is that wise?
I'm not sure. I hope so.
I thought I understood you, Picard, but I don't understand this.
It was an errand of mercy. He was injured, Doctor Crusher decided for humanitarian reasons to care for him.
They're going to come after us, you know that. You, of all people, know that.
Shall we go again?
Are you all right?
You felt sorry for me. Look what it got you.
I'll have to go in to connect the power conduit.
I will follow the Commander. Reactivate the field once we're through.
Good. Now stay that way.
Commander.
We are Borg. You will be assimilated. Resistance is futile.
Just look around, pal. You're hardly in a position to make any demands.
We must return to the Collective.
Who's we?
We are Borg.
Yeah, but there's only one of you. Do you have a name? A means of identification?
Third of five.
There were five on your ship. Is that it? Just a number?
Third of five.
It does kind of suit you. Okay. This is for you. It regulates the power flow to the frequency that you're used to. This connection should fit the coupling on your arm. You're welcome. Let's get out of here.
Lower the forcefield.
He's hungry, all right.
Why do you do this?
I'm just a nice guy at heart. You feeling better?
You are not Borg.
That's right. And I hope to stay that way.
You will be assimilated. Resistance is futile.
That's gratitude for you.
I've been rationing his portions of energy. I think he understands. When he cooperates, he gets fed. If not.
Like a rat in a cage.
Look, if I'm going to figure out his command pathways, I need to learn how he processes information, and the only way I know to do that is by giving him perceptual tests. And for that, I need his cooperation.
So he can participate in the destruction of his entire species.
Doctor.
I know, I know. We're at war. I'm here to help but I don't have to like it.
Okay, I think we're ready to transport him. If he gives us any trouble, we can access the force field through that console. Are you ready?
La Forge to transporter room three. We're ready here.
We're standing by, Commander.
Energise.
Third of Five, this is Doctor Crusher. Doctor Crusher, this is Third of Five.
Hello.
What is a doctor?
A doctor heals the sick and repairs the injured.
The sick and injured are reabsorbed. Others take their place.
That isn't what happen to you. When we found you, you were dying. I saved your life.
Why?
It's my duty to help those who are hurt.
You give us food.
Yeah.
Is that your duty?
Yeah, that's right. Listen, Third of Five, Doctor Crusher here has repaired a lot of the damage to your biochip implants. We want to run a few tests, make sure everything's working okay.
Tests?
I'd like to show you a few diagrams and ask you some questions about them. It's very simple really.
You will be assimilated.
Yes, but before that happens, could we ask you a few questions?
We will answer.
Terrific. All right, hang on just a second here, Third of Five.
What is your designation?
Designation?
Third of Five.
You mean our names. We don't have designations. We have names. I'm Beverly. This is Geordi.
Do I have a name?
Do you want one?
A name.
I'm Beverly, he's Geordi, and you.
You
You
No, no, wait a minute. That's it. Hugh. What do you think?
You.
No, not you. Hugh.
Hugh.
Okay. Now, I'm Beverly.
I'm Geordi.
We are Hugh.
Now imagine what this shape would look like if it were turned inside out. Which one is it?
This one.
That's right. He's gotten every one. Eight out of eight. That blows the top right off the spatial-acuity percentiles.
It's the prosthetic eye. It seems to be giving him very complex visual information.
Like some kind of holographic imaging system.
That could be helpful. Hugh, I'd like to take a closer look at your eyepiece. Is that okay?
Here.
Thanks.
When you are assimilated, you will have a similar device.
Hugh, do you understand we don't want to be assimilated?
Why do you resist us?
Because we don't want to live the way you do.
Here it is quiet. There are no other voices.
Other voices?
On a Borg ship we live with the thoughts of the others in our minds. Thousands of voices with us always.
I think what you're saying is that you're lonely.
Here.
When you have completed these tests, what will be done with us?
We'll er, we'll send you home.
We will rejoin the Collective.
You know, it's funny. When I first creating this invasive programme I didn't have a problem with it. The more I work with Hugh, the more I
Hugh?
That's what we call him.
You named the Borg?
Well, it was easier to have something to call him.
Oh, so now you have a Borg named Hugh.
Right. And he's nothing like what I expected.
How so?
I don't know. It's like he's just some kid who's far way from home.
Do you know that you're the second person today to refer to that Borg as though it were some sort of lost child.
Anyway, I'm having second thoughts about what we're doing here. I mean, programming him like some sort of walking bomb. Sending him back to destroy the others.
Let me tell you something. When that kid's big brothers come looking for him, they're not going to stop until they find him. And then they're going to come looking for us, and they will destroy us. And they will not do any of the soul-searching that you are apparently doing right now.
Then why don't you go and talk to him. It might not be so clear cut then.
Because I wouldn't have anything to say.
Then why don't you just listen? That is what you do best, isn't it?
What is it, Number One?
We've picked up a vessel on the long range scanners, headed this way.
Analysis.
The vessel is traveling at warp seven point six. Mass two point five million metric tons. Configuration, cubical.
The Borg.
Its dimensions indicate that it is a scout ship similar to the one that crashed. Interference from the star's radiation will shield us from their sensors. We should remain undetected until they enter the system.
How long do we have?
At present speed they will arrive in thirty one hours seven minutes.
You don't look so tough.
We are Borg.
Aren't you going to tell me you have to assimilate me?
You wish to be assimilated?
No, but that's what you things do, isn't it?
Resistance is futile.
Resistance is futile.
It isn't. My people resisted when the Borg came to assimilate us. Some of us survived.
Resistance is not futile?
No. But thanks to you, there are very few of us left. We're scattered throughout the galaxy. We don't even have a home any more.
What you are saying is that you are lonely.
What?
You have no others. You have no home. We are also lonely.
What is Geordi doing?
I'm studying the components in your prosthesis.
Why?
We're trying to learn more about you.
Why?
Because you're different than we are. Part of what we do is to learn more about other species.
We assimilate species. Then we know everything about them.
Yeah. I know.
Is that not easier?
Maybe it is. It's just not what we do.
Why?
All right, think of it this way. Every time you talk about yourself, you use the word we. We want this, we want that. You don't even know how to think of yourself as a single individual. You don't say, I want this, or I am Hugh. We are all separate individuals. I am Geordi. I choose what I want to do with my life. I make decisions for myself. For somebody like me, losing that sense of individuality is almost worse than dying.
When you sleep, there are no other voices in your mind?
No.
Are you ever lonely?
Sometimes. But that's why we have friends.
Friends?
Sure. Someone you talk to, who will be with you when you're lonely. Someone who makes you feel better.
Like Geordi and Hugh.
That's it, Captain.
It looks harmless enough.
We had to disguise it as something innocuous. The Borg have ways of screening out programme anomalies.
How can a geometric form disable a computer system?
The shape is a paradox, sir. It cannot exist in real space or time.
When Hugh's imaging apparatus imprints this on his biochips, he'll try to analyse it.
He will be unsuccessful, and will store the shape in his memory banks. It will be shunted to a subroutine for further analysis.
Then when the Borg download his memory, it'll be incorporated it into their network, then they'll try to analyse it.
It is designed so that each approach they take will spawn an anomalous solution. The anomalies are designed to interact with each other, linking together to form an endless and unsolvable puzzle.
Quite original. How long before a total systems failure?
Not until the shape has gone through several hundred computational cycles.
When can you begin the process?
About another twenty hours. Doctor Crusher wants to make sure the new implants have taken hold.
Very well. Begin as soon as you're ready.
Captain. I have to admit I've been having second thoughts about this plan.
In what way?
Well, I've been getting to know him. The Borg.
I see.
He's not what I expected, Captain. He's got feelings. He's homesick. I don't know. It just doesn't seem right using him this way.
Centuries ago, when laboratory animals were used for experiments, scientists would sometimes become attached to the creatures. This would a problem if the experiment involved killing them. I would suggest that you unattach yourself from the Borg, Mister La Forge.
Aye, Captain.
Guinan. Please, come in.
Are you sure? You look like you're preparing for a quiet evening.
No, I'm delighted to see you. Can I get you something to drink?
No, thank you. I was thinking about how you said the other day that my foil was dipping. That I should get some exercise and strengthen my arm.
Well. a strong forearm is certainly an advantage in fencing.
And bartending. About the Borg. Aren't you the least bit surprised by him?
Surprised?
Did you know he has a name? La Forge gave it to him. His name's Hugh. And he's lonely. I don't know what made me go see him. La Forge said I should, but I said no. And suddenly there I was standing there, staring at him. I thought it was just curiosity. Just curious. I need to hear you say that you are sure you're doing the right thing.
If you're here to persuade me not to use the invasive programme.
No. I think I need you to persuade me.
Two days ago, you were so upset about the Borg even being on the ship that you tore my foil out of my hand. And now you're here questioning whether it should be treated as the enemy.
No. But when you talk to him face to face, can you honestly say you don't have any doubt?
I haven't talked to it.
Why not?
I saw no need.
If you're going to use this person
It's not a person, damn it, it's a Borg!
If you are going to use this person to destroy his race, you should at least look him in the eye once before you do it. Because I am not sure he is still a Borg.
Because it's been given a name by a member of my crew doesn't mean it's not a Borg. Because it's young doesn't mean that it's innocent. It is what it is, and in spite of efforts to turn it into some kind of pet I will not alter my plans.
Fine. But if you don't talk to him at least once, you may find that decision a harder to live with than you realise.
Worf to Captain Picard.
Yes, Lieutenant.
We are ready to transport.
Proceed.
Lieutenant, you may wait outside.
Locutus.
Yes. I am Locutus of Borg.
Why are you here?
This is a primitive culture. I am here to facilitate its incorporation. Identify yourself.
Hugh.
Identify yourself.
We are Hugh.
This is not a Borg identification.
Third of Five.
This culture will be assimilated.
They do not wish it.
Irrelevant.
They will resist us.
Resistance is futile.
Resistance is not futile. Some have escaped.
They will be found. It is inevitable. All will be assimilated.
Must Geordi be assimilated?
Yes.
He does not wish it. He would rather die than be assimilated.
Then he will die.
No. Geordi must not die. Geordi is a friend.
You will assist us to assimilate this vessel. You are Borg. You will assist us.
I will not.
What did you say?
I will not assist you.
I?
Geordi must not be assimilated.
But you are Borg.
No. I am Hugh.
I think I deliberately avoided speaking with the Borg because I didn't want anything to get in the way of our plan. But now that I have, he seems to be a fully realised individual. He has even accepted me as Picard, Captain of this ship, and not as Locutus.
So you've reconsidered the plan?
Yes. To use him in this manner, we'd be no better than the enemy that we seek to destroy. So, I want other options.
We could return him to the crash site. We'd have to remove his memory of being on the Enterprise.
But if we erase his memory, who he is or who he has become would be destroyed.
Isn't that the point? He'd be reassimilated into the hive without any questions.
Does that seems right, to help him become an individual and then take that away from him?
Is there any danger that the Borg might destroy him if they find out what's happened?
I doubt it. There'd be nothing to gain. It's more likely that they would simply wipe out his memory of those experiences.
Then either way, his memory would have been erased.
But perhaps in that short time before they purge his memory, the sense of individuality which he has gained here might be transmitted throughout the entire Borg Collective. Every one of the Borg being given the opportunity to experience the feeling of singularity. Perhaps that's the most pernicious programme of all. The knowledge of self being spread throughout the Collective, in that brief moment, might alter them forever. We leave his memory intact.
I have a question. What if he doesn't want to go back?
Hello, Hugh.
Hello, Geordi.
Hugh, a Borg rescue vessel is approaching. It will be here within three hours. We can return you to the crash site, where they will find you and take then you home. Or, if you wish, you can stay here with us.
What I wish is irrelevant.
It's not irrelevant, Hugh. It matters to us.
No Borg leaves the Collective. If they find I am missing, they will come for me.
Well, we'll deal with the repercussions later. We must know what you want.
You are many, I am one. What I want is not important.
Don't you understand, Hugh? We're giving you a choice.
Choice?
Yes, a choice. Do you want to go back with the Borg or stay with us?
I could stay with you?
We could grant you asylum, Hugh.
Choose what I want? I would choose to stay with Geordi, but it is too dangerous. They will follow. Return me to the crash site. It is the only way.
Hugh, think about this. Are you sure?
Yes.
The Borg ship will enter orbit in one hour. You'll soon be headed home. We'll beam him down and then we'll take up a position in the star's chromosphere. The interference will hide us from their sensors.
Goodbye, Hugh. It was nice getting to know you.
Goodbye, Beverly. You saved my life.
Hugh, it's not too late to change your mind.
I must return.
Captain, I'd like to go down with him.
My experience suggests that they would ignore him. Would you agree?
The Borg assimilate civilisations, not individuals.
But, Captain, they kidnapped you.
Because they needed a liaison to communicate with humans. They ignored every away team we sent to their ship, including yours, Doctor. You may accompany him. Goodbye.
Captain, I do not want to forget that I am Hugh.
Energise.
We found you there, in the middle of that debris.
Then that is where I will wait.
We are now entering position. Radiation levels are rising.
Increase power to the shields. Hold us here.
Status of the Borg ship?
Solar radiation is rendering our sensors inoperable. At last known course and speed, the Borg vessel should enter the system in three minutes.
Well, I guess this is it, huh? So long, Hugh.
Goodbye, Geordi. I will try to remember you.
Any response from Gravesworld, Mister Worf?
Nothing sir. Not since their initial communication.
They send out a plea for help, then they cut off transmission so they can't tell if there's any help on the way. Doesn't make much sense, does it?
Ensign, what's our ETA at the planet?
Thirty six minutes to orbit, sir.
Starfleet Command considers Graves' work on molecular cybernetics is reaching a critical stage. They consider this a priority one action.
A man is ill, Captain. Treating him is my priority one, regardless of who he is.
Did Data say why he wants to see us?
He said something about his new image. I tell you, he's been acting kind of strange lately.
How so?
Well, if I didn't know better, I'd say he was showing signs of insecurity.
Yes, but you do know better. Androids don't feel such things.
I don't know. Sometimes I think he's becoming more human than any of us realise.
Come in.
Data?
Geordi? Is Counsellor Troi with you?
Yes, I'm here, Data. Geordi said you wanted to see us.
Indeed. Or, stated more correctly, I wanted you to see me.
Can we come in?
Please.
Did you damage your face, Data?
It is a beard, Geordi. A fine, full, dignified beard. One which commands respect and projects thoughtfulness and dignity. Well? Opinions?
It's er, very different.
When I stroke the beard thusly, do I not appear more intellectual?
I'm sorry, I have to go now. Goodbye.
Why was she laughing?
We are receiving a transmission from Gravesworld, sir. It's unfocused. Not directed specifically at us.
On viewer, Mister Worf.
If anyone can hear me, please send a doctor. Things are getting worse.
Try and raise her, Mister Crusher. Tell them we're only minutes away.
It's no good, sir. I don't believe they're receiving us.
Our records show that she and Graves are the only ones living on the planet, Captain.
Then what scared her?
Captain, I am picking up another signal, but it is not from the planet.
On screen, Mister Worf.
The signal is very weak, sir. Audio only.
Pipe it through.
Mayday! Mayday! This is the USS  questing emergency assistance.  The outer hull is breached and environmental systems compromised. Need assistance.
Captain, I show the Constantinople in that general vicinity. She's a transport ship, used to ferry settlers. I'm showing two thousand and twelve colonists aboard.
Outer hull breach. She must have had an internal explosion.
If that's the case, they'll all be prone to severe hypoxia. Their lives are at risk. We've got to help them.
And what about Graves?
He's one man.
Suggestion, Captain. Why don't we execute a long range transport of an away team to assist Doctor Graves at earliest possible moment. We'd come out of warp just long enough to energise the beam.
A touch and go down warping? Mister Crusher, prepare to make it so.
Aye sir.
Engineering, Mister La Forge. We're going to execute a near warp
Transport. This may be a little tricky. I would like you to handle it.
Yes, Captain.
I'm on my way.
Assemble an away team, Number One. Include whoever the Doctor requires to assist.
Excuse me sir, but there may be hundreds on the Constantinople that require emergency attention. I should be there to supervise.
All right, who will replace you?
Lieutenant Selar. She has my complete confidence.
Worf, let's go.
Phaser on stun, Mister Worf. We don't know what's going on down there. There's no need to take any chances.
Agreed, sir.
Now remember, this is a near warp transport, so the effects may be a little unusual.
What do you mean?
You'll see, Counsellor. Energise.
Now wait a minute. I don't understand
You do now.
This might sound crazy, but for a moment I thought I was stuck in that wall.
For a moment, you were.
Data to Enterprise.
I read you, Commander. Go ahead.
We are inside Graves' home.
All is quiet so far. Of course, no one knew we were coming.
Use caution, but protect Graves' health
At all costs.
Understood, sir. I suggest we look around to see if anybody is home.
No need, Commander.
